Citation: Khalil, R.; Diab-Assaf, M.;
Lemaitre, J.-M. Emerging Therapeutic
Approaches to Target the Dark Side
of Senescent Cells: New Hopes to
Treat Aging as a Disease and to Delay
Age-Related Pathologies. Cells 2023,
12, 915. https://doi.org/10.3390/
cells12060915
Academic Editors: Alessandro
Attanzio, Erica Buoso and
Fabrizio Biundo
Received: 12 February 2023
Revised: 5 March 2023
Accepted: 7 March 2023
Published: 16 March 2023
Copyright:
© 2023 by the authors.
Licensee MDPI, Basel, Switzerland.
This article is an open access article
distributed
under
the
terms
and
conditions of the Creative Commons
Attribution (CC BY) license (https://
creativecommons.org/licenses/by/
4.0/).
cells
Review
Emerging Therapeutic Approaches to Target the Dark Side of
Senescent Cells: New Hopes to Treat Aging as a Disease and to
Delay Age-Related Pathologies
Roula Khalil 1, Mona Diab-Assaf 2 and Jean-Marc Lemaitre 1,*
1
IRMB, University Montpellier, INSERM, 34090 Montpellier, France
2
Fanar Faculty of Sciences II, Lebanese University, Beirut P.O. Box 90656, Lebanon
*
Correspondence: jean-marc.lemaitre@inserm.fr
Abstract: Life expectancy has drastically increased over the last few decades worldwide, with
important social and medical burdens and costs. To stay healthy longer and to avoid chronic disease
have become essential issues. Organismal aging is a complex process that involves progressive
destruction of tissue functionality and loss of regenerative capacity. One of the most important aging
hallmarks is cellular senescence, which is a stable state of cell cycle arrest that occurs in response
to cumulated cell stresses and damages. Cellular senescence is a physiological mechanism that
has both beneﬁcial and detrimental consequences. Senescence limits tumorigenesis, lifelong tissue
damage, and is involved in different biological processes, such as morphogenesis, regeneration,
and wound healing. However, in the elderly, senescent cells increasingly accumulate in several
organs and secrete a combination of senescence associated factors, contributing to the development
of various age-related diseases, including cancer. Several studies have revealed major molecular
pathways controlling the senescent phenotype, as well as the ones regulating its interactions with the
immune system. Attenuating the senescence-associated secretory phenotype (SASP) or eliminating
senescent cells have emerged as attractive strategies aiming to reverse or delay the onset of aging
diseases. Here, we review current senotherapies designed to suppress the deleterious effect of SASP
by senomorphics or to selectively kill senescent cells by “senolytics” or by immune system-based
approaches. These recent investigations are promising as radical new controls of aging pathologies
and associated multimorbidities.
Keywords: cellular senescence; age-related disorders; SASP; senolytic drugs; immune surveillance
1. Introduction
It is deﬁnitely clear that living longer is a leading risk factor for increasing vulner-
ability to the development of the most prevalent pathologies, including cardiovascular
diseases, neurodegenerative diseases, and cancer [1]. Increasing longevity presents a huge
challenge for medical care, as aging progression is diverse and is not absolutely correlated
to chronological age. Although a preventive medicine would have been the most suitable to
prevent age related disease, pertinent biomarkers were not available to precisely measure
precisely physiological age. However, new insights into the cellular and molecular events
playing a role in biological aging led to the deﬁnition of a restricted set of biomarkers
as potential targets to ﬁght tissue aging deteriorations [2,3]. One emerging factor is the
accumulation of senescent cells in tissues and organs, now considered as a common de-
nominator in a vast majority of age-related pathologies [4,5]. Senescent cells are especially
abundant at sites of age-related pathologies, and a great deal of evidence from mouse
models demonstrated a causal role of senescent cells in several age-related diseases, such as
sarcopenia, lordokyphosis, cataracts, osteoporosis, aged hematopoietic system, vasomotor
dysfunction, atherosclerosis, neurodegeneration, idiopathic lung ﬁbrosis, osteoarthritis,
hepatic steatosis, and hair loss [6–14], demonstrated by genetic approaches the clearance
Cells 2023, 12, 915. https://doi.org/10.3390/cells12060915
https://www.mdpi.com/journal/cells
Cells 2023, 12, 915
2 of 42
of p16-expressing senescent cells in mice models [15,16]. As this approach gave rise to a
global delay of the onset of deterioration of several organs and the appearance of the corre-
sponding age-related diseases, it led to a new paradigm considering aging as a disease and
not only as a biological process. Targeting senescence seems to be a promising approach for
treatment and prevention of aging to further promote an increased health longevity [17,18].
The fundamental characteristic of senescent cells is an irreversible cell cycle arrest
that occurs in normal proliferating cells in response to various forms of cellular stress.
Telomere shortening, UV radiation, increased levels of ROS species, oncogene activation,
direct DNA damage, and other forms of stress that elicit activation of the DNA damage
response pathway can lead to senescence [19–22]. Senescence was originally understood as
a physiological cellular response aiming to prevent propagation of damaged cells in the
organism [4,23–29]. Later, a number of additional beneﬁcial functions, such as tissue repair,
wound healing, and embryonic development, were discovered [5].
In addition to the protective role of cellular senescence, the long-term presence of
senescent cells was revealed to be detrimental to the organism [5,30]. Indeed, the prolifera-
tive incompetency of senescent cells is accompanied by a resistance to apoptosis, as well
as the secretion of a complex plethora of factors, referred to as the senescence-associated
secretory phenotype (SASP). It contains, chemokines, cytokines, tissue damaging proteases
and growth factors, and proinﬂammatory factors that normally assist in their removal
by the immune system [31,32]. Studies on diverse animal models indicate that multiple
components of the immune system, including NK cells, T cells, and macrophages, are
involved in controlling the presence of senescent cells in tissues [26,33–37]. The efﬁcacy of
this removal is variable among tissues and pathological conditions, and the mechanisms
and rules regulating the homeostasis of senescent cells are yet to be fully understood. In the
elderly, senescent cells and their SASP increasingly accumulate in tissues and contribute to
the establishment of a chronic inﬂammation, so called “inﬂammaging”, due to continuous
secretion of proinﬂammatory cytokines [24,38,39] considered as a feature of the majority of
age-related diseases [40].
In the last decade, ground-breaking studies have provided proof of concept that
either relieving the burden of senescent cells or suppressing SASP can have a beneﬁcial
impact to age-related tissues alterations, thus ameliorating the health state of an organism
and subsequently increasing life span [16,41]. These studies provide insights for the
development of novel therapeutic strategies to target senescent cells, called senotherapies.
Senotherapies include the discovery of small molecules acting as selective eliminators of
senescent cells (senolytics) or as inhibitors of the SASP and of the signaling pathways that
control it (senomorphics). This opened the way to an unexpected new ﬁeld of research
aiming at the development of senotherapeutic strategies that can interfere with and delay
the aging process. The underlying theme of this review is the recent and rapid development
of the various and complementary senotherapeutic approaches to alleviate the impact of
senescent cell in aging. We reﬂect on the medical development of senescence-focused
procedures, and the implications for future opportunities and challenges to ﬁght aging
diseases, including their limitations, efﬁcacy, and safety.
2. Senescence in Physiological Processes
Despite the detrimental effects of persistent cellular senescence and SASP being widely
documented, these systems play crucial and appropriate roles in normal physiological
processes, such as embryogenesis, wound healing, and ﬁbrosis (Figure 1) [4,25,42,43].
Senescence is essential for the healthy functioning of several physiological processes,
including embryonic development, wound healing, and ﬁbrosis. This kind of senescence,
also known as “acute senescence” [5], appears to be strictly controlled; it only affects a
certain subset of tissue cells, which are then quickly eliminated by the immune system.
Cells 2023, 12, 915
3 of 42
Cells 2023, 12, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
3 of 43 
 
 
Figure 1. Role of senescent cells throughout life: positive (blue) and negative (red) effect depending 
on the level of senescence and SASP components released, including cytokines, chemokines, and 
other molecules, which affects the neighboring cells. 
Cellular senescence is carefully regulated during embryogenesis, starts at certain pe-
riods and sites, and is involved in morphogenesis, tissue remodeling, and cell population 
balance [42,43]. Embryos at mid to late stages of development display senescent cells in 
very specific anatomical structures and locations throughout the embryo. Positive areas 
include the developing limbs, the tip of the tail, the otic and brain vesicles, the fusing 
sternum midline, the gut endoderm, and the closing neural tube. In each of these cases, 
senescent cells must be efficiently removed by macrophages to allow proper tissue for-
mation and maturation. This is important, as suppression of cellular senescence in mice 
results in developmental abnormalities, highlighting the crucial function of cellular senes-
cence in proper embryogenesis [4]. 
The expression of p21 and other SASP components are two characteristics that em-
bryonic senescent cells have in common with oncogene-induced senescent cells. The ab-
sence of p16 expression, DNA damage, and the release of IL-6 and IL-8 are some other 
variations between adult and embryonic senescence [43]. Embryonic senescence appears 
to be solely dependent on p21, indicating that it is not affected by p53, DNA damage, or 
other cell cycle inhibitors. The senescent cells in the embryo occur for a short period of 
time, undergo cell death, and are then eliminated by the immune system before birth 
[42,43]. As a result, throughout embryo development, TGF-β activates SMAD, which 
works in conjunction with FOXO proteins to regulate p21 expression and p21-mediated 
cell cycle arrest. 
Later in life, cellular senescence is initiated during the first phases of tissue repair, 
suggesting that wound healing and tissue regeneration depend on a similar process of 
cellular senescence as seen during embryonic development [25,42]. 
Senescent fibroblasts and endothelial cells produce many proteins, including PDGF-
AA, upon injury [25]. To begin wound healing, PDGF-AA stimulates myofibroblast dif-
ferentiation and granulation tissue formation. Additionally, SASP-associated proteases 
aid in regulating excessive fibrosis [25]. Besides this, pharmacological cellular senescence 
Figure 1. Role of senescent cells throughout life: positive (blue) and negative (red) effect depending
on the level of senescence and SASP components released, including cytokines, chemokines, and
other molecules, which affects the neighboring cells.
Cellular senescence is carefully regulated during embryogenesis, starts at certain
periods and sites, and is involved in morphogenesis, tissue remodeling, and cell population
balance [42,43]. Embryos at mid to late stages of development display senescent cells in very
speciﬁc anatomical structures and locations throughout the embryo. Positive areas include
the developing limbs, the tip of the tail, the otic and brain vesicles, the fusing sternum
midline, the gut endoderm, and the closing neural tube. In each of these cases, senescent
cells must be efﬁciently removed by macrophages to allow proper tissue formation and
maturation. This is important, as suppression of cellular senescence in mice results in
developmental abnormalities, highlighting the crucial function of cellular senescence in
proper embryogenesis [4].
The expression of p21 and other SASP components are two characteristics that embry-
onic senescent cells have in common with oncogene-induced senescent cells. The absence
of p16 expression, DNA damage, and the release of IL-6 and IL-8 are some other variations
between adult and embryonic senescence [43]. Embryonic senescence appears to be solely
dependent on p21, indicating that it is not affected by p53, DNA damage, or other cell cycle
inhibitors. The senescent cells in the embryo occur for a short period of time, undergo
cell death, and are then eliminated by the immune system before birth [42,43]. As a result,
throughout embryo development, TGF-β activates SMAD, which works in conjunction
with FOXO proteins to regulate p21 expression and p21-mediated cell cycle arrest.
Later in life, cellular senescence is initiated during the ﬁrst phases of tissue repair,
suggesting that wound healing and tissue regeneration depend on a similar process of
cellular senescence as seen during embryonic development [25,42].
Senescent ﬁbroblasts and endothelial cells produce many proteins, including PDGF-
AA, upon injury [25]. To begin wound healing, PDGF-AA stimulates myoﬁbroblast dif-
ferentiation and granulation tissue formation. Additionally, SASP-associated proteases
aid in regulating excessive ﬁbrosis [25]. Besides this, pharmacological cellular senescence
suppression in vivo decreases wound healing [16,25]. Thus, the importance of cellular
Cells 2023, 12, 915
4 of 42
senescence in development and repair is highlighted by the necessity of senescent cells and
SASP at the early stages of tissue remodeling [4].
It is important to point out that the development of tissue ﬁbrosis has been shown
to beneﬁt from cellular senescence. Senescence has also been proposed to reduce ﬁbrosis
through the production of proteases during wound healing [25]. However, in the lung, it is
considered to induce pulmonary ﬁbrosis [25,44].
Within several days of a skin injury, senescent ﬁbroblasts and endothelial cells emerge
at the wound site; lack of senescent cells results in delayed wound healing. Treatment
with recombinant PGDF-AA can prevent this delay, but severe ﬁbrosis can still occur [25].
This, in turn, is limited by senescence of myoﬁbroblasts, which, when not senescent, pro-
mote ﬁbrosis by producing ECM. Aside from this, senescent cells release ECM-degrading
proteases into the SASP [45].
Similarly, in the presence of a chronically damaged liver with severe ﬁbrosis, aging of
hepatic ECM-producing stellate cells can inhibit ﬁbrosis, just as it does in wound healing
(HSC). Active HSCs, as they become senescent, decrease ECM release and improve immune
surveillance. HSC senescence can be triggered by insulin-like growth factor-1 (IGF-1) or
CCN1, as well as by the anti-inﬂammatory factors IL-10 and IL-22, through the signal
transducer and activator of transcription 3 (STAT3) and p53-dependent pathway.
During regeneration in salamanders, a large number of senescent cells were found
in the limb. However, when the limb had fully recovered, these senescent cells disap-
peared [46]. Other experiments revealed that, when both normal and senescent cells were
inserted into a salamander, the senescent cells also disappeared rapidly. This suggests that
senescent cells could potentially be involved in the regeneration process and that salaman-
ders possess a functional system capable of effectively clearing these cells. Macrophages,
among other immune system components, may help in the removal of senescent cells
from some tissues, as shown by previous studies. Demonstrating how senescent cells were
surrounded by macrophages in living salamanders regenerated limbs supported this theory.
Similarly, senescent cells were not eliminated as efﬁciently in some salamanders whose
macrophages were destroyed by the toxic clodronate-loaded liposomes, as in salamanders
with active macrophages [47]. Therefore, macrophages are a vital factor in the process
of removing senescent cells from salamander tissues, and this mechanism of eliminating
senescent cells may unlock the secret of the salamander’s ability to maintain regeneration
during aging.
Because senescence play an important role in physiological processes, such as wound
healing [25], tissue remodeling, and embryonic development [42,43], the emerging ap-
proaches of clearing senescent cells to ameliorate age-related tissue deteriorations have
been questioned.
3. Senescence in Age-Related Diseases
Aging is the largest risk factor for developing many disorders, ranging from tissue
degeneration to cancer. One pivotal driver of most of the major age-related pathologies
is cellular senescence [2,5]. There are different types and mechanisms of senescent cells
formation. Cellular senescence, as ﬁrst described by Hayﬂick and Moorhead, referred
to the ﬁnite lifespan of primary human ﬁbroblasts in culture [48,49]. This observation
describes only one particular type of cellular senescence that is caused by the attrition
of telomeres, called replicative senescence (RS), a naturally occurring process that takes
place every cell division [50]. Cellular senescence is induced by a variety of stress-causing,
irreversible damages. These can include oncogene signaling, DNA damage, irradiation,
or chemotherapy, causing the activation of tumor suppressor networks, including p53,
p16, and p21, as well as cell cycle arrest [22,24,30,31,51]. In this case, it is categorized as a
premature senescence. Thereby, senescence acts as intrinsic tumor suppressive mechanism
that might prevent the proliferation of damaged cells. Irrespective of the stimulus, the
senescence program is executed upon persistent activation of p53/p21 and/or RB/p16
Cells 2023, 12, 915
5 of 42
tumor suppressor pathways, orchestrating the transition to and the maintenance of the
senescent phenotype [24].
4. The Various Types of Senescence
4.1. Replicative Senescence
In human cells, the cell cycle arrest elicited by continuous culture is called replicative
senescence in response to telomere attrition around an average telomere length of 6–8 kbp.
A senescent cell likely contains one (or a few) much shorter telomeres [52], and these cells
are characterized by absence of proliferation, but they possess long-term viability.
Telomeres are composed of TTAGGG sequence repeats at the ends of chromosomes,
which preserve the genetic material. The length of the non-replicated DNA molecules
decreases with each cell division. Thus, in highly proliferating tissues or in telomere syn-
dromes, progerias, and premature aging, which include hereditary diseases linked to early
senescence, the telomeres are shortening much more quickly [53]. Telomere attrition is often
considered to be a DNA damage and a DNA damage response (or DDR) [54] occurring
after approximately 60–70 cell divisions for embryonic ﬁbroblasts [48] (Figure 2). Ataxia
telangiectasia mutated (ATM), ataxia telangiectasia, and Rad3-related (ATR) are the ﬁrst
checkpoint kinases that become active in response to DNA damage [55]. Subsequently,
these kinases cause the activation of various proteins, including checkpoint kinase 2 (Chk2).
ATM phosphorylation fully activates Chk2 after triggering oligomerization and autophos-
phorylation of Chk2, which in turn transmits DNA damage signaling to several components
involved in cell cycle arrest, apoptosis, and DNA repair, including phosphorylation and
activation of the tumor suppressor protein p53, which initiates p21 expression [5,56,57].
P21 inhibits cyclin-dependent kinase 2 (CDK2), which prevents the phosphorylation of
the retinoblastoma protein (Rb). As a result, transcription of the proteins needed for the
subsequent cell cycle stage (S Phase) is prevented, resulting in cell cycle arrest at the G1
phase [5,57]. Along with the Chk2-p53-dependent regulation of p21, cancer cells implement
a p53-independent mechanism involving retrovirus-mediated expression of Chk2 kinase
to transcribe p21 without requiring p53 protein [56]. Moreover, consistent steps occur for
human diploid cells that have gone through RS, where in the later passages, when cells
lose their ability to proliferate and become senescent, p21 protein expression ﬁrst rises.
Later, the levels of p21 drop as those of p16 mRNA and ultimately its p16 protein steadily
rise. The protein p16, also known as cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor 2A, or CDKN2A,
slows down cell division by delaying the transition from the G1 phase to the S phase of
the cell cycle. This protein, with CDK4 and CDK6 kinases, form a complex that blocks the
phosphorylation of Rb, making p16 a ﬁnal key factor in stabilizing senescence, which is
the main reason why cancer cells frequently have mutations in p16 rather than in p21 [58].
Because senescence is a permanent cell cycle arrest in G1 phase, it must be permanently
maintained either by the previously described DDR, which can be prolonged or perma-
nent [59], or by the development of senescence-associated heterochromatin foci (SAHFs),
which prevent transcription of E2F-regulated target genes required for cell proliferation.
However, senescence can also be observed in the absence of SAHFs, for example in cells
that have become senescent following loss of PTEN or activation of protein kinase B (AKT),
or in murine cells that do not develop robust SAHFs [60,61].
4.2. Premature Senescence
Premature senescence is the second category of senescence initiated by various stress,
independently from telomere shortening [62,63], either through a DNA damage response-
dependent or independent pathway (Figure 2). Different stress factors and cell types can
vary the mechanisms of premature senescence. This senescence category includes the
oncogene-induced senescence (OIS) and stress induced senescence (SIS), oxidative stress or
PTEN-induced senescence (PICS), or therapy-induced senescence (TIS) as examples further
detailed hereafter.
Cells 2023, 12, 915
6 of 42
Cells 2023, 12, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
6 
 
 
Figure 2. General overview of the different cellular senescence induction pathways and related 
acteristics. Three different types of senescence: replicative senescence, oncogene-induced s
cence, and stress-induced senescence involving persistent DNA damage response (DDR). 
4.2. Premature Senescence 
Premature senescence is the second category of senescence initiated by various st
independently from telomere shortening [62,63], either through a DNA damage respo
dependent or independent pathway (Figure 2). Different stress factors and cell type
vary the mechanisms of premature senescence. This senescence category includes th
cogene-induced senescence (OIS) and stress induced senescence (SIS), oxidative stre
PTEN-induced senescence (PICS), or therapy-induced senescence (TIS) as examples
ther detailed hereafter. 
OIS, a different type of senescence, is caused by the downregulation and upreg
tion of certain oncogenes, often in combination with other changes [63]. Primary f
blasts, in association with the accumulation of p53, p21, and p16 proteins, become se
cent due to Ras oncogene (Figure 2) [22]. In addition, Ras activation leads to senescen
human primary thyrocytes, which arise from the p16 pathway activation via an int
tion between IL-8 and the C-X-C motif chemokine receptor 2 (CXCR2), also known a
terleukin-8 receptor beta (IL-8RB) [64]. Taking the example of the non-cancerous thy
cell line, H-RasV12 initiates senescence with higher expression of p21 and absence o
induction [65]. This led to the hypothesis that, while p16 is necessary for the mainten
of senescence and is increased subsequently, p21 plays a crucial initial function in th
duction of senescence and is first increased before declining [58,66]. H-RasV12, on
other hand, was discovered to control the H2O2-producing NADPH oxidase sy
NOX4-p22
phox in the non-cancerous thyroid cell line. The fact that this complex was fo
in the nuclear membrane and endoplasmic reticulum suggests that it functions as a D
damaging agent. Therefore, replicative stress brought on by a persistent oncogenic si
that upregulates the DNA replication protein CDC6 or ROS buildup might result in D
damage [65]. Ras-induced abnormal proliferation can also cause the dysregulatio
E2F1, activation of ARF expression, restoration of p53, and apoptosis [67]. Senesce
particularly OIS, is a cancer-fighting mechanism, as demonstrated by melanocytes, w
natural senescence in cell culture is p16-dependent. In vivo, p16-dependent cell se
cence occurs to some extent in the common benign melanocytic naevi. This propo
Figure 2. General overview of the different cellular senescence induction pathways and related char-
acteristics. Three different types of senescence: replicative senescence, oncogene-induced senescence,
and stress-induced senescence involving persistent DNA damage response (DDR).
OIS, a different type of senescence, is caused by the downregulation and upregulation
of certain oncogenes, often in combination with other changes [63]. Primary ﬁbroblasts,
in association with the accumulation of p53, p21, and p16 proteins, become senescent due
to Ras oncogene (Figure 2) [22]. In addition, Ras activation leads to senescence of human
primary thyrocytes, which arise from the p16 pathway activation via an interaction between
IL-8 and the C-X-C motif chemokine receptor 2 (CXCR2), also known as interleukin-8
receptor beta (IL-8RB) [64]. Taking the example of the non-cancerous thyroid cell line, H-
RasV12 initiates senescence with higher expression of p21 and absence of p16 induction [65].
This led to the hypothesis that, while p16 is necessary for the maintenance of senescence
and is increased subsequently, p21 plays a crucial initial function in the induction of
senescence and is ﬁrst increased before declining [58,66]. H-RasV12, on the other hand,
was discovered to control the H2O2-producing NADPH oxidase system NOX4-p22phox in
the non-cancerous thyroid cell line. The fact that this complex was found in the nuclear
membrane and endoplasmic reticulum suggests that it functions as a DNA-damaging agent.
Therefore, replicative stress brought on by a persistent oncogenic signal that upregulates
the DNA replication protein CDC6 or ROS buildup might result in DNA damage [65].
Ras-induced abnormal proliferation can also cause the dysregulation of E2F1, activation of
ARF expression, restoration of p53, and apoptosis [67]. Senescence, particularly OIS, is a
cancer-ﬁghting mechanism, as demonstrated by melanocytes, where natural senescence
in cell culture is p16-dependent. In vivo, p16-dependent cell senescence occurs to some
extent in the common benign melanocytic naevi. This proposes a plausible method by
which melanoma following a mitogenic mutation, such as the NRAS or BRAF mutations,
are repressed by the p16/Rb pathway, validating the hypothesis that senescence is a very
effective defense against cancer [68].
Premature senescence is triggered by overexpression of the MAPK/ERK kinase 1
(MEK1), which stimulates ERK1/2 in human non-immortalized intestinal epithelial stem
cells, but the same intervention produces mitogenesis in immortalized mouse intestinal
stem cells. MEK1 constitutive activation promotes senescence in primary murine ﬁbroblasts,
but it induces mitogenesis in cells lacking p53 or p16. These two divergent outcomes
depend on the integrity of a senescence pathway mediated by p53, p21, and p16. Hence,
Cells 2023, 12, 915
7 of 42
p53 or INK4A/ARF mutated cells can bypass senescence. P16 silencing is the most relevant
molecular alteration in cancer and cell immortalization [67]. Similarly, it has been found
in primary murine ﬁbroblasts deﬁcient in p53 or p16, where senescence was prevented
by activation of the Ras oncogene protein [22]. Senescence can be produced not only by
the MEK1 pathway, but also by ectopic expression of mitogen-activated protein kinase
phosphatase 2 (MKP2), which is involved in ERK nuclear signaling. Inactivation of ERK2
by MKP2 is also present during RS, and elimination of MKP2 expression or expression of
phosphatase-resistant ERK2 can delay it [69].
PTEN loss-induced senescence (PICS) is a form of senescence in which PTEN nega-
tively regulates the PI3K/AKT pathway. PTEN deﬁciency causes PICS without initiating
DDR via the PI3K/AKt/mTOR-p53-p21 signaling pathway. Mammalian rapamycin target
complexes 1 and 2 (mTORC1 and mTORC2) interact with the mouse double minute 2
(MDM2) homolog to control p53 by direct phosphorylation and, subsequently, accumula-
tion of p21 induces senescence [70]. PICS is convenient for pro-senescent cancer therapy,
as it is not followed by typical hyperproliferation or DDR. In a human prostate cancer
xenograft model, pharmacologically activated PICS through PTEN inhibition induced
senescence and prevented carcinogenesis [71].
Both ROS and oxidative stress are very important for senescence and are frequently
found in senescent cells. Senescence requires the use of two signaling pathways, p21 con-
trolling cell cycle arrest and AKT increasing ROS in p53-dependent premature senescence.
p53 activates mTORC2 and triggers the activation of AKT, which in turn controls intracel-
lular ROS levels by directly binding and activating the nuclear factor kB (3) promoter to
the NADPH oxidase 4 (NOX4) promoter. Nevertheless, p21 can also increase ROS levels,
depending on the cellular environment. In the absence of p53, it is plausible that p21
promotes both cell cycle arrest and increased ROS generation, but in the case of p53, it only
causes cell cycle arrest [72].
In a high glucose environment, senescence can also be triggered. As mouse microvas-
cular endothelial cells are cultured in a high-glucose environment, there is an increase in
ROS generation and a decrease in sirtuin 1 (SIRT1) expression, leading to higher acetylation
of FOXO1 and p53 and, thereby, to overexpression of p21, resulting in senescence [73].
Additionally, senescence can be promoted by ATM via the lysosomal/mitochondrial
axis by preventing the formation of two vacuolar ATPase proton pump domains (V1
and V0), thereby producing insufﬁcient lysosomal acidity and dysfunction of the lyso-
some/autophagy system. This is exacerbated by ROS accumulation, which leads to mi-
tochondrial dysfunction and ROS-mediated damage, both of which can lead to senes-
cence [74]. The SASP component interferon γ (IFN-γ) is thought to cause senescence in
human umbilical vascular endothelial cells (HUVECs) as a result of DNA damage, along
with increased ROS production, which may be generated by mitochondria or NADPH
oxidase, according to the cell type. Other IFNs have been reported to induce senescence in
various cell types [75].
It is worth mentioning that the mechanisms generating premature senescence are
not numerous. Some pathways have been identiﬁed as being represented in different
populations of senescent cells, such as inhibition of IMMP2L in RS or OIS [76], and ROS
production appears to be not only a feature of senescent cells [60,77], but can also initiate a
senescent phase on its own [74,75].
Another type of premature senescence is TIS, a condition that can be caused by a
variety of clinically used drugs, most commonly chemotherapy. Docetaxel, paclitaxel,
cyclophosphamide, bleomycin, vincristine, doxorubicin, cyclophosphamide, and cisplatin
are a few examples, in addition to radiotherapy, which can induce senescence [63,78,79].
The processes that cause senescence differ and are generally not fully explained. Busulfan,
for example, is an alkylating drug used in chemotherapy that, although it can induce
DNA strand damage by DNA cross-linking, causes senescence by a p53-independent
mechanism triggered by the Erk-p38 MAPK pathway (Figure 2). This mechanism is most
likely triggered as a result of increased oxidative stress. The major mechanism of busul-
Cells 2023, 12, 915
8 of 42
fan metabolism is thought to be GSH-S-transferase-catalyzed conjugation of glutathione
(GSH), resulting in GSH deﬁciency and early oxidative stress. This is further supported by
increased NADPH oxidase and ROS generation [66].
5. Features of Senescent Cells
One of the major challenges in studying cellular senescence is the lack of a clear,
sensitive, and accurate biomarker to detect it. The identiﬁed hallmarks of senescent cells
are not equally prevalent in all senescent cell types, and some of them are not speciﬁc to
senescent cells. Identiﬁcation of senescence is difﬁcult due to the underlying biological
complexity, and many biomarkers have been used for this purpose. The most robust include
higher expression levels of the endogenous CDK inhibitors p16 and p21, greater activity
of the lysosomal enzyme senescence-associated-galactosidase (SA-Gal), and buildup of
lipofuscin, a un-degradable aging byproduct [80]. Hence, senescent cells are deﬁned by a
mixture of these traits [62].
Morphology and Cell Cycle Arrest
In addition to the irreversible cell cycle arrest, senescent cells undergo morphological
and functional alterations, resulting in distorted cellular interactions with surrounding
environment [77]. A ﬂuorescent dye, such as DAPI, is used to label the DNA for mor-
phology inspection, enabling visualization and analysis of the nucleus size, being bigger
in senescent cells, as well as the ﬂuorescence intensity associated with the DNA per cell
nucleus. Supplementary immunocytochemical detection of p14, p16, p21, and p27 markers,
none of which are particularly speciﬁc, can be carried out [60] in conjunction with the
assessment of cell expansion [81]. An additional BrdU or EdU incorporation assay [13,60]
and cell counting kits can be used to examine cell cycle arrest [82].
SASP, senescence associated β-galactosidase activity (SA-β-Gal), resistance to apopto-
sis through pro-survival pathways, and other characteristics are some of the most essential
aspects of senescent cells. Therefore, upon visual and cell growth examination, it is advis-
able to screen cell cultures for two or more of the following putative senescence biomarkers:
SA-β-Gal enzyme activity, up-regulation of p16, SAHFs, and DNA-SCARS (DNA damage
markers) [60].
However, it is now well known that cellular senescence is responsible for the devel-
opment and progression of a wide range of major age-related diseases. Long-term accu-
mulation of senescent cells has been associated with neurological and metabolic diseases,
cancer, cardiovascular dysfunction, skin, bone, and liver problems, and infections [83].
Although senescent cells are usually cleared by the immune system, considerable numbers
of these cells are consistently found in affected areas. The detrimental effects of senescent
cells spread to the surrounding tissue environment through a variety of mechanisms, the
majority of which are triggered by SASP secretome-associated signals, including homeo-
static abnormalities, chronic inﬂammatory responses, stem cell niche suppression, ﬁbrosis,
angiogenesis, induction of epithelial–mesenchymal transition, and cancer cell survival and
proliferation conditions [5].
6. Senescence Associated β-Galactosidase Activity
SA-β-Gal activity is a key property of senescent cells, and it is also one of the most
widely used biomarkers for detecting senescent cells. Having an acidic pH (4.0–4.5), close
to that of the natural lysosomal environment, β-D-galactosidase (β-Gal) is a eukaryotic
hydrolase cleaving β-linked terminal galactosyl residues from natural carriers, such as
gangliosides, glycoproteins, and glycosaminoglycans.
Dimri et al., in 1995, discovered β-Gal activity in senescent human ﬁbroblasts at pH 6,
which is different from the pH level at which β-Gal activity is discovered in normal cells, at
pH 4. It has been shown that the enzyme at pH 6 is selective for senescent cells and that
the elevated activity of β-Gal is due to the upregulation of lysosomal β-Gal activity [38].
Evidence has been demonstrated that the presence of β-Gal in senescent cells is due to
Cells 2023, 12, 915
9 of 42
an accumulation of the lysosomal enzyme and its subsequent activity at sub-optimal pH.
As a result, nonsenescent cells showing reduced lysosomal expression of β-Gal are not
detectable, as β-Gal activity is reduced by 99% at pH 6 [84].
At the gene expression level, the origin of SA-β-Gal, which is expressed from the GLB1
gene encoding lysosomal β-D-Gal, was also veriﬁed. It can be detected by chromogenic
(X-Gal), ﬂuorescent (C12FDG, MUG), or chemiluminescent (Galacton) substrates. Different
applications are required depending on the type of substrate. Adherent cell cultures and
tissues are needed for X-Gal. Fluorescent substrates, on the other hand, are made from
supernatant or cell culture extracts. In addition, cell culture extracts are used in Galacton
technology [60].
For the ﬁrst time, real-time imaging of senescence in tumors with DNA damage
was published in 2019. The researchers created a near-infrared (NIR) activatable molecu-
lar probe featuring far-red excitation (680 nm), NIR emission (708 nm), and a high “on”
ratio following SA-β-Gal activation. Since the electron donating capacity of its oxygen
atom is reduced due to glycosylation, a hemicyanine derivative was chosen as the ﬂu-
orophore. Accordingly, the NIR probe ﬂuorescence for β-Gal (NIR-BG) is low. Upon
cleavage of galactose by SA-β-Gal, hemicyanine regains its ﬂuorescence by recovering its
zwitterionic resonance state. Then, ﬂow cytometry or confocal microscopy can detect the
ﬂuorescence [85]. NIR-BG was then improved to a self-immobilizing and self-igniting NIR
ﬂuorescent probe (NIR-BG2). Due to the production of a quinone-methide electrophilic
intermediates (pQMs), which binds to intracellular proteins, NIR-BG2 has superior imaging
performance and prolonged retention [86].
7. Senescence Associated Secretory Phenotype
SASP is another important biomarker of senescence that can be measured by an
ELISA assay for a single component at a time. Proteomics analysis, mRNA proﬁling,
multiplex assays, and antibody arrays, in contrast, allow for the simultaneous detection
of multiple variables, but they all have a higher cost per sample and are restricted to
fewer samples, making ELISA the ﬁrst choice. Quantitative proteomics based on stable
isotope labeling by/with amino acids in cell culture (SILAC) is another technique that
can be applied [60]. Senescent cells produce a distinct secretory phenotype known as the
SASP, comprising numerous chemokines, cytokines, growth factors, proteases, lipids, and
insoluble intracellular macromolecules. The essential SASP is composed of transforming
growth factor β (TGFβ), interleukin-1β (IL-1β), IL-1α, IL-6, IL-8, C-C motif chemokine
ligand 20 (CCL20), C-X-C motif chemokine ligand 4 (CXCL 4), monocyte chemoattractant
protein-1 (MCP1), plasminogen activator inhibitor-1 (PAI1), matrix metalloproteinase 3
(MMP3), prostaglandin E2 (PGE2), and several more. There are some elements of the
SASP that are more prevalent than others, but in general they are highly environment-
dependent and differ among senescent cells, according to the senescence inducers and the
cell types [87–90].
Senescent cells may operate in a paracrine or autocrine manner through SASP, causing
a pro-inﬂammatory microenvironment that functions in embryonic development, promotes
clearance of senescent cells through stimulation and recruitment of immune cells, and to
some extent enhances drug resistance and angiogenesis [89]. It is also possible for SASP to
propagate senescence and transmit it to surrounding cells [91]. Despite senescence being
a protective mechanism against cancer, senescent cells can also stimulate carcinogenicity
via the SASP. Thus, SASP may exhibit both a tumor-promoting effect via vascularization
and cellular proliferation, or an anti-tumorigenic effect via senescence and immune clear-
ance [63], where effects may depend on the status of p53. Senescent stellate cells in the liver,
for example, typically support tumor suppressor M1 macrophages, but in the absence of
p53, they promote pro-carcinogenic M2 macrophages. Likewise, loss of p53 in the colon
causes an increase in tumor necrosis factor-alpha (TNFα), which leads to tumor cell expan-
sion and proliferation [89]. At the same time, SASP is closely related to inﬂammation, and
thus senescent cells generating SASP play a key role in chronic age-related inﬂammation of
Cells 2023, 12, 915
10 of 42
adipose tissue. Adipose tissue is the largest component in human bodies and contributes to
higher circulating cytokines, whereas persistent sterile inﬂammation is an aging hallmark
and is strongly linked to aging-associated disorders [92], supporting the relationship be-
tween senescence and aging. The progression of SASP is generally in three stages: a rapid
phase associated with DDR, an early self-amplifying phase, and a delayed mature phase.
Once cell injury occurs, within 36 hours, a G1 phase cell cycle arrest occurs, followed by
rapid secretion of TGF-β. Given that DNA damage is almost always present in senescent
cells, this phase of DDR may persist, then a few days after the onset of senescence, an initial
SASP occurs with low factors levels such as IL-1α and leads to more SASP synthesis via
the ﬁrst self-ampliﬁcation autocrine loop, which progressively accumulates with time and
reaches SASP saturation after four to ten days from the damage [93]. SASP components,
such as IL-1α and IL-1β, which are also among the ﬁrst expressed components, drive au-
tocrine loops, which constitute a key aspect of SASP production [93]. Additionally, several
aspects can control the expression and production of SASP, the most important of which
are the NF-κB pathway, the p53 pathway, the CCAAT/enhancer-binding protein (C/EBP)
pathway [89,94] and the GATA binding protein 4 (GATA4) pathway [89].
7.1. SASP Regulatory Pathways
7.1.1. NF-κB Regulatory Pathway
One crucial SASP regulator that is frequently listed as the key transcription factor
that controls SASP expression is the NF-κB regulatory pathway [89,93]. Dimer formation
develops between NF-κB and DNA, regulating transcription, cytokine synthesis, and
cell survival. In the cytoplasm, the common p65/p50 dimer is blocked by an inhibitory
nuclear factor kappa B (IkB) protein (Figure 3). IkB kinase (IKK), which consists of the
heterodimers IKK-α and IKK-β plus the regulatory protein IKKγ, also known as the
essential modulator of NF-kappa-B (NEMO), activates NF-κB. Active IKK phosphorylates
the IkB protein, resulting in its degradation to allow NF-κB to migrate to the nucleus
and engage in transcriptional activity [95]. Various stimuli, including oxidative stress,
diseases, growth factors, and proinﬂammatory cytokines, activate IKK. Alternatively, it can
be turned on by mTOR via an interaction with IKK [95] or in the DDR, as the ATM/NEMO
complex is exposed to the cytoplasm, in which NEMO binds and enables the IKKα/β
heterodimer. At the same time, the p38 mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) pathway
can also affect NF-κB by activating the mitogen- and stress-activated protein kinases-1
and -2 (MSK1/MSK-2) that phosphorylate the p65 subunit of NF-κB [93]. In addition, the
stimulator of the interferon genes (STING), which activates IRF3 and NF-κB, can become
activated by cGAS via cGMP, causing senescence and SASP gene transcription via NF-κB
activation. Additionally, STING can be triggered upon DNA damage by p53 and TNF
receptor associated factor 6 (TRAF6), and therefore preferably activates NF-κB [89].
7.1.2. C/EBPβ Regulatory Pathway
Members of the same transcription factor family, such as the CCAAT/enhancer bind-
ing proteins (C/EBPs), C/EBPβ, and C/EBPγ, may also have opposing effects on SASP
regulation. C/EBPβ is an inducible transcription factor, similar to NF-κB, which has an ac-
tivated regulatory pathway during OIS and controls the release of cytokines, such as IL-1β,
IL-8, IL-6, GROα/CXCL1, and NAP2/CXCL7 [89]. C/EBP becomes phosphorylated within
the presence of RasV12, which promotes the creation of homodimers, proceeding to further
alterations and interaction with p300/CBP (Figure 3). The latter complex causes senes-
cence and transcription of the SASP genes. C/EBPγ, on the other hand, decreases SASP
genes expression in primary mouse ﬁbroblasts through dimers formation with C/EBPβ.
Elevated C/EBPγ has been linked to many human malignancies [94], whereas C/EBPβ is a
requirement for senescence and can initiate it when upregulated [89].
Cells 2023, 12, 915
11 of 42
Cells 2023, 12, x FOR PEER REVIEW 
11 of 43 
 
 
Figure 3. Main SASP regulatory pathways. SASP genes activation through the NF-κB transcription 
factor as the main regulator, in addition to C/EBPβ, p53, and GATA4. 
7.1.2. C/EBPβ Regulatory Pathway 
Members of the same transcription factor family, such as the CCAAT/enhancer bind-
ing proteins (C/EBPs), C/EBPβ, and C/EBPγ, may also have opposing effects on SASP reg-
ulation. C/EBPβ is an inducible transcription factor, similar to NF-κB, which has an acti-
vated regulatory pathway during OIS and controls the release of cytokines, such as IL-1β, 
IL-8, IL-6, GROα/CXCL1, and NAP2/CXCL7 [89]. C/EBP becomes phosphorylated within 
the presence of RasV12, which promotes the creation of homodimers, proceeding to fur-
ther alterations and interaction with p300/CBP (Figure 3). The latter complex causes se-
nescence and transcription of the SASP genes. C/EBPγ, on the other hand, decreases SASP 
genes expression in primary mouse fibroblasts through dimers formation with C/EBPβ. 
Elevated C/EBPγ has been linked to many human malignancies [94], whereas C/EBPβ is 
a requirement for senescence and can initiate it when upregulated [89]. 
7.1.3. p53 and GATA4 Regulatory Pathways 
A single pathway can potentially have distinct effects on different SASP factors. In 
particular, p53 stimulates the expression of some SASP factors while inhibiting the expres-
sion of others. In addition, it has the ability to inhibit p38MAPK, one of the key regulatory 
mechanisms involved in SASP formation [89]. Remarkably, the inhibitors of MDM2, 
which stop MDM2 from degrading p53 and thus stimulating p53 function, also decrease 
the expression of IL-6 and IL-1α [96]. This suggests that MDM2 inhibitors might be used 
as “senotherapy”, in addition to cancer treatment [97]. 
An additional key regulator of SASP is GATA4 (Figure 3), in which activation of ATM 
and ATR regulates GATA4, and this then stimulates IL-1α production and activates NF-
κB [89,98]. Together, these two processes, IL-1α expression and NF-κB activation, have a 
significant influence on SASP expression via the positive feedback loop [99] and as key 
SASP-directing transcription factors [89,93]. 
 
 
Figure 3. Main SASP regulatory pathways. SASP genes activation through the NF-κB transcription
factor as the main regulator, in addition to C/EBPβ, p53, and GATA4.
7.1.3. p53 and GATA4 Regulatory Pathways
A single pathway can potentially have distinct effects on different SASP factors. In
particular, p53 stimulates the expression of some SASP factors while inhibiting the expres-
sion of others. In addition, it has the ability to inhibit p38MAPK, one of the key regulatory
mechanisms involved in SASP formation [89]. Remarkably, the inhibitors of MDM2, which
stop MDM2 from degrading p53 and thus stimulating p53 function, also decrease the
expression of IL-6 and IL-1α [96]. This suggests that MDM2 inhibitors might be used as
“senotherapy”, in addition to cancer treatment [97].
An additional key regulator of SASP is GATA4 (Figure 3), in which activation of
ATM and ATR regulates GATA4, and this then stimulates IL-1α production and activates
NF-κB [89,98]. Together, these two processes, IL-1α expression and NF-κB activation, have
a signiﬁcant inﬂuence on SASP expression via the positive feedback loop [99] and as key
SASP-directing transcription factors [89,93].
7.2. Other SASP Regulatory Pathways
It is also known that epigenetic modiﬁcations, in the form of chromatin alterations, can
also control SASP with the loss of repressive H3K27me3, known as a modiﬁcation of the
DNA packaging protein Histone H3, which has been associated with the downexpression
of lamin B1 [100]. Other epigenetic alterations in senescent cells that enhance SASP include
the histone chaperone HIRA, which leads to histone H3.3 variation deposit, as well as
H4K16ac retention [89,101]. Acetylation of histones H3-K9 and H4-K16 has also been
linked to reduced activity of SIRT1, which can control gene expression via deacetylation
of various transcription factors or through silencing of chromatin scaffolds by histones
deacetylation. SIRT1 inhibits IL-8 and IL-6 expression by targeting their promoter zones
and deacetylating histones. SIRT1 translocates to sites of DNA damage as a response to
DDR signaling in senescent cells, enabling depletion of previously silenced IL-6 and IL-8
Cells 2023, 12, 915
12 of 42
genes, major SASP factors capable of promoting senescence in surrounding cells [102].
Chronic ATM activation leads to destruction of histone methyltransferases G9a and GLP
and deletion of macroH2A.1, which is a tumor suppressor histone variation, from SASP
chromatin, resulting in SASP gene derepression and induction [98].
By modifying chromatin architecture, high mobility group B2 (HMGB2) protein can
also affect gene transcription due to its selective binding to SASP loci and upregulation
in senescent cells, whereas its removal suppresses SASP gene expression [98]. A second
alarmins member is the HMGB1, which rises in the serum and falls in the nucleus through-
out aging and could also be a SASP regulator. Because it is produced extracellularly, it
interacts with toll-like receptor (TLR) and activates the TLR/NF-κB pathway, whereas loss
of nuclear HMG1B results in genetic instability and telomere impairment [89].
Alternatively, SASP can be induced through direct binding of bromodomain-containing
protein 4 (BRD4) located closely to the critical SASP genes [98]. In senescent H-Ras V12-
induced ﬁbroblasts, MLL1 knockdown reduces the expression of the IL-1β gene, IL-1α, The
knockdown of MLL1 decreases the production of certain factors, including IL-1α, IL-1β,
IL-6, IL-8, MMP1, and MMP3 in H-Ras V12-induced senescent ﬁbroblasts by inhibiting the
ATM-NF-κB pathway [103].
The nuclear long non-coding RNA MIR31HG and the long noncoding RNA SNHG29
are additional SASP regulators that independently control the production and secretion
of a subset of SASP elements during BRAF- and H2O2-induced senescence, respectively.
The intricacy of senescence and SASP regulation is illustrated by the lncRNA MIR31HG,
which, depending on its cellular localization, can both induce and delay senescence [104].
When MIR31HG interacts with polycomb repressor complexes, which are overexpressed
in different cancer types, it enhances the repression of p16/CDKN2A expression and
promotes its cytoplasmic translocation. Similarly, upregulation of lncRNA SNHG29 leads to
a premature birth condition (PTB) via activation of mTOR/p53/p21 signaling. Senescence
is promoted by SNHG29 overexpression, which also increases the production of SASPs,
such as IL-8 and TNF-α, which have been shown to play a crucial role in PTB [105].
Retrotransposable long-interspersed element-1 (L1; LINE-1) activity has lately been
revealed to be substantially active during replicative, oncogenic, and stress-induced pre-
mature senescence [106]. SIRT6 knockdown and aged animals both had enhanced L1
activity [107]. Transcription of L1 elements appears to occur in the presence of three regula-
tors, namely, retinoblastoma protein 1 (RB1), forkhead box A1 (FOXA1), and three prime
repair exonuclease 1 (TREX1), all of which show altered expression during senescence [106].
In contrast, the L1 promoter has been shown to be silenced by SIRT6. The cytosolic DNA
sensor cGAS is triggered by cytoplasmic accumulation of L1/cDNA, which is thought to
promote the innate immune response through type I interferon (IFN-I) responses [107].
While L1 activation along with the IFN-I response begins at a delayed stage after the
initiation of senescence, it contributes signiﬁcantly to the pro-inﬂammatory process and the
generation of fully developed SASP [106], together with other age-related diseases [107].
As previously stated, several SASP components, particularly those produced early
in SASP formation, such as IL-1α and IL-1β, promote and encourage continued SASP
growth and release. The ﬁrst one, IL-1β is expressed as a precursor in its mature stage [93],
which induces senescence through phosphorylation of p38 [81]. As for the second, IL-α,
it is activated as a mature precursor and obtained by cleavage of caspase 5 and caspase
11 [108]. It regulates the autocrine SASP signalling, promoting IL-6 and IL-8 production as
part of a positive feedback loop involving interleukin-1 receptor (IL-1R), IL-1R-associated
kinase (IRAK), NF-κB and C/EBPβ. IL-1α on the plasma membrane activates IL-1R [99]
and triggers a signaling cascade that degrades IRAK1 and IkBα to allow nuclear transition
of NF-κB [93,109]. IL-1α supports its own development through enhancing the level of
intracellular Ca2+, thereby increasing calpain activity and IL-1α cleavage into a more
mature form. Redox reaction can boost IL-1α expression even higher [93].
Apart from the positive feedback loop, senescent cells expressing high levels of SASP
also have a negative feedback loop. When IL-1α levels are signiﬁcantly elevated, the
Cells 2023, 12, 915
13 of 42
IL-1R pathway is activated, resulting in overexpression of miRNA-146a/b. The miRNA-
146a/b induces a decrease in IRAK1 protein levels, which leads to a decrease in NF-κB
activation and an underexpression of IL-6 and IL-8 genes, thus inhibiting excessive SASP
function [110].
8. Prosurvival Pathways—Resistance to Apoptosis
In order to prevent senescent cells from undergoing apoptosis, they implement pre-
vention mechanisms through activation of Bcl-2 family members (Bcl-2, Bcl-w, Bcl-xl, Bﬂ-1,
and Mcl-1) or the p53-p21-serpin and phosphoinositide 3-kinase (PI3K)/AKT pathways. In
addition, another way to resist apoptosis is through the ephrin-dependent receptor ligands
ephrin-B1 and ephrin-B3 and plasminogen activator inhibitor-1 (PAI-1) [62], along with
the hypoxia-inducible factor 1α (HIF-1α) and heat shock protein (HSP-90) pathways [111].
Yet, it is the cell type that determines which pro- apoptotic or anti-apoptotic protein is
expressed [62].
The cell type and the level of DNA damage determine which cell goes into senescence
and which goes into apoptosis, whereby p53 acts as a critical controller of this cellular
response. Human diploid ﬁbroblasts, for instance, exhibit partial senescence, as well
as apoptosis, when exposed to H2O2. In apoptosis, they produce two times more p53
than in senescence, in which p21 inhibits p53-mediated apoptosis. Doxorubicin treatment
produced two outcomes in SK-N-SH neuroblastoma and colorectal cancer cells: decreased
p21 expression and thus apoptosis due to high doses, versus increased p21 expression,
leading to senescence with low doses [57].
Other senescent cells with higher levels of Bax and Bcl-2, such as senescent epithelial
cells (HUVEC), show greater potential for apoptosis [112]. Proteins of the Bcl-2 family
have both pro-survival and pro-apoptotic actions. For example, the BH3 region of Bcl-2
family proteins is linked to apoptosis, and their single proteins can bind and block pro-
survival agents (Bcl-2, Bcl-w, Bcl-xL, Bﬂ-1, Mcl-1) or trigger additional death agonists (Bax,
Bak) [113].
A second theory proposes that BH3-only proteins block pro-survival compounds
only by hindering them from binding to and blocking Bax or Bak. At the same time,
p53 also promotes transcription of Bcl-2 genes or targets mitochondria on its own by
interacting at the protein level with Bax and Bak. There is a role for the Bcl-2 family in the
process of intrinsic apoptosis, mostly by modulating the permeability of the mitochondrial
membrane, enabling the release of apoptogenic substances into the intermembrane region
of the mitochondria. This activates Caspase-9, which then activates Caspases-3, -6 and -7,
which break down the protein targets and produce morphological changes that lead to
cellular death. Other proteins implicated in apoptosis are p73 and p63 [113].
Furthermore, the SERPIN family, SERPINB1, B4, B7, B9, and B13, was discovered to
be upregulated in regular senescent human bronchial epithelial cells. IMMP2L is inhibited
by SERPINB4, thus blocking the IMMP2L-AIF (apoptosis-inducing factor) pathway and
conferring resistance to ROS-related apoptosis [76].
9. Other Features and Biomarkers of Senescent Cells
With respect to the morphology of senescent cells, they are ﬂat, larger, and frequently
multinucleated [60], having organelles that change in shape, weight, and function. The
most widespread differences are an increased subcellular mass accompanied by func-
tional deﬁciency and impaired signaling produced by the secretion of their metabolites. A
possible reason for the elevated cell organelle count in senescent cells is a disruption of
proteostasis and homeostasis. Increased cellular granularity is observed in many senescent
cells, including lipofuscins in lysosomes, protein aggregations, secretory vesicles, and glyco-
gen accumulations, among their constituents. The increase in the number of membrane
organelles also increases lipogenesis. Sterol regulatory element-binding protein 1 (SREBP1),
which is abundant in senescent cells and can induce senescence when overexpressed, is an
excellent biomarker of the lipogenic state [77].
Cells 2023, 12, 915
14 of 42
Accumulation of undegradable macromolecules and intracellular organelles in au-
tophagic vacuoles increases cellular lysosomal content in senescent cells. As a consequence
of the overloaded lysosomal content, subsequent digestion of macromolecules, proteins,
organelles, and lipids is impaired, resulting in the formation of additional primary lyso-
somes. These lysosomes are likely to fuse with older lysosomes, resulting in an increase in
the amount of larger lysosomes in senescent cells [60,84]. In addition, lysosomes in aging
animals have a higher pH, despite the fact that digestion occurs in an acidic condition [74].
Senescence is a high-energy process requiring a constant supply of ATP. Due to the
increased mitochondrial content per cell, senescent cells have an altered mitochondrial
shape of a more complicated network, higher mitochondrial capacity, and increased respi-
ration [114]. In senescent cells, dysfunctional mitochondria are more abundant; they do not
synthesize ATP and instead generate higher levels of ROS. Their removal by autophagy
is therefore necessary, but it is compromised by dysfunctional lysosomes, leading to their
accumulation and high levels of ROS [74].
DNA, proteins, lipids, and enzymes, as well as other important molecular components,
are also damaged by oxidative stress in senescent cells, together with other chemical
alterations, such as glycation, oxidation, and cross-linking [60].
Senescent cells exhibit alterations in overall nuclear conformation, including the nucleolus,
nuclear lamina, nuclear matrix, and nuclear bodies, as well as general hypomethylation [60].
The senescence process may involve spatial redistribution of heterochromatin into
senescence-associated heterochromatin foci (SAHFs), the formation of which is promoted
by the nuclear lamin B1 (LMNB1) knockdown-associated redistribution of perinuclear
H3K9me3-positive heterochromatin, which can be prevented by efﬁcient ectopic expression
of LMNB1. In senescent cells, LMNB1 is largely reduced, while higher levels of binding
were reported in some gene-rich regions, where H3K27me3 is elevated, but gene expression
is suppressed [100]. Thus, alterations in the nuclear lamina may impact gene expression
along with nuclear morphology. Loss of the B1 lamina is independent of the p38 MAPK/NF-
κB, DDR, or ROS signaling pathways and can occur through activation of the p53 or
p16INK4 tumor suppression pathways. Additionally, it is thought to be the result of higher
mRNA instability induced by an unknown process [115]. The development of SAHFs is
not limited solely to the reduction of LMNB1. However, it is also promoted by the pRB
pathway, chromatin-associated non-histone proteins, and the histone chaperone HIRA and
Asf1a and DNMT1 [116]. In addition, the connection of nucleoporin TPR (translocated
promoter region, nuclear basket protein) with the nuclear pore complex in Ras-induced
senescence of IMR90 cells has been shown to be responsible for SAHF formation and
SAHF-associated SASP activation [117]. Speciﬁc antibodies can identify SAHF constituents
(heterochromatin redistributed into senescence-associated heterochromatin foci), such as
H3K9Me2, H3K9Me3, macroH2A, HP-1α, HP-1β, or HP-1γ, but SAHF can also be detected
with DAPI staining. Importantly, mouse cells do not generate strong SAHF.
Nuclear foci called DNA segments with chromatin alterations reinforcing senescence
(DNA-SCARS) form in senescent cells in response to DNA damage. Many proteins are
recruited to remodeled chromatin, including the modiﬁed histone γH2AX that is increased
in DNA-SCARS. DNA-SCARS are related to a variety of factors: promyelocytic leukemia
nuclear bodies (PML), absence of DNA repair proteins, lack of replication protein A (RPA)
and RAD51, absence of single-stranded DNA and DNA synthesis, and accumulation
of activated versions of the DDR mediators, Chk2 and p53. These phenomena occur
independently of p53, pRB, and other checkpoint and repair proteins, and they can be
sustained for hours in living cells and for days or weeks in ﬁxed cells. Although H2AX
is required for DNA-SCARS stability, its absence impairs DNA-SCARS and decreases
p53-dependent senescent growth arrest and IL-6 release. DNA SCARS can be found in
senescent cells, such as replicative, H2O2-induced, or oncogenic RAS-senescent cells, but
they are not restricted to senescent cells. Additionally, they can be found in proliferating
p53-deﬁcient cells that mimic premalignant lesions, as well as in tumor cells [118].
Cells 2023, 12, 915
15 of 42
For the identiﬁcation of DNA-SCARS, two assay methods can be used. In the ﬁrst
method, isolated cells are ﬁxed and marked for DNA damage foci and PML bodies, follow-
ing by an assessment of the amount and size of foci and co-localization of PML bodies. For
the second technique, the abundance and persistence of DNA damage foci is monitored
by observing the development and repair of DNA lesions in viable cells. This technique
involves the development and production of a ﬂuorescent fusion protein [60].
Other possible biomarkers for aging include lamin B1 loss [115], telomere stability,
alterations in nuclear envelope, oxidative stress and BRAF, sirtuin, p66SHC signaling, and
lipofuscin [60]. Lipofuscin is an oxidized protein, and it is related to lipid and metal
aggregation accumulating in the lysosomes of terminally-differentiated cells. Its presence
has been detected in senescent cells, where it is colocalized with SA-βGal and can be stained
with Sudan Black B. Importantly, since lipofuscin is not an enzyme, there is no need for a
fresh sample; formalin-ﬁxed tissue embedded in parafﬁn is suitable for use. This protein
emits autoﬂuorescence that can be revealed by ﬂuorescence microscopy, or it can be stained
with Nile Blue, Berlin Blue, Periodic Acid Schiff, and Ziehl-Neelsen [119].
α-Fucosidase, a lysosomal glycosidase that degrades glycoproteins, glycolipids, and
oligosaccharides, can be revealed by X-Fuc and is an additional marker present in senescent
cells independently of the type of stimuli, whether replicative, oncogenic, or TIS. It is
suggested that the expression of α-fucosidase and senescence are closely related [120].
Finally, senescent cells can present certain proteins on their cell surface, among them
the oxidative MDA modiﬁed vimentin, which was discovered to be present on the cell
membrane of senescent primary human ﬁbroblasts. Moreover, its increased secretion was
observed in the plasma of senescence-accelerated mouse prone 8 (SAMP8) mice, suggest-
ing that MDA-modiﬁed vimentin could potentially be used as a noninvasive senescence
biomarker [121]. Another senescence biomarker is the dipeptidyl peptidase 4 (DPP4), a
membrane-bound protein, which increases due to higher DPP4 gene transcription [122].
DPP4 is a protease that inactivates the gastrointestinal hormones incretins, particularly
glucose-dependent insulinotropic peptide (GIP) and glucagon-like peptide-1 (GLP1). This
impairs glucose homeostasis, which becomes weaker with age. In addition, it plays a role
in SASP formation by activating the NF-κB signaling pathway in aged lymphocytes [122].
10. Interventions to Control Senescence
Any safe strategies able to delay or bypass senescence can have interesting outcomes
in chronic disease prevention and may extend the healthy lifespan.
Metabolism is altered when cell age and the availability of nicotinamide adenine
dinucleotide (NAD+) declines in the elderly [123]. NAD+ precursor rejuvenates muscle,
neural, and melanocyte stem cells, preventing senescence in old mice through improvement
of mitochondrial function [124]. Twelve-month old C57BL/6N wild-type mice treated orally
with nicotinamide mononucleotide (NMN), a major NAD+ precursor, showed attenuation
of age-related diseases with minimal side effects. Strikingly, NMN improved insulin
sensitivity, blood lipid levels, ocular performance, lacrimation, and bone mineral density,
and it reduced age-related weight gain [123]. NMN therapy has also been associated with
an improved blood ﬂow and endurance in older animals through promotion of sirtuin
deacetylase SIRT1-mediated induction of capillary density, a result that is enhanced by
exercise [125]. The potential of NMN for anti-ageing therapeutic strategy to delay chronic
diseases by delaying senescence needs to be further explored in humans, although a single
oral supplementation of NMN was shown to be safe, as it did not reveal signiﬁcant clinical
symptoms or alterations in health in men [126]. Interestingly, a mitochondria-targeted
transmitter hydrogen-sulﬁde (H2S) was reported to delay endothelium senescence [127]
and might have a general function of anti-vascular ageing playing a role via the regulation
of endothelial NAD+ levels [125]
The effect of ketogenic diet [128,129], intermittent fasting [130], or exercise [131]
on healthspan extension through metabolic regulation has been well documented, and
ketogenesis-generated body beta-hydroxybutyrate has been recently revealed as a key
Cells 2023, 12, 915
16 of 42
player. This metabolite is described to be involved in the inhibition of vascular cell senes-
cence [132], anti-inﬂammation [133], and immune activation by the formation and mainte-
nance of CD8+ memory T cells [134]. More interestingly, beta-hydroxybutyrate prevents
vascular senescence through hnrnpa1-mediated upregulation of Oct4 [132], the central
player in reprogramming process towards pluripotency.
Additionally, fundamental studies showed that in vitro reprogramming was able to
dedifferentiate adult cells with a cocktail of four reprogramming factors, Oct4, Sox2, c-Myc,
and Klf4 (OSKM), except on senescent cells and with very low efﬁciency on cells from
aged or progeric donors. We showed that an optimized reprogramming combination of six
factors was able to convert, efﬁciently, many types of senescent cells and aged cells from
extremely old people (centenarians) into pluripotent stem cells erasing the hallmarks of
senescence and cellular aging, leading to a rejuvenated physiology and a reset proliferative
capacity due to telomere lengthening through telomerase reactivation [135]. Interestingly,
telomerase activation experiments were developed in a mouse model to bypass or escape
RS patterns. Several separate investigations have shown that telomerase expression via
genetic modiﬁcation, virus administration, or chemical stimulation can greatly reduce age-
related pathologies. As telomerase-based anti-aging methods, a telomerase activator and a
telomerase gene therapy to avoid and decrease cellular senescence have been created. They
have resulted in improved tissue regeneration and increased longevity without increasing
cancer [136,137]. In recent years, the use of a high-capacity cytomegalovirus (CMV) vector
as an intranasal and injectable gene therapy system to extend life has been shown to be
an efﬁcient and safe means of gene transfer for telomerase reverse transcriptase (TERT)
protective factor. This therapy, in particular, increased glucose metabolism and muscular
effectiveness while avoiding body mass reduction and baldness [138].
Similarly, transient reprogramming experiments in vitro and in vivo allowed us to
improve cell physiology without dedifferentiation process and to increase longevity in mice
by preventing senescence progression [139,140], even after a single transient reprogram-
ming and applied early in life [141,142]. Cell reprogramming is consequently an additional
suitable strategy to delay senescence.
11. Manipulating Secretion of Senescent Cell by Senomorphic Strategies
Extensive irreparable cell damage triggers a cell cycle arrest called cellular senescence.
One of the most notable features of senescence is that senescent cells activate complex
paracrine reactions deﬁned as the SASP, in which they secrete many cytokines, chemokines,
proteases, growth factors, and extracellular matrix remodeling factors. Factors secreted
through senescent cells can play different roles upon the physiological setting.
11.1. Preventing the Expression and Secretion of the SASP
Reducing the harmful impacts of secretion from senescent cells without compromising
their cycle arrest, as these processes are known to be independent of each other [143],
revealed also interesting outcomes when eliminating senescent cells do not appear to be an
effective technique.
Senescent cells display a strong proinﬂammatory secretion proﬁle, which is widely
consistent across various stages of senescence and biological sources [31,144–146]. SASP
supports non-cell autonomous tumor suppression through cell cycle arrest of lesioned and
malignant cells and by attracting immune cells to their destruction.
The speciﬁc secretome of senescent cells includes growth factors, pro-inﬂammatory
cytokines, chemokines, and matrix remodeling metalloproteases, with a broad array of
autocrine and paracrine impacts. Some of these factors are essential for resolving tissue
damage, especially by immune activation and the support of growth arrest and differen-
tiation [147,148], while others, notably the ones released for cellular growth, migration,
and invasion, can be detrimental in disruption of tissue homeostasis and age-associated
diseases formation [88] and cancer [149–151].
Cells 2023, 12, 915
17 of 42
This complex secretome is directed by the activation of multiple signaling path-
ways, such as mitogen-activated protein kinase (MAPK) signaling, mammalian target
of rapamycin (mTOR), GATA4/p62 intermediated autophagy, and the phosphoinositide
3 kinase (PI3K) pathways [152]. All of these cascades converge on the stimulation of
NF-κB and C/EBPβ pathways, orchestrating the dynamics of the complex SASP secre-
tome [144,146,153–155]. This huge variety of possible targets responsible for regulating
the cascades, leading to the senescence associated secretory phenotype, incited the cre-
ation of different molecules and antibodies to interact either with NF-κB and C/EBPβ
transcriptional activities at different levels [144,146,153–155], or with speciﬁc components
of SASP to mitigate the deleterious effects of SASP. There is a compendium of available
inhibitors with the ability to attenuate SASP effects in vivo and perhaps minimize the
negative consequences of senescent cells.
Metformin, a type 2 diabetes treatment, inhibits NF-κB migration to the nucleus,
limiting its expression levels [156]. Metformin reduces inﬂammatory reactions in mouse
models, ameliorates several age-associated diseases, and increases longevity [157]. In
addition to the consequences of metformin on diabetic patients, investigations for the
impact of metformin on aging among humans are ongoing [158,159]. The TAME trial
involves 3000 patients with at least one age-related disease, being aged 65–79 years, and
will quantify a composite outcome that comprises cardiovascular events, cancer incidence,
dementia, functional geriatric endpoints, and, ﬁnally, mortality. This trial represents the
ﬁrst case of intent to treat aging as a disease. It might pave the way for a revolution
in the management of elderly subjects, with preventive medicine able to postpone age
related pathologies development instead of curative medicine treating each disorder as an
individual entity.
Additionally, the serine/threonine kinase mTOR is also upstream regulator of NF-κB,
making speciﬁc inhibitors, such as rapamycin and it analogs, interesting targets to dampen
senescence secretome indirectly by reducing NF-κB-transcriptional activity. Indeed, mTORs
control the expression of the membrane-bound IL-1α. In human ﬁbroblasts and breast cells,
there are neutralizing antibodies against either IL-1α or its receptor, which are sufﬁcient to
reduce NF-κB activity [99]. Inhibition of mTOR by rapamycin and rapalogs can prevent
SASP by lowering the expression of membrane bound IL-1α [109], thus lowering the
transcriptional level of NF-κB [109]. Indeed, IL-1α/IL-1 receptor signal transduction is
upstream of NF-κB, and utilising neutralizing antibodies against either IL-1 or its receptor
is enough to suppress NF-κB enzymatic activity [99].
Recently discovered mTOR inhibitors containing everolimus, ridaforolimus, and tem-
sirolimus are under investigations to evaluate their pharmacological characteristics that
might target harmful secreted products from senescent cells [160,161]. mTOR is also in-
volved in various cellular activities interacting with the MAPK pathway that promotes
MAPKAPK2 translation [162], eventually leading to the activation of NF-κB and its translo-
cation to the nucleus. Additionally, rapamycin prohibits senescent mouse ﬁbroblasts [163]
and suppresses MAPKAPK2 translation, causing degradation of secreted factors, including
IL-1α and IL-8 [162]. Rapamycin also decreased the transcription level of IL-6, IL-1β, and
VCAM-1 and inhibited the STAT3 pathway in lung WI-38 ﬁbroblasts [164]. In addition,
inhibitors acting on the MAPK pathway members were also identiﬁed as SASP modulators.
In human senescent cells, the levels of mRNA and SASP factors released were reduced by
the p38MAPK inhibitor SB203580, which decreased the transcriptional activity of NF-κB
and the paracrine effect of factors secreted from these cells [165]. Likewise, IL-6 expression
in human senescent ﬁbroblasts is inhibited by next-generation p38MAPK inhibitors UR-
13756 and BIRB 796. Additionally, senescent cells treated with the MAPKAPK2 inhibitors
PF-3644022 and MK2.III have a reduced secretion phenotype [166].
Inhibition of JAK/STAT signaling by ruxolitinib is able to repress C/EBPβ transcrip-
tional activity, reducing systemic inﬂammation and ameliorating ﬁtness in old mice [92,167].
Other than the above-mentioned techniques, additional cellular senescence features
can be used to create new therapeutics, markers, or diagnostic strategies. Senescent cells
Cells 2023, 12, 915
18 of 42
and associated secreted factors induce the release of important extracellular vesicles and
exosomes, which contains different lipids, proteins, and microRNAs, thus reacting with
the surrounding tissue and exerting signiﬁcant effects on the immune regulation [168–170].
The exosomes released by the senescent secretome induce pro-tumorigenic roles mainly by
stimulating extracellular vesicle-associated EphA2 binding to Ephrin-A1, thus promoting
cancer cell proliferation [171]. Immune checkpoint ligands, such as B7-H3 protein, were
found to be present in exosomes discharged by senescent cancer cells. It is, therefore,
hypothesized that the detection and manipulation of extracellular vesicles secreted by aged
cells can be applied in immunological therapeutic methodologies.
An additional strategy to control the secretion from senescent cells and the resulting
immunologic response can be achieved by the regulation of cGAS-cGAMP-STING sig-
naling pathway, a component of the innate immune system. Additionally, this pathway
detects cytosolic chromatin fragments following DNA damage in senescent cells, stimu-
lates type I interferons and further cytokines, and interferes with the auto-inﬂammatory
diseases [172]. Deﬁciency of cGAS and STING in mice is correlated with a reduction in
tissue inﬂammation following ionizing irradiation and an impaired immuno-surveillance
of RAS oncogenes. Moreover, this pathway is triggered in human malignant cells and
induces pro-inﬂammatory gene expression [172].
11.2. Targeting SASP Factors
While limiting inﬂammation is a potentially effective strategy to decrease senescent
cells, non-cell autonomous effects, as well as therapy with anti-inﬂammatory medications,
have the potential to create a wide range of negative effects [173]. These situations may
preclude a protracted therapy regimen, which is required to maintain their favorable effects.
The way to address this issue may be to tackle certain SASP elements, which may also
give a better strategy to attenuate SASP’s negative impacts. Cytokines, which are well
known constituents of SASP and include IL-6, IL-8, and matrix-remodeling proteases,
might be potential targets. The use of neutralizing antibodies, which may be created
using a variety of commonly produced monoclonal antibodies, is an appealing technique
for blocking these compounds. Targeting IL-6 or its receptor, for example, might be
accomplished using medications such as siltuximab or tocilizumab, which inhibit the
cytokine or the receptor, respectively [174–176]. However, these compounds were not
designed to be utilized in the setting of cellular senescence, and their consequences on
SASP and aging must be investigated more before they may be used therapeutically as
senescence regulators. Plasminogen activator inhibitor-1 (PAI-1), also called SERPINE1,
is a key component of the SASP and a direct mediator of cellular senescence. In murine
models of accelerated aging and, recently, in humans from an Amish community, genetic
deﬁciency has been identiﬁed that protects against aging-like pathology and extends life
span [177,178]. Targeted inhibition of PAI-1 with TM5441 showed similar activity in mice
models, and a clinical trial with this molecule is ongoing to evaluate its effect on aging
diseases by Dr. Toshio Miyata at Tohoku University in Japan.
12. Converting Senescent Cells into Apoptotic Cell by “Senolytics”
Senescent cells are similar to a double edge sword, with beneficial and detrimental effects.
Indeed, senescent cell secretions can prevent pre-malignant cells spreading and thus
hinder tumorigenesis [179]. In other contexts, cell senescence encourages tissue repair and
renewal [25,46]. Senescent cells may also inﬂuence morphogenesis accurately during em-
bryo developmental phases in a damage-independent way [42,43]. Furthermore, aged cells
can evoke organ restoration through self-elimination and recruiting immune phagocytic
cells and mobilizing nearby progenitor cells.
Conversely, there are considerable negative effects of senescence; senescence can cause
continuous damage to tissues and lead to a persistent pro-inﬂammatory microenviron-
ment, which consequently leads to a variety of pathological conditions. Indeed, cellular
senescence promotes a huge variety of age-related pathologies, such as cancer, obesity, type
Cells 2023, 12, 915
19 of 42
2 diabetes, cardiovascular diseases, ﬁbrosis, osteoarthritis, osteoporosis, sarcopenia, and
neurological problems [4,5].
Due to the lack of a common aging hallmarks, senescent cells can be detected by search-
ing for a range of biomarkers, which includes the upregulation of different cycle inhibitors,
the exclusion of proliferative markers, the creation of particular heterochromatin domains,
such as senescence-associated heterochromatin foci, and even a persistent activation of the
DNA damage response. Because no gold standard exists to detect senescent cells, increased
lysosomal SA-βGal continues to be one of the most useful indicators for cellular senescence,
despite its absence of causal role in senescence process [180]. Cell cycle inhibitor p16 is
an important marker of senescent cells and genetic ablation of p16 from aged/senescent
cells in old or progeroid mouse models can improve cataracts, sarcopenia, cardiomyocyte,
cancer development, renal glomerulosclerosis, osteoarthritis, atherosclerosis, hypertrophy,
tumorigenesis, adipose atrophy, and tau-based disorder [6,10,14–16,78], thus increasing
animal lifespan [15,16].
Consequently, the major challenge to translating these recent ﬁnding into safe and
efﬁcient senotherapies lies in suppressing the negative aspects of cellular senescence while
eventually enhancing the positive ones, taking into account the potentially negative reper-
cussions of removing senescent cells.
12.1. Senescence-Associated β-Galactosidase Activity to Target Senescent Cells
Increased lysosomal SA-βGal continues to be one of the most useful markers of
cellular aging [38], and its activity was envisaged to be used to kill senescent cells. A
targeted delivery system employing mesoporous silica nanoparticles covered with galacto-
oligosaccharides was created based on the ability of SA-βGal to enzymatically digest
galactose preferentially in senescent cells, leading to the release of cytotoxic drugs content
of the particles [181]. Nevertheless, it is recognized that some other cells within the human
body, such as macrophages, exhibit high β-galactosidase activity under certain condi-
tions [182], therefore elevated β-galactosidase activity is not absolutely speciﬁc of senescent
cells. Strikingly, another senescence associated lysosomal alpha–Fucosidase (SA-alpha-Fuc),
was not further generalized to detect senescent cells, whereas it has been described as a
more robust senescence marker than SAβ-Gal. It might be used for nanoparticule engineer-
ing as an optimized option [183]. Another option to increase selectivity might be to tether
the nanoparticles to antibodies against identiﬁed senescent surface markers [184]. Senolytic
methods relying on SAβ-gal activity have not yet been evaluated in vivo, and additional
research is needed to assess the efﬁcacy of such therapies. Combining senotherapies, such
as mTOR inhibitors with other senescence-modulating drugs, can allow reduction of drug
dose and their off-target effects [185]. Additionally, the direct intake can precisely attack
the senescent tissues or organs while reducing the exposure of unaffected ones.
Another method for pathway-based senolytic development was using high throughput
approaches involving modulations of SA-βGal activity as a primary readout. This caused
the discovery of HSP90 proteins, a family of ubiquitously expressed molecular chaperones,
as a novel class of targets [186]. They can stimulate cellular survival through AKT or ERK
maintenance [187,188], members of signaling pathways upregulated in ageing [189,190].
The anti-apoptotic PI3K/AKT pathway is downregulated by HSP90 inhibitors, reducing
senescence indicators in different cell lines. A HSP90 inhibitor, 17-DMAG, has been clini-
cally tested in a variety of solid tumors and lymphomas, and it decreased the expression
level of p16. In vivo, administration of the inhibitor 17-DMAG to progeria mouse model
reduced the senescence signature, postponed multiple age-associated clinical signs, and
extended health span [186,191]. Similarly, the ATM pathway, a member of the DNA dam-
age response signaling, activated in senescence also regulate SA-βGal activity senescence
by controlling lysosomal acidiﬁcation. KU-60019, an inhibitor of ATM, was discovered
as a powerful anti-senescence factor [74]. ATM-treating senescent ﬁbroblasts with KU-
60019 reduced SA-βGal activity, cleared damaged mitochondria, and reprogrammed their
metabolism. Moreover, KU-60019 improved epidermal wound healing, and the blockage
Cells 2023, 12, 915
20 of 42
of ATM function also reduced senescence; thus, KU-60019 is thought to be a viable target
for treating age-associated pathologies [74].
Metabolic reprogramming is essential for senescent cells to adapt them to the elevated
energy needs of the senescent cycle, involving proteotoxic stress due to massive secretion
from senescent cells, increased oxidative stress leading to misfolded or harmful proteins,
and expanded endoplasmic reticulum stress [192]. Consequently, metabolically targeted
drugs might also be promising, but it remains to be seen whether these medications can
attain adequate selectivity between senescent and non-senescent cells.
12.2. Inhibiting Pro-Survival Pathways with Senolytics
Due to the fact that senescence and apoptosis have been considered as alternate cellular
fates in the presence of injury and stress, pro-apoptotic cellular alterations are frequently ac-
tively anti-senescent, whereas senescent cells are extremely resistive to apoptosis. Multiple
senescent molecular pathways substantially contribute to improved survival [57,193].
The best known pro-survival pathways are BCL-2 proteins family, as well as the p53
and PI3K/AKT pathways. Targeting these pathways can be exploited to remove senescent
cells from damaged or aged tissues [57,193].
p53, the most commonly mutated cancer tumor suppressor gene, is a central com-
ponent of the senescence program [194]. p53 is stabilized and accumulates in response
to DNA damage [22,195,196], and the p53/p21 prosurvival pathway is a decision point
between transient cell cycle arrest, senescence, and apoptosis [194]. Consequently p53/p21
axis was investigated as a potential target for development of senolytics [197,198]. FOXO4
transcription factors that favor cell cycle arrest and senescence was described to interact
with p53 preventing p53-induced apoptosis [199]. Interfering in p53’s direct interaction
with the transcription factor FOXO4 leads to the release of p53 from the nucleus and induc-
tion of cell-intrinsic apoptosis. Thus, a D-retro-inverso peptomimetic of FOXO4 interfering
with the interaction FOXO4/p53 was designed to restore in vitro p53-induced apoptosis
in human senescent ﬁbroblasts [198]. In aged mice, the FOXO peptomimetic neutralized
doxorubicin-mediated senescence and chemotoxicity, limiting hepatotoxicity and restor-
ing lost weight and renal capacity in progeroid and naturally aged mice [79,198]. The
FOXO4 peptide’s senolytic action is promising, but also other peptides or peptide-mimetic
compounds might form the foundation for future senolytic medication discovery.
The BCL-2 proteins are recognized for their regulatory effect in programmed cell
death, and they are frequently dysregulated in cancer, as well as in diverse autoimmune
and degenerative diseases [200]. A speciﬁc inhibitor of BCL-2, BCL-xL, and BCL-W is
Navitoclax (previously known as ABT-263). Navitoclax selectively induces apoptosis in ei-
ther replicative, oncogene-induced, or irradiated senescence triggered in various cell types
(human umbilical vein epithelial, human lung ﬁbroblasts and mouse embryonic ﬁbroblasts),
but surprisingly not in primary human pre-adipocytes [201]. A study in irradiated mice
revealed that Navitoclax depletes senescent cells and rejuvenates bone marrow and muscle
hematopoietic stem cells and thus reduces early aging of the hematopoietic system [13]. In
addition, Navitoclax diminished the secretion of many factors from senescent murine lungs,
such as p16INK4A and TNFα, and it also lowered the risk of post-traumatic osteoarthritis
by selectively eliminating senescent cells from the articular cartilage and synovial mem-
brane [10]. There was also an amelioration of age-associated symptoms in a study focused
on senescent osteoblast progenitors [202]. This drug also reduced secretion from senescent
cells in aged mice, attenuating osteoclastogenesis in bone marrow stromal cell culture [202].
A structural relative of Navitoclax, ABT-737, was tested, in the presence of MEFs and IMR
90 human fetal lung ﬁbroblasts characterized by the high expression of BCL-2, BCL-W,
and BCL-xL anti-apoptotic proteins, following various senescence-promoting stimuli [12].
ABT-737 cleared senescent cells from the lungs and the epidermis of irradiated mice and
improved proliferation of hair follicle stem cells. Despite their great outcome, Navitoclax
and ABT-737 are considered dangerous due to their toxic effect on neutrophils and platelets,
which could restrict their clinical advancement [203]. Nevertheless, second-generation
Cells 2023, 12, 915
21 of 42
inhibitors against BCL-xL, A1331852, and A1155463 promoted a targeted apoptosis of aged
HUVEC, as well as IMR90 cells, while again sparing senescent human pre-adipocytes [204].
Since human pre-adipocytes appear impervious to BCL2 inhibitors, there is likely a hetero-
geneity in the intrinsic cellular senescence pathways [201]. Further, the third generation of
senolytics targeting the BCL-2 family is focused on the BH4 domain, which is found on all
the pro-survival family members (BCL-2, BCL-xL, BCL-W, MCL-1, and BFL-1) and which
is essential for their anti-apoptotic action [205].
Another typical pro-survival factor that senescent cells depend on is the Myeloid
Cell Leukemia 1 (Mcl-1). Because Mcl-1 is the most overexpressed anti-apoptotic gene in
senescent cancer cells, including Bcl-2-negative senescent tumor cells, pharmacologically
suppressing Mcl-1 can ultimately eradicate senescent prostate cancer cells, preventing the
spread of the tumor and metastases. Mcl-1 inhibitors are considered an extremely potent
class of senolytics. While Navitoclax minimizes the occurrence of metastasis in vivo, S63845,
a Mcl-1 inhibitor, completely eradicates both senescent tumor cells and metastasis [206].
Recently, it was found that chimeric antigen receptor (CAR) T cells could have a poten-
tial senolytic effect by targeting senescent cells and killing them by induction of apoptosis
via the extrinsic pathway. Induction of apoptosis has been shown to be induced after
association of CAR T cells with Bcl-2 family inhibitors, such as ABT-737 [207]. Senescent
cells strongly express the urokinase-type plasminogen activator receptor (uPAR) on their
surface, which is subsequently detected by uPAR-speciﬁc CAR T cells, inducing senescent
cell elimination in vitro and in vivo. Targeting uPAR by CAR T cells increased the longevity
of mice with lung adenocarcinoma and improved liver ﬁbrosis conditions in mice [208].
12.3. Combination of Senolytics with Chemotherapeutic Agents
Other molecules with potential senolytic activities were identiﬁed because they im-
prove the outcome of chemotherapy (inducing senescence) in various cancer models. This is
also the case of the BCL-xL speciﬁc inhibitors, A1331852 and A1155463, which improve the
outcome of chemotherapy (inducing senescence) in mouse models of ovarian cancer, breast
cancer, and non-small-cell lung cancer without risking the cytotoxic chemotherapy-induced
neutropenia seen with Navitoclax [209]. Piperlongumine, a natural senolytic agent isolated
from trees of the genus Piper, was initially found to inhibit tumour growth in a xenograft
mouse model of tumor. Piperlongumine induces apoptosis in senescent cells triggered by
oncogenes, radioactive ionization, or exhaustive replication [210]. Similarly, Panobinostat,
a histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor, has a senolytic effect in non-small cell lung cancer
and in head and neck squamous cell carcinoma cell lines that had already been treated with
Cisplatin or Taxol cytotoxins [211]. Panobinostat increases the activity of caspase-3 and -7
and reduces the expression of Bcl-xL in chemotherapy stimulated senescent cells. More
recently, a group of senolytic compounds, which are cardiovascular glycosides, targeting
cellular membrane Na+/K+-ATPase pumps, were described to render senescent cells more
susceptible to apoptosis due to a resulting electrochemical gradient imbalance. These
complexes were effective ex vivo in pre-neoplastic senescent cells and in vivo in cases of
lung ﬁbrosis, treatment-triggered senescence, and old wild type mice [212,213].
An effective combination for clearing out senescent cells both in vitro and in vivo is
the coupling of Dasatinib and Quercetin. Dasatinib is a tyrosine kinase inhibitor blocking
the SRC, c-KIT, ephrin receptors, and different kinases. Quercetin is a ﬂavonoid that targets
various kinases and receptors and blocks the PI3K-AKT pathway. This drug duo is effective
on many different kinds of senescent cells [11,214]. Indeed, Dasatinib plus Quercetin
(D+Q) ameliorated cardiovascular capacity and reduced p16 and senescence-associated
b-galactosidase expression in limb-irradiated aged mice [214]. Frequent administration
of D+Q in progeroid mice increased survival by slowing down age-associated symptoms
and diseases. The drug duo also reduced physical disorders in naturally aged mice and in
senescent preadipocyte-transplanted mice. D+Q reduced senescent cell counts and pro-
inﬂammatory cytokine secretion in human fat tissue taken from obese people [215]. It is also
believed that cellular senescence leads to idiopathic pulmonary ﬁbrosis and D+Q reduced
Cells 2023, 12, 915
22 of 42
senescence and ﬁbrosis in primary alveolar epithelial type II cells taken from ﬁbrotic mouse
lungs [216,217]. Furthermore, this drug mixture destroyed senescent cells and improved
ﬁbrotic lung disorder in a bleomycin-damage mouse model [7]. D+Q also cleared senescent
cells from blood vessels, thus improving the vascular environment related to age-associated
vascular diseases [11]. Aortic plaques were also reduced in a hyper-cholesterolaemic mouse
model of atherosclerosis chronically treated with this combination. A study also revealed
that D+Q not only decreases cellular senescence, but also necroptosis in Sod1 knockout
mice by reducing the availability of senescent cells that secrete SASP factors, such as TNF-α,
thereby lowering the level of inﬂammation and retarding the development of numerous
age-related diseases and aging [218]. In conclusion, D+Q are highly compatible senolytic
drugs, which have been widely veriﬁed in clinical trials of various age-related diseases.
Nevertheless, cellular senescence has been found to have a detrimental role during
liver transplantation, with opposing DCR2 functions in cholangiocytes and hepatocytes.
Intriguingly, Ferreira-Gonzalez et al. demonstrated in 2022 that constant infusion of a
D+Q combination of senolytics attenuated cold-induced biliary injury, hindered liver
degradation, and improved overall liver preservation, making senolytics an effective
strategy for pre-liver transplantation [219].
Additionally, a range of ﬂavonoid polyphenols other than quercetin have been investi-
gated for their senolytic effects. Fisetin reduced senescence signatures in various tissues
in both progeric and physiologically aged mice, and treatment of normally aged mice
with ﬁsetin recovered tissue homeostasis, lowered age-related impairment, and increased
longevity [220]. Prospective therapeutic results are needed for a ﬁrst proof-of-concept of
combination drugs.
12.4. PCC1, a New Type of Phytochemical Senolytic
Many fruits and vegetables contain ubiquitous phenolic compounds, known for
their antioxidant and anti-free radical activity and therefore used in recent years as anti-
carcinogenic, anti-inﬂammatory, anti-viral, and anti-bacterial pharmaceutical drugs. These
compounds are made up of ﬂavan-3-ols chains, catechin and epicatechin, connected with
each other via C4–C6 and C4–C8 inter-ﬂavonoid bonds, with gallate esters [221]. Grape
seed extracts (GSE) contains an important polyphenolic component, the ﬂavonoid pro-
cyanidin (PCC1), which, due to its senotherapeutic activity, is able to eliminate senescent
cells and ameliorate age related pathologies. At low concentrations, this B-type trimeric
epicatechin showed an inhibition of SASP factors secretion, while it displayed a deteriora-
tion of senescent cells at higher doses by its apoptotic activity. Previous studies revealed
that PCC1 can reduce oxidative damage, suppress inﬂammation, and induce apoptosis in
tumor cells. It acts by downregulating senescent-2 while upregulating BAX and activating
caspases 3 and 9 and thus releases cytochrome c and disrupts the mitochondrial membrane,
which protects from cancer by initiating apoptosis. Senotherapeutic activity of PCC1 has
been proven on different cells undergoing senescence through either replicative senescence,
oncogene induced senescence (HRASG12V), or stress-induced senescence following a prede-
termined starting dose of 50 µM, which selectively kills senescent cells without affecting
non-senescent cells [222].
PCC1 was also found to eliminate p16-positive senescent cells as effectively as ABT-263,
in addition to its ability to increase tumor suppression, inhibit resistance to chemotherapy,
and ameliorate physical dysfunction. Both D+Q combination and PCC1 can eliminate all
three types of senescent cells, but only PCC1 has no toxic effect on proliferating cells. This is
in addition to a high speciﬁcity and efﬁciency against senescent cells compared to ABT-263,
dasatinib, quercetin, and ﬁsetin [222].
12.5. Senolysis Effect by Targeting CRYAB with 25-Hydroxycholesterol
Because senolytics are known to eliminate senescent cells in vivo by targeting genes
responsible for senescence survival, many pharmaceutical studies have focused on ﬁnding
these genes and have discovered CRYAB, an important senescence-related gene and a
Cells 2023, 12, 915
23 of 42
potential senolysis target, through single-cell RNA sequencing. 25-Hydroxycholesterol
(25-HC), an endogenous metabolite of cholesterol, has been classiﬁed as a senolytic due
to its ability to disrupt CRYAB and thus ﬁght age-related pathologies induced by cellular
senescence through targeting and eliminating senescent cells in both human and mice
tissues [223]. 25-HC is an oxysterol acting in cholesterol homeostasis, increasing inﬂam-
matory reaction and having anti-viral activity, but it also plays a role in the pathogenesis
of neurodegenerative diseases and atherosclerosis [224,225]. 25-HC was also demon-
strated to suppress autophagy dysfunction through the mTOR/STING pathway in PC12
cells [224] and to prevent SASRS-COV-2 from replicating through membrane cholesterol
depletion. It also blocks the secretion of SASP factors and, in particular, IL-6 in skeletal
muscles [223]. Other oxysterols, such as 24-HC and 27-HC, should be examined for their
possible senolysis activity.
However, as the action of each senolytic can be restricted when senescence is triggered
in various ways, senolytic drugs are unique to a given therapy. The senolytic effects of
certain drugs, such as GT, ABT263, and the Akt inhibitor MK2206, upon the induction
of cellular senescence in androgen-sensitive prostate cancer (PCa) LNCaP cells, were
demonstrated by Pungsrinont et al. in 2020 to be different [226]. In androgen receptor (AR)
agonist-induced cellular senescent cells, the pro-survival signaling is more active than in
an AR antagonist. Additionally, depending on the type of AR ligand, treatment with GT or
MK2206 displayed varied senolytic actions, but ABT263 lacked senolytic potential.
13. Immune System Mediated Interventions to Clear Senescent Cell
13.1. Immunosurveillance of Senescent Cells
Senescent cells are frequently removed by the immune system as part of a complicated
mechanism that involves both the innate and adaptive immune systems (Figure 4). As a
result, numerous immune cell types, including macrophages, neutrophils, natural killer
cells (NK), and CD4+ T cells, are involved in the evacuation of senescent cells. How-
ever, the precise processes permitting is still elusive. SASP chemokines and cytokines
are thought to function as chemo-attractants for NK and several immune cells [227,228].
Furthermore, senescent cells highly express adhesion molecules, including intracellular
adhesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1), vascular cell adhesion molecule-1 (VCAM-1), and selectins,
which may have a role in senescent cell removal [228,229].
Ligands of the activating NK cell receptors, group 2 (NKG2D), one of which is MHC
class I polypeptide-related sequence A (MICA) and the other second being UL16 binding
protein 2 (ULBP2), are increased and displayed on the cellular membrane in conditions of
DNA damage, as well as oncogene-induced or replicative senescence. This enables NK
cells to recognize and eliminate speciﬁc targets. DDR promotes the production of ULBP2,
whereas ERK may inﬂuence MICA and ULBP2 levels via promoting mRNA stability by
decreasing the expression miRNA activity. Because NKG2D receptors are found on a
fraction of T-cells, immunosurveillance may be a mutual role of NK and T-cells. The
abundance of NKG2D receptors on NK cells does not vary with age, although NK activity
is known to decline [228]. Furthermore, the membrane-bound malondialdehyde (MDA)-
vimentin might be an additional age-related cell speciﬁc element identiﬁed by innate
immunity in a senescent cell removal process that progressively weakened with age [121].
It is not yet known why senescent cells build up within life, but the immune system
plays a major function in the elimination of aged cells, and the increase in senescent
cells in tissues is a consequence of the age-dependent decline of the immune system. It
was discovered that senescent dermal ﬁbroblasts contain the non-classical MHC class 1b
molecule (HLA-E), which interferes with the inhibitory receptor NKG2A expressing NK and
CD8+ cells, which in turn decreases the clearance of senescent cells. The expression of HLA-
E is increased in senescent cells coming from elderly skin. The expression of SASP-derived
proinﬂammatory cytokines, especially IL-6, is controlled by p38 MAP kinase signaling.
Similarly, NKG2A activation of CD8+ T cells rises during aging. Alternatively, the number
of NKG2A+ NK may decline as people age, yet their expression is generally high, explaining
Cells 2023, 12, 915
24 of 42
why NKG2A blockage has a more signiﬁcant impact on NK than on CD8+ cells. If both
NKG2D and NKG2A are expressed, the documented NKG2D-dependent elimination of
senescent cells may be compromised. In vitro inhibition of the NKG2A/HLA-E connection
improves the immunological reaction to senescent cells. As a result, it is hypothesized that
this pathway contributes to the buildup of senescent cells throughout aging [227].
13. Immune System Mediated Interventions to Clear Senescent Cell 
13.1. Immunosurveillance of Senescent Cells 
Senescent cells are frequently removed by the immune system as part of a compli-
cated mechanism that involves both the innate and adaptive immune systems (Figure 4). 
As a result, numerous immune cell types, including macrophages, neutrophils, natural 
killer cells (NK), and CD4+ T cells, are involved in the evacuation of senescent cells. How-
ever, the precise processes permitting is still elusive. SASP chemokines and cytokines are 
thought to function as chemo-attractants for NK and several immune cells [227,228]. Fur-
thermore, senescent cells highly express adhesion molecules, including intracellular ad-
hesion molecule-1 (ICAM-1), vascular cell adhesion molecule-1 (VCAM-1), and selectins, 
which may have a role in senescent cell removal [228,229]. 
 
Figure 4. Clearance of senescent cells through immune system activation or apoptosis induction via 
senolytics. Distinctive ligands generated by senescent cells, including MICA, ULBP2, MHC I, and 
MHC II recognized by immune cells, such as NK cells, T cells, macrophages, and CAR-T cells. B 
cells eliminate senescent cells through a humoral antibody immunity. 
Ligands of the activating NK cell receptors, group 2 (NKG2D), one of which is MHC 
class I polypeptide-related sequence A (MICA) and the other second being UL16 binding 
protein 2 (ULBP2), are increased and displayed on the cellular membrane in conditions of 
DNA damage, as well as oncogene-induced or replicative senescence. This enables NK 
cells to recognize and eliminate specific targets. DDR promotes the production of ULBP2, 
whereas ERK may influence MICA and ULBP2 levels via promoting mRNA stability by 
decreasing the expression miRNA activity. Because NKG2D receptors are found on a frac-
tion of T-cells, immunosurveillance may be a mutual role of NK and T-cells. The abun-
dance of NKG2D receptors on NK cells does not vary with age, although NK activity is 
known to decline [228]. Furthermore, the membrane-bound malondialdehyde (MDA)-vi-
mentin might be an additional age-related cell specific element identified by innate im-
munity in a senescent cell removal process that progressively weakened with age [121]. 
It is not yet known why senescent cells build up within life, but the immune system 
plays a major function in the elimination of aged cells, and the increase in senescent cells 
in tissues is a consequence of the age-dependent decline of the immune system. It was 
Figure 4. Clearance of senescent cells through immune system activation or apoptosis induction via
senolytics. Distinctive ligands generated by senescent cells, including MICA, ULBP2, MHC I, and
MHC II recognized by immune cells, such as NK cells, T cells, macrophages, and CAR-T cells. B cells
eliminate senescent cells through a humoral antibody immunity.
While many senescent cells evade apoptosis, the immune system, which includes
both adaptive and innate immune cells, has a signiﬁcant impact on eliminating senescent
cells [230]. The elimination of senescent cells is induced via CD4+ T cells, as well as
monocytes and macrophages, through a mechanism called senescence surveillance [231].
However, with ageing, human immune cells are more prone to become senescent. It affects
several immune system activities, which gradually decrease with age, a mechanism called
« immunosenescence » [232]. Accordingly, an improved immunosurveillance ability was
revealed in heathy supercentenarians people due to a higher presence of CD4+ cytotoxic
T lymphocytes, and of the inhibitory receptor natural killer group 2A (NKG2A)-positive
CD8+ T cells. This might explain their increased longevity and their ability to regularly
eliminate senescent cells [233].
If senescent cell accumulation in aged tissues is due in large part to declining immune
function with age, boosting the immune system may lead to successful removal of cells
from aged tissues, as demonstrated by the use of an immunostimulator to mediate NK
cell-mediated removal of senescent cells in livers ﬁbrosis [26]. Consequently, senescence
immunotherapy strategy recently emerged as a senolytic substitute in the protection and
treatment of senescence and chronic conditions [231].
Cells 2023, 12, 915
25 of 42
13.2. Immune Boosting Strategies to Improve Elimination of Senescent Cells
As the immune system becomes less efﬁcient with age, it is likely that a therapeutic
boosting of immune responses can be useful for improving senescent cell elimination.
Senescent cells are naturally immunogenic and are subject to context-dependent im-
mune surveillance mechanisms. Senescence induction by p53 remodeling stimuli an innate
immune reaction typically consists of invading leukocytes, neutrophils, macrophages, and
NK cells in a model of hepatocellular carcinoma [33] and age-associated hepatic stellate
cells enhance their own NK cell-mediated eradication in cases of liver ﬁbrosis [26]. Senes-
cence induction by NRASG12V expression in hepatocytes leads to a dual release of both
innate and adoptive immunological response, as CD4+ T cells collaborate with mono-
cytes/macrophages to remove senescent hepatocytes [35]. This procedure is mediated by
stimulating natural killer cell receptor NKG2D, which detects ligands on the external mem-
brane of stressed, infected, or injured cells. Senescent cells increase the expression of the
immunological recognition protein NKG2D, which is normally absent from the membrane
of healthy cells [228]. Additionally, NKG2D was needed for natural killer cell-induced
senescent cell elimination to protect from ﬁbrotic liver formation [228]. Therefore, the
expression of NKG2D may be useful in immunotherapy strategies.
Boosting the immune clearance of senescent cells can also be achieved by adapting
cancer vaccine strategies. Even though no universal biomarker of cellular senescence is
known, the contact between immune and senescent cells might induce an immunological
response to undetected antigens.
Senescence vaccines would consist of isolating senescence-speciﬁc antigens and ex-
posing them to antigen presenting cells and dendritic cells. Therefore, the dendritic cells
would express these antigens on their cellular surface, which would ﬂag them to T cells.
The interaction response between T cells and these antigens provokes the activation and
differentiation of T cells and eventually kills targetted senescent cells [231].
A useful strategy is the production of cells able to detect particular components of the
senescent secretome. This was proved in creating cells harboring a chimeric IL-6 receptor
(IL6Rchi), which produces a Ca2+ signal when in contact with IL-6, an important component
of the senescent secretome [234].
13.3. Antibody-Dependent Cell-Mediated Cytotoxicity Eliminates Senescent Cells
Adding to the immune enhancing methods, adapting immunotherapy strategies
normally dedicated to cancer treatments might reveal important outcomes for ageing
disease interventions. Blocking the immune checkpoint Programmed Death 1 (PD-1) is an
example of a potent anticancer therapy. which can help alleviate clinical symptoms in an
Alzheimer’s disease mouse model [235].
A great example of an anti-cancer therapy is illustrated by using engineered immune
cells, such as chimeric antigen receptor T cells targeting individual molecules on tumor
cells. Similarly, senescent cells can be targeted via engineered T cells expressing NKG2D
chimeric antigen receptor, which detects NKG2D ligands on target cell surfaces [236,237].
The lack of selective senescence markers is a hurdle in immune-targeting techniques.
Senescent cells are mainly secured from NK cell-mediated cytotoxicity due to increased
expression of the decoy receptor 2, DcR2 [238]. DcR2 prevents TNF-related apoptosis-
inducing ligand (TRAIL) from activating death receptors 4 and 5 (DR4/DR5), limiting
the killing process to perforin- and granzyme-mediated pathways. Targeting strategies
to accelerate this process, such as by inhibiting DcR2, may render senescent cells more
susceptible to immune defense and immunotherapy-based targeting.
As mentioned earlier, natural killer cells detect and destroy senescent cells through
NKG2D ligand membrane expression [228]. These NKG2D ligands are also expressed
by cancer cells, which make them an important target for cancer immunotherapeutic
strategies [239] and consequently for senescent cell clearance.
DPP4 was discovered to be more abundant on the surface of ﬁbroblasts that had
undergone RS than on normal cells [122]. Treating senescent cells with an anti-DPP4
Cells 2023, 12, 915
26 of 42
antibody induces an NK cell favorable killing in an antibody-dependent cell-mediated
cytotoxicity assay [122,240].
Besides, recent studies are working on identifying particular epitopes and mem-
brane receptors related to senescent cells in order to develop antibody-based therapies or
screening factors that are more selective and have fewer negative effects. Both DEP1 and
B2MG [241], in addition to DCR2 [242], are examples of overly expressed identiﬁed markers
in senescent cells, but these markers also appeared among other cells and damaged tissues.
Recently, the use of CD9 receptors associated with increased SA-βGal activity is being
tested in an in vitro study as a dual nanoparticle targeting better drug delivery to senescent
cells [184]. Similarly, a senescent lung ﬁbroblasts marker was discovered, a membrane-
bound vimentin oxidized type [121]. In senescent ﬁbroblasts, humoral innate immunity
may recognize and attack the oxidized precursor of vimentin. Altogether, these ﬁndings
therefore suggested a possible immunotherapeutic approach targeting cellular senescence.
However, further in vivo studies are required to prove the clinical applicability of these
experimental approaches.
One can believe that this approach might ultimately be used in healthy people to post-
pone aging. We should re-evaluate the best approaches to translate beneﬁcial pre-clinical
ﬁndings into well developed and effective therapeutic processes. Several approaches tar-
geting senescent cells currently face to drug development challenges, including cost and
time, to bring a potent and widely used anti-aging treatment to the pharmaceutical market,
while being effective, safe, and tolerable, which is taken into consideration in the initial
phases of development.
The major unanswered question in this discipline is the efﬁcacy of various senothera-
pies in diverse human tissues. The majority of current data on such therapies come from
in vitro cell culture research, which does not represent the setting of a pathology and may
slightly replicate the condition in vivo. Pharmacological in vivo efﬁcacy was frequently in-
vestigated in mice models, many of which are partially related to aging and age-associated
diseases. As a result, prior to serotherapies’ implementation in clinical trials, their signiﬁ-
cance to particular human diseases must be thoroughly explored. Furthermore, existing
techniques target a broad population of senescent cells, despite the fact that senescent cells
are very diverse. The varying sensitivity of cell subpopulations to a particular therapy
may result from differences in the cells’ origin, the stimulus of senescence, or the disease
environment. Therefore, it is reasonable to assume that certain therapies will be more
appropriate than others for a speciﬁc tissue or age-associated condition. Thus, the idea of
considering senotherapies as a pan-antisenescence therapy is rather confusing and should
be reconsidered. This will require evaluation of the impact of each therapy on various cell
populations while employing the most appropriate model for every disease condition to
which the drug can be used.
Because of the physiological importance of senescent cells and the adverse effects of
current senolytics, safety concerns may arise when adopting senescence-targeted therapies.
Upon systemic administration, many senolytics, particularly BCL-2 family inhibitors, are
toxic to non-senescent cells [203]. In addition, many senescence epitopes may be displayed
to some extent in non-senescent cells, such as cellular stress or secreting cells, in the case of
immunotherapy. There are several alternative solutions to this issue. Drugs, for example,
could be delivered directly to the target zone. More importantly, synergistic techniques
based on the delivery of senescent cell-speciﬁc senolytic agents could have a synchronous
effect, allowing the delivery of smaller, less aggressive doses with increased efﬁcacy and
safety. Another avenue for improving speciﬁc targeting is to modify the drug so that it
becomes active only after exposure to an enzyme produced by senescent cells. In addi-
tion to the negative impact of the targeted component, decreased safety may result from
a likely interaction with the positive activities of senescence. Although the senescence
process is implicated in embryogenesis, tissue repair, rejuvenation, and tumor suppres-
sion, the impact of senescence targeting by senolytic therapy on such processes is yet
unknown [42,43,243–246]. Current senolytics induce apoptosis of senescent cells during
Cells 2023, 12, 915
27 of 42
limited drug exposures, which can be applied for a short period of time. New therapies
must take this into account and be administered in a spatially and temporally regulated
manner, in addition to well designed studies to avoid failure. First-wave senotherapies
must be carefully selected for indications that may include an unusual age-related condi-
tion for which standard treatment is only symptomatic and not therapeutic. The function
of cellular senescence in the pathophysiology of each condition or disorder must be es-
tablished, and the underlying mechanisms must be well understood. The existence of
appropriate preclinical models will enable the assessment of the risks and beneﬁts of each
therapy. Speciﬁc biomarkers of senescence or disease indicators to be used for prognosis
and prediction are also critical to the success of clinical investigations. The lack of good
senescence markers continues to limit fundamental research, where quantitative measure-
ments are restricted to ex vivo cellular examination. Novel senescence biomarkers are
needed to study senescence levels non-invasively in tissues so that participants can be
selected based on their senescence status. Many factors can contribute to the success of
experimental trials, including scientiﬁc evidence, experimental parameters, and individual-
ized patient conditions. Altogether, cellular senescence is a complex process involving both
advantageous and disadvantageous outcomes. Senotherapies have the potential to inhibit
adverse outcomes and cure a wide range of age-related diseases, but proper administration
is necessary to ensure both efﬁciency and safety. The importance of understanding the
processes of potential adverse reactions when determining the method of administration
and concentration will accelerate the clinical development of senolytic drugs and provide
new opportunities for improving human lifespan and health.
14. Clinical Targeting of Senescence in Age-Associated Disorders
Age-related diseases and their corresponding social burden are increasing. Age-
associated immune senescent modiﬁcations might lead to a decrease in the immune system,
chronic inﬂammation, in addition to weakness, chronic disease, and loss of function among
old people [247]. Translating approaches that target senescent cells into clinical practice
could have a major impact on curing a range of diseases that occur with age and perhaps
change our perspective of ageing.
Preclinical studies showed that the clearance of aged cells can improve and reverse
multiple age-associated diseases [41,248,249], giving hope and promises to develop new
therapeutics for these critical disorders. For this reason, clinical trials targeting senescent
cells are under development.
Due to impressive preliminary results, many trials are focusing on D+Q as a po-
tential bi-therapy to some age-associated diseases and mainly chronic kidney disease
(NCT02848131), idiopathic pulmonary ﬁbrosis (NCT02874989), and in cases of hematopoi-
etic stem cell transplant, presenting a high risk of premature ageing (NCT02652052)
(Table 1).
Persons diagnosed with activated PI3K Delta syndrome have a dominantly mutated
PI3K catalytic subunit p110δ, causing senescence of T cells and immunodeﬁciency [250].
Leniolisib, a new effective and selective oral PI3Kδ (CDZ173) inhibitor, was able to reduce
senescent T cells and to lower the inﬂammatory markers in clinical trials formed of six
patients (NCT02435173); also, an extension study is progressing (NCT02859727). Further
procedures are being developed, which include more trials to detect the effect of plasma
transfer from healthy young male donors to patients over 40, assessing the ability to reverse
epigenetic and other senescent markers (NCT03353597). Many factors can be evaluated
from blood and skin biopsies, such as the DNA methylation level and other epigenetic
alterations, the length of telomeres, as well as renal, pulmonary, cognitive, and muscle
strength variations, in addition to IGF-1 and p16 expression.
Cells 2023, 12, 915
28 of 42
Table 1. Ongoing and planned clinical trials using senolytic drug interventions.
Intervention/Treatment
Disease/Condition
Outcome Measures
Eligible Age
Phase
Study ID (https:
//clinicaltrials.gov/,
accessed on 24 June
2022)
Idiopathic pulmonary
ﬁbrosis patients
Improvements in physical function
≥50
Phase I
NCT02874989
Diabetes and
kidney dysfunction
Decrease in senescence markers
50–80
Phase I
NCT02848131
Alzheimer
Change in cellular senescence
blood marker
≥65
Phase II
NCT04063124
Skeletal disease
Skeletal health improvement
≥70
Phase II
NCT04313634
Chronic kidney disease
Senescent cells proportional change
40–80
Phase II
NCT02848131
Dasatinib + Quercetin
Stem cell transplant
Frailty level
≥18
Recruiting
NCT02652052
Frailty, inﬂammation
Decrease in blood inﬂammation
markers
≥70
Phase II
NCT03430037
Osteoarthritis, knee
Change in levels of
proinﬂammatory markers
associated with senescence
40–80
Phase I
NCT04210986
Fisetin
COVID-19
Change in COVID-19 severity
≥65
Phase II
NCT04771611
Dasatinib + Quercetin;
Fisetin
Childhood cancer and
Frailty
Senescence reduction and frailty
improvement
≥18
Phase II
NCT04733534
UBX0101
Osteoarthritis, knee
Safety and efﬁcacy level
40–85
Phase II
NCT04129944
UBX1325
Diabetic Macular Edema
Neovascular age-related
macular degeneration
Gain in visual acuity
≥50
Phase I
NCT04537884
UBX1967
UBX 2050
Macular degeneration
-
-
-
Planned
CDZ173
APDS/PASLI
Senescent T cells reduction
12–75
Phase II and III
NCT02435173
(Extension study
NCT02859727)
Tamoxifen (MitoTam)
Solid metastatic tumours
Maximum tolerated dose
identiﬁcation
Safety level
High efﬁcacy against renal cell
carcinoma
18–75
Phase I/Ib
EudraCT
2017-004441-25
The early ﬁndings of a phase two experiment examining twelve weeks of senolytical
therapy of knee osteoarthritis showed failure to meet the expected outcome, with the
complete data still to be reported (UNITY, 2021). The phase 2 clinical study, UBX0101, in pa-
tients with painful osteoarthritis of the knee, was conducted by Unity Biotechnology. Many
explanations could be given as to why the experiment failed: the strategy is not practical
for this condition, maybe the drug dosage was wrong, or the inclusion criteria should have
been narrower or broader. All of this aside, clinical trials of senescence-reducing therapies
are in their earliest stages and need to be further explored. However, recently, a red-hot
anti-aging approach almost passed its ﬁrst test after 14 volunteers took drugs meant to
kill off old, toxic cells present in their bodies. They suffered from a fatal, hard-to-treat
lung condition called idiopathic pulmonary ﬁbrosis. Idiopathic pulmonary ﬁbrosis is a
lethal condition characterized by age-related markers, such as DNA damage, inﬂamma-
tion, telomere attrition, oxidative stress, and, most signiﬁcantly, cellular senescence [251].
Studies in mice with idiopathic pulmonary ﬁbrosis show that the senolytic agents D+Q
have a beneﬁcial impact on pulmonary functioning [7]. At the same time, a study among
patients with idiopathic pulmonary ﬁbrosis, which primarily investigated the overall safety
of this treatment, indicates that D+Q also has beneﬁcial implications for physical function
in humans [252]. For three weeks, fourteen patients suffering from idiopathic pulmonary
ﬁbrosis received D+Q treatment, and the results showed not only signiﬁcant, but also
clinically meaningful gains, in physical function. This analysis showed no effect on lung
capacity, clinical chemistry, or frailty. As for the effects on SASP and proinﬂammatory
markers, it was not entirely conclusive, but it showed some correlated changes [252].
Diabetes and renal disease are associated with an increased senescent cell load, partic-
ularly in adipose tissue. A clinical experiment examined the effects of D+Q on senescent
human adipocytes [253], in which 11 patients with diabetes and kidney disease received
D+Q for three days. Results showed a substantial decrease in markers of senescent cells,
as well as signiﬁcantly lower numbers of senescent cells in adipose tissue. Ultimately, the
Cells 2023, 12, 915
29 of 42
study conﬁrmed the postulated hypothesis by showing that D+Q signiﬁcantly decreased
circulating SASP components in the patients.
Moreover, numerous studies have been conducted on MitoTam, a mitochondria-
targeted tamoxifen that has been shown to be a novel senolytic that selectively activates
senescent cell death by decreasing mitochondrial membrane potential and preventing
mitochondrial oxidative phosphorylation (OXPHOS), thereby improving mitochondrial
stability [254]. Further than this, MitoTam has been shown to effectively destroy a variety
of renal cancer cells and inhibit renal carcinomas in a rodent model via involvement of
mitochondria, resulting in reduced tumorigenesis (EudraCT 2017-004441-25) and providing
hope for future phase 2 trials [255]. Finally, MitoTam also appears to have the potential to
be an anti-diabetic agent, helping to tackle one of the most prevalent pandemics, obesity
and type 2 diabetes mellitus [256].
At present, 20 clinical trials on senolytics are ongoing. Two of the studies targeting
frailty and aging (AFFIRM studies), comparing ﬁsetin to placebo as a control group, are
almost halfway complete. One of these studies is in elderly women with severe frailty
who have a walking speed of less than 0.6 m per second, which is a signiﬁcant indicator of
a 2-year survival rate of about 50%. A pilot study in Alzheimer’s disease (ALSENLITE)
has been initiated, along with a multicenter, double-blinded, placebo-controlled study
in Alzheimer’s patients (SToMP-AD) and a study in renal disease, along with a nearly
completed study in bone marrow transplant patients (HTSS). Patients requiring bone
marrow transplantation receive high doses of chemotherapy and radiation to knock out
their immune system prior to transplantation, which unfortunately can cause aging. A
number of bone marrow transplant recipients have been found to develop accelerating signs
of aging after three to ﬁve years. Therefore, this trial will test if elimination of senescent
cells could mitigate this accelerated aging condition in which individuals develop many
pathologies including diabetes, cognitive decline, secondary non-related cancers, and
atherosclerosis with myocardial infarctions and strokes.
All trials are in preparation for a bigger double-blinded, placebo-controlled study.
The NIH-funded study of age-related osteoporosis is nearly completed, with over half the
participants recruited. Another trial by the Ofﬁce of Naval Research supported a clinical
trial on osteoarthritis, a condition associated with the accumulation of senescent cells
in the joints of the knees. Additionally, a number of studies on coronaviruses and their
consequences are still currently active or have been initiated (COVID-FIS, COVID-FISETIN,
COVFIS-HOME).
15. Future Perspectives
The abnormal and permanent accumulation of various senescent cells causes aging
and the emergence of chronic diseases. Cellular senescence regulation is crucial for healthy
aging, as it also has short-term beneﬁts. There are multiple clinical molecules and senolytics
to treat aging and chronic diseases related to cellular senescence.
Even though immunological elimination of speciﬁc senescent cells is a novel and
challenging technique for anti-aging and treatment of several chronic conditions, it is not
costless and has negative effects. For clinical translation of this new technology, certain
inquiries need to be conducted, including: (1) both preclinical and clinical research, identi-
ﬁcation of appropriate biomarkers or molecular mechanisms for personalized aging; (2)
discovery of distinct senescent cell antigens or ligands for immune monitoring; and (3)
incorporation of both sexes into the study due to the gender variations in aging and chronic
disorders. Senotherapy can lead to adverse reactions and harm tissue homeostasis and
function. This may be avoided by applying senotherapy in a temporary and discontinuous
manner if it preserves the therapeutic effects of delaying aging.
In this review, we present certain important approaches to control cellular senescence,
some of which were investigated and conﬁrmed on animal models with aging-related
diseases. A subset is now in clinical trials. Our main focus here is on senolytic drugs
and manipulating the immune surveillance of senescent cells. Importantly, several clinical
Cells 2023, 12, 915
30 of 42
approaches targeting senescent cells might have a signiﬁcant effect on treating some age-
related pathologies and on increasing lifespan through an aging delay in the damaged
tissues and organs. However, some critical risks should be taken into consideration for a
cautious clinical translation of senescence-targeted therapeutic methodologies.
Much of the data on senotherapies were from human cell cultures. The new approaches
promote senescence through various stressors and controlling mechanisms and in various
cell types. The induction of senescence in speciﬁc cell types from speciﬁc tissues through
either replicative stress, oncogene activation, irradiation, carcinogens, damaging molecules,
and many others helps determine the key elements and signaling pathways involved [257].
There are many different types of senescent cells, and consequently, the subtypes can have
multiple vulnerabilities to senotherapies and senoprobes.
Thus, it is very crucial to clinically solve the correct questions as to how drug 1 affects
drug 2 and in which conditions, by assessing different models accurately representing
the human condition. Senescent cells are known to autonomously inhibit the spread
of damaged and pre-malignant cells, and thus, they form an essential tumor-resistance
barrier [179]. It was observed that the accumulation of mutations in the p53–p21 and
the p16-Rb pathways are correlated with the majority of human cancer cells and among
different senescence-related genes [258]. Additionally, escape from or reverting senes-
cence contribute to carcinogenesis [259]; correspondingly, it was discovered that a family
of therapy-induced senescent cancer cells can develop functional and phenotypic stem-
ness characteristics, causing cell cycle entrance, self-renewal ability, and a higher tumor
phenotypic aggressiveness [260]. Despite their many advantages, senescence-focussed
approaches should be translated from relevant preclinical models with extreme caution due
to the beneﬁcial and harmful roles that senescence exerts, depending on the pathological
situation [4].
Moreover, the secretome of senescent cells is importantly involved in recruiting T cells
and macrophages, which facilitates immuno-surveillance in the case of liver precancerous
lesions [231]. However, the senescent secretome might also intrinsically induce chronic
inﬂammation and tumor progression [150]. In fact, secretion from senescent cells helps in
repairing damaged and injured tissues. An example of this comes from senescent-activated
stellate cells, which limit liver ﬁbrosis by increasing immuno-surveillance and reducing
secretion of extracellular matrix components, apart from extracellular matrix degrading
enzymes [26].
The same kind of situation occurs when senescent ﬁbroblasts assemble In healing
cutaneous wounds of granulated tissues and activate anti-ﬁbrotic genes [45]. Mouse studies
revealed that senescence contributes to ﬁbrotic pulmonary disease models, as ﬁbrosis was
reduced and lung function improved when these mice were treated with senolytics, anti-
inﬂammatory molecules, and therapeutic nanoparticles [7,217,261].
The contradictory roles of senescent cells, as inhibitor and enhancer of ﬁbrosis, in
mouse models of human ﬁbrotic diseases highlights the need for more comprehensive
knowledge on the intrinsic mechanisms and pathways causing cell cycle arrest and the
speciﬁc elements released by senescent cells prior to initiating clinical trials in humans.
16. Conclusions
As life expectancy has increased, so have the chances of contracting age-related dis-
eases, such as cancer, so understanding the aging process is key to improving life. During
aging in mice, as well as in humans, senescent cells accumulate, leading to tissue dys-
function and to different age-related pathologies. Preclinical studies in mice proved that
eliminating senescent cells can improve and even reverse the pathological appearance of
several disorders; however, many obstacles must be overcome to guarantee a perfectly
strategic translation to the clinic.
When cells are damaged and stressed, senescence or apoptosis cell fates are safeguard
mechanisms with bright and dark side. In some circumstances, it might be more interesting
for tissue ﬁtness to maintain senescence and mitigate the deleterious effect of the SASP
Cells 2023, 12, 915
31 of 42
with senomorphic strategies and, in other situations, elimination of senescent cells using
senolytic therapy could be more advantageous clinically. As there are various molecular
mechanisms behind the resistance of senescent cells to apoptosis, for each age-related
disease it will be important to identify their signaling pathways, speciﬁc secretomes, and
senescent arrest contributors. Additionally, a more stringent selection of better optimized
senotherapies is required to improve efﬁcacy and reduce toxicity. Bearing in mind inter-
patient individuality, and that the aging process with its related disorders, is multifactorial
and complex, it is most likely that the next generation of anti-aging health interventions
will be specialized to depend on speciﬁc biomarkers that inform a clear risk–beneﬁt ratio.
Many senotherapeutic and immunological studies of age-associated pathologies are
currently in clinical trial. It is likely that, ultimately in the long term, immune cell-mediated
elimination of senescent cells will be key to reduce senescent cell burden. Expeditious
clinical advancement will thus depend on a better understanding of senescent cells and
their interaction with the immune system.
This critical era that we are going through will allow us to develop anti-senescent
therapies, which might have a major effect on personalized ‘precision’ medicine. These
advances in tissue repair mechanisms and regeneration will likely further increase human
healthspan and longevity.
Author Contributions: R.K. and J.-M.L. wrote the original draft of the review and M.D.-A. edited
the text. All authors have read and agreed to the published version of the manuscript.
Funding: This research received no external funding.
Institutional Review Board Statement: Not applicable.
Informed Consent Statement: Not applicable.
Data Availability Statement: Not applicable.
Conﬂicts of Interest: The authors declare no conﬂict of Interest.
References
1.
Franceschi, C.; Garagnani, P.; Morsiani, C.; Conte, M.; Santoro, A.; Grignolio, A.; Monti, D.; Capri, M.; Salvioli, S. The Continuum
of Aging and Age-Related Diseases: Common Mechanisms but Different Rates. Front. Med. 2018, 5, 61. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
2.
López-Otín, C.; Blasco, M.A.; Partridge, L.; Serrano, M.; Kroemer, G. The hallmarks of aging. Cell 2013, 153, 1194–1217. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
3.
López-Otín, C.; Blasco, M.A.; Partridge, L.; Serrano, M.; Kroemer, G. Hallmarks of aging: An expanding universe. Cell 2023, 186,
243–278. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
4.
Munoz-Espin, D.; Serrano, M. Cellular senescence: From physiology to pathology. Nat. Rev. Mol. Cell Biol. 2014, 15, 482–496.
[CrossRef]
5.
van Deursen, J.M. The role of senescent cells in ageing. Nature 2014, 509, 439–446. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
6.
Childs, B.G.; Baker, D.J.; Wijshake, T.; Conover, C.A.; Campisi, J.; van Deursen, J.M. Senescent intimal foam cells are deleterious at
all stages of atherosclerosis. Science 2016, 354, 472–477. [CrossRef]
7.
Schafer, M.J.; White, T.A.; Iijima, K.; Haak, A.J.; Ligresti, G.; Atkinson, E.J.; Oberg, A.L.; Birch, J.; Salmonowicz, H.; Zhu, Y.; et al.
Cellular senescence mediates ﬁbrotic pulmonary disease. Nat. Commun. 2017, 8, 14532. [CrossRef]
8.
Farr, J.N.; Xu, M.; Weivoda, M.M.; Monroe, D.G.; Fraser, D.G.; Onken, J.L.; Negley, B.A.; Sfeir, J.G.; Ogrodnik, M.B.; Hachfeld,
C.M.; et al. Targeting cellular senescence prevents age-related bone loss in mice. Nat. Med. 2017, 23, 1072–1079. [CrossRef]
9.
Ogrodnik, M.; Miwa, S.; Tchkonia, T.; Tiniakos, D.; Wilson, C.L.; Lahat, A.; Day, C.P.; Burt, A.; Palmer, A.; Anstee, Q.M.; et al.
Cellular senescence drives age-dependent hepatic steatosis. Nat. Commun. 2017, 8, 15691. [CrossRef]
10.
Jeon, O.H.; Kim, C.; Laberge, R.M.; Demaria, M.; Rathod, S.; Vasserot, A.P.; Chung, J.W.; Kim, D.H.; Poon, Y.; David, N.; et al.
Local clearance of senescent cells attenuates the development of post-traumatic osteoarthritis and creates a pro-regenerative
environment. Nat. Med. 2017, 23, 775–781. [CrossRef]
11.
Roos, C.M.; Zhang, B.; Palmer, A.K.; Ogrodnik, M.B.; Pirtskhalava, T.; Thalji, N.M.; Hagler, M.; Jurk, D.; Smith, L.A.; Casaclang-
Verzosa, G.; et al. Chronic senolytic treatment alleviates established vasomotor dysfunction in aged or atherosclerotic mice. Aging
Cell 2016, 15, 973–977. [CrossRef]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
32 of 42
12.
Yosef, R.; Pilpel, N.; Tokarsky-Amiel, R.; Biran, A.; Ovadya, Y.; Cohen, S.; Vadai, E.; Dassa, L.; Shahar, E.; Condiotti, R.; et al.
Directed elimination of senescent cells by inhibition of BCL-W and BCL-XL. Nat. Commun. 2016, 7, 11190. [CrossRef]
13.
Chang, J.; Wang, Y.; Shao, L.; Laberge, R.M.; Demaria, M.; Campisi, J.; Janakiraman, K.; Sharpless, N.E.; Ding, S.; Feng, W.; et al.
Clearance of senescent cells by ABT263 rejuvenates aged hematopoietic stem cells in mice. Nat. Med. 2016, 22, 78–83. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
14.
Bussian, T.J.; Aziz, A.; Meyer, C.F.; Swenson, B.L.; van Deursen, J.M.; Baker, D.J. Clearance of senescent glial cells prevents
tau-dependent pathology and cognitive decline. Nature 2018, 562, 578–582. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
15.
Baker, D.J.; Wijshake, T.; Tchkonia, T.; LeBrasseur, N.K.; Childs, B.G.; van de Sluis, B.; Kirkland, J.L.; van Deursen, J.M. Clearance
of p16Ink4a-positive senescent cells delays ageing-associated disorders. Nature 2011, 479, 232–236. [CrossRef]
16.
Baker, D.J.; Childs, B.G.; Durik, M.; Wijers, M.E.; Sieben, C.J.; Zhong, J.; Saltness, R.A.; Jeganathan, K.B.; Verzosa, G.C.; Pezeshki,
A.; et al. Naturally occurring p16(Ink4a)-positive cells shorten healthy lifespan. Nature 2016, 530, 184–189. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
17.
Tchkonia, T.; Zhu, Y.; van Deursen, J.; Campisi, J.; Kirkland, J.L. Cellular senescence and the senescent secretory phenotype:
Therapeutic opportunities. J. Clin. Investig. 2013, 123, 966–972. [CrossRef]
18.
Ovadya, Y.; Krizhanovsky, V. Senescent cells: SASPected drivers of age-related pathologies. Biogerontology 2014, 15, 627–642.
[CrossRef]
19.
Gorgoulis, V.G.; Halazonetis, T.D. Oncogene-induced senescence: The bright and dark side of the response. Curr. Opin. Cell Biol.
2010, 22, 816–827. [CrossRef]
20.
Di Leonardo, A.; Linke, S.P.; Clarkin, K.; Wahl, G.M. DNA damage triggers a prolonged p53-dependent G1 arrest and long-term
induction of Cip1 in normal human ﬁbroblasts. Genes. Dev. 1994, 8, 2540–2551. [CrossRef]
21.
Herbig, U.; Jobling, W.A.; Chen, B.P.; Chen, D.J.; Sedivy, J.M. Telomere shortening triggers senescence of human cells through a
pathway involving ATM, p53, and p21(CIP1), but not p16(INK4a). Mol. Cell 2004, 14, 501–513. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
22.
Serrano, M.; Lin, A.W.; McCurrach, M.E.; Beach, D.; Lowe, S.W. Oncogenic ras provokes premature cell senescence associated
with accumulation of p53 and p16INK4a. Cell 1997, 88, 593–602. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
23.
Burton, D.G.; Krizhanovsky, V. Physiological and pathological consequences of cellular senescence. Cell Mol. Life Sci. 2014, 71,
4373–4386. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
24.
Campisi, J. Aging, cellular senescence, and cancer. Annu. Rev. Physiol. 2013, 75, 685–705. [CrossRef]
25.
Demaria, M.; Ohtani, N.; Youssef, S.A.; Rodier, F.; Toussaint, W.; Mitchell, J.R.; Laberge, R.-M.; Vijg, J.; Van Steeg, H.; Dollé, M.E.T.;
et al. An essential role for senescent cells in optimal wound healing through secretion of PDGF-AA. Dev. Cell 2014, 31, 722–733.
[CrossRef]
26.
Krizhanovsky, V.; Yon, M.; Dickins, R.A.; Hearn, S.; Simon, J.; Miething, C.; Yee, H.; Zender, L.; Lowe, S.W. Senescence of activated
stellate cells limits liver ﬁbrosis. Cell 2008, 134, 657–667. [CrossRef]
27.
Braig, M.; Lee, S.; Loddenkemper, C.; Rudolph, C.; Peters, A.H.; Schlegelberger, B.; Stein, H.; Dorken, B.; Jenuwein, T.; Schmitt,
C.A. Oncogene-induced senescence as an initial barrier in lymphoma development. Nature 2005, 436, 660–665. [CrossRef]
28.
Chen, Z.; Trotman, L.C.; Shaffer, D.; Lin, H.K.; Dotan, Z.A.; Niki, M.; Koutcher, J.A.; Scher, H.I.; Ludwig, T.; Gerald, W.; et al.
Crucial role of p53-dependent cellular senescence in suppression of Pten-deﬁcient tumorigenesis. Nature 2005, 436, 725–730.
[CrossRef]
29.
Michaloglou, C.; Vredeveld, L.C.; Soengas, M.S.; Denoyelle, C.; Kuilman, T.; van der Horst, C.M.; Majoor, D.M.; Shay, J.W.; Mooi,
W.J.; Peeper, D.S. BRAFE600-associated senescence-like cell cycle arrest of human naevi. Nature 2005, 436, 720–724. [CrossRef]
30.
Campisi, J. Senescent cells, tumor suppression, and organismal aging: Good citizens, bad neighbors. Cell 2005, 120, 513–522.
[CrossRef]
31.
Coppe, J.P.; Patil, C.K.; Rodier, F.; Sun, Y.; Munoz, D.P.; Goldstein, J.; Nelson, P.S.; Desprez, P.Y.; Campisi, J. Senescence-associated
secretory phenotypes reveal cell-nonautonomous functions of oncogenic RAS and the p53 tumor suppressor. PLoS Biol. 2008, 6,
2853–2868. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
32.
Sagiv, A.; Krizhanovsky, V. Immunosurveillance of senescent cells: The bright side of the senescence program. Biogerontology
2013, 14, 617–628. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
33.
Xue, W.; Zender, L.; Miething, C.; Dickins, R.A.; Hernando, E.; Krizhanovsky, V.; Cordon-Cardo, C.; Lowe, S.W. Senescence and
tumour clearance is triggered by p53 restoration in murine liver carcinomas. Nature 2007, 445, 656–660. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
34.
Soriani, A.; Zingoni, A.; Cerboni, C.; Iannitto, M.L.; Ricciardi, M.R.; Di Gialleonardo, V.; Cippitelli, M.; Fionda, C.; Petrucci,
M.T.; Guarini, A.; et al. ATM-ATR-dependent up-regulation of DNAM-1 and NKG2D ligands on multiple myeloma cells by
therapeutic agents results in enhanced NK-cell susceptibility and is associated with a senescent phenotype. Blood 2009, 113,
3503–3511. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
35.
Kang, T.W.; Yevsa, T.; Woller, N.; Hoenicke, L.; Wuestefeld, T.; Dauch, D.; Hohmeyer, A.; Gereke, M.; Rudalska, R.;
Potapova, A.; et al. Senescence surveillance of pre-malignant hepatocytes limits liver cancer development. Nature 2011, 479,
547–551. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
36.
Tasdemir, N.; Banito, A.; Roe, J.S.; Alonso-Curbelo, D.; Camiolo, M.; Tschaharganeh, D.F.; Huang, C.H.; Aksoy, O.; Bolden, J.E.;
Chen, C.C.; et al. BRD4 Connects Enhancer Remodeling to Senescence Immune Surveillance. Cancer Discov. 2016, 6, 612–629.
[CrossRef]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
33 of 42
37.
Eggert, T.; Wolter, K.; Ji, J.; Ma, C.; Yevsa, T.; Klotz, S.; Medina-Echeverz, J.; Longerich, T.; Forgues, M.; Reisinger, F.; et al. Distinct
Functions of Senescence-Associated Immune Responses in Liver Tumor Surveillance and Tumor Progression. Cancer Cell 2016, 30,
533–547. [CrossRef]
38.
Dimri, G.P.; Lee, X.; Basile, G.; Acosta, M.; Scott, G.; Roskelley, C.; Medrano, E.E.; Linskens, M.; Rubelj, I.; Pereira-Smith, O.;
et al. A biomarker that identiﬁes senescent human cells in culture and in aging skin in vivo. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. USA 1995, 92,
9363–9367. [CrossRef]
39.
Ressler, S.; Bartkova, J.; Niederegger, H.; Bartek, J.; Scharffetter-Kochanek, K.; Jansen-Durr, P.; Wlaschek, M. p16INK4A is a robust
in vivo biomarker of cellular aging in human skin. Aging Cell 2006, 5, 379–389. [CrossRef]
40.
Franceschi, C.; Bonafe, M.; Valensin, S.; Olivieri, F.; De Luca, M.; Ottaviani, E.; De Benedictis, G. Inﬂamm-aging. An evolutionary
perspective on immunosenescence. Ann. N. Y. Acad. Sci. 2000, 908, 244–254. [CrossRef]
41.
Childs, B.G.; Gluscevic, M.; Baker, D.J.; Laberge, R.M.; Marquess, D.; Dananberg, J.; van Deursen, J.M. Senescent cells: An
emerging target for diseases of ageing. Nat. Rev. Drug Discov. 2017, 16, 718–735. [CrossRef]
42.
Munoz-Espin, D.; Canamero, M.; Maraver, A.; Gomez-Lopez, G.; Contreras, J.; Murillo-Cuesta, S.; Rodriguez-Baeza, A.; Varela-
Nieto, I.; Ruberte, J.; Collado, M.; et al. Programmed cell senescence during mammalian embryonic development. Cell 2013, 155,
1104–1118. [CrossRef]
43.
Storer, M.; Mas, A.; Robert-Moreno, A.; Pecoraro, M.; Ortells, M.C.; Di Giacomo, V.; Yosef, R.; Pilpel, N.; Krizhanovsky, V.; Sharpe,
J.; et al. Senescence is a developmental mechanism that contributes to embryonic growth and patterning. Cell 2013, 155, 1119–1130.
[CrossRef]
44.
Citrin, D.E.; Shankavaram, U.; Horton, J.A.; Shield, W., 3rd; Zhao, S.; Asano, H.; White, A.; Sowers, A.; Thetford, A.; Chung, E.J.
Role of type II pneumocyte senescence in radiation-induced lung ﬁbrosis. J. Natl. Cancer Inst. 2013, 105, 1474–1484. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
45.
Jun, J.I.; Lau, L.F. The matricellular protein CCN1 induces ﬁbroblast senescence and restricts ﬁbrosis in cutaneous wound healing.
Nat. Cell Biol. 2010, 12, 676–685. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
46.
Yun, M.H.; Davaapil, H.; Brockes, J.P. Recurrent turnover of senescent cells during regeneration of a complex structure. Elife 2015,
4, e05505. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
47.
Godwin, J.W.; Pinto, A.R.; Rosenthal, N.A. Macrophages are required for adult salamander limb regeneration. Proc. Natl. Acad.
Sci. USA 2013, 110, 9415–9420. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
48.
Hayﬂick, L.; Moorhead, P.S. The serial cultivation of human diploid cell strains. Exp. Cell Res. 1961, 25, 585–621. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
49.
Hayﬂick, L. The limited in vitro lifetime of human diploid cell strains. Exp. Cell Res. 1965, 37, 614–636. [CrossRef]
50.
Harley, C.B.; Futcher, A.B.; Greider, C.W. Telomeres shorten during ageing of human ﬁbroblasts. Nature 1990, 345, 458–460.
[CrossRef]
51.
Schmitt, C.A.; Fridman, J.S.; Yang, M.; Lee, S.; Baranov, E.; Hoffman, R.M.; Lowe, S.W. A senescence program controlled by p53
and p16INK4a contributes to the outcome of cancer therapy. Cell 2002, 109, 335–346. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
52.
Baird, D.M.; Rowson, J.; Wynford-Thomas, D.; Kipling, D. Extensive allelic variation and ultrashort telomeres in senescent human
cells. Nat. Genet. 2003, 33, 203–207. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
53.
Bernadotte, A.; Mikhelson, V.M.; Spivak, I.M. Markers of cellular senescence. Telomere shortening as a marker of cellular
senescence. Aging (Albany NY) 2016, 8, 3–11. [CrossRef]
54.
d’Adda di Fagagna, F.; Reaper, P.M.; Clay-Farrace, L.; Fiegler, H.; Carr, P.; Von Zglinicki, T.; Saretzki, G.; Carter, N.P.; Jackson, S.P.
A DNA damage checkpoint response in telomere-initiated senescence. Nature 2003, 426, 194–198. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
55.
Guo, X.; Deng, Y.; Lin, Y.; Cosme-Blanco, W.; Chan, S.; He, H.; Yuan, G.; Brown, E.J.; Chang, S. Dysfunctional telomeres activate
an ATM-ATR-dependent DNA damage response to suppress tumorigenesis. EMBO J. 2007, 26, 4709–4719. [CrossRef]
56.
Aliouat-Denis, C.-M.; Dendouga, N.; Van den Wyngaert, I.; Goehlmann, H.; Steller, U.; van de Weyer, I.; Van Slycken, N.; Andries,
L.; Kass, S.; Luyten, W.; et al. p53-Independent Regulation of p21Waf1/Cip1 Expression and Senescence by Chk2. Mol. Cancer Res.
2005, 3, 627. [CrossRef]
57.
Childs, B.G.; Baker, D.J.; Kirkland, J.L.; Campisi, J.; van Deursen, J.M. Senescence and apoptosis: Dueling or complementary cell
fates? EMBO Rep. 2014, 15, 1139–1153. [CrossRef]
58.
Alcorta, D.A.; Xiong, Y.; Phelps, D.; Hannon, G.; Beach, D.; Barrett, J.C. Involvement of the cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor p16
(INK4a) in replicative senescence of normal human ﬁbroblasts. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. USA 1996, 93, 13742–13747. [CrossRef]
59.
Fumagalli, M.; Rossiello, F.; Mondello, C.; d’Adda di Fagagna, F. Stable cellular senescence is associated with persistent DDR
activation. PLoS ONE 2014, 9, e110969. [CrossRef]
60.
Galluzzi, L.; Vitale, I.; Kepp, O.; Kroemer, G. Cell Senescence; Humana Press: Totowa, NJ, USA, 2013.
61.
González-Gualda, E.; Baker, A.G.; Fruk, L.; Muñoz-Espín, D. A guide to assessing cellular senescence in vitro and in vivo. Febs J.
2021, 288, 56–80. [CrossRef]
62.
Knoppert, S.N.; Valentijn, F.A.; Nguyen, T.Q.; Goldschmeding, R.; Falke, L.L. Cellular Senescence and the Kidney: Potential
Therapeutic Targets and Tools. Front. Pharmacol. 2019, 10, 770. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
34 of 42
63.
Calcinotto, A.; Kohli, J.; Zagato, E.; Pellegrini, L.; Demaria, M.; Alimonti, A. Cellular Senescence: Aging, Cancer, and Injury.
Physiol. Rev. 2019, 99, 1047–1078. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
64.
Vizioli, M.G.; Santos, J.; Pilotti, S.; Mazzoni, M.; Anania, M.C.; Miranda, C.; Pagliardini, S.; Pierotti, M.A.; Gil, J.; Greco, A.
Oncogenic RAS-induced senescence in human primary thyrocytes: Molecular effectors and inﬂammatory secretome involved.
Oncotarget 2014, 5, 8270–8283. [CrossRef]
65.
Weyemi, U.; Lagente-Chevallier, O.; Boufraqech, M.; Prenois, F.; Courtin, F.; Caillou, B.; Talbot, M.; Dardalhon, M.; Al Ghuzlan,
A.; Bidart, J.M.; et al. ROS-generating NADPH oxidase NOX4 is a critical mediator in oncogenic H-Ras-induced DNA damage
and subsequent senescence. Oncogene 2012, 31, 1117–1129. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
66.
Probin, V.; Wang, Y.; Zhou, D. Busulfan-induced senescence is dependent on ROS production upstream of the MAPK pathway.
Free Radic. Biol. Med. 2007, 42, 1858–1865. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
67.
Boucher, M.-J.; Jean, D.; Vézina, A.; Rivard, N. Dual role of MEK/ERK signaling in senescence and transformation of intestinal
epithelial cells. Am. J. Physiol.-Gastrointest. Liver Physiol. 2004, 286, G736–G746. [CrossRef]
68.
Gray-Schopfer, V.C.; Cheong, S.C.; Chong, H.; Chow, J.; Moss, T.; Abdel-Malek, Z.A.; Marais, R.; Wynford-Thomas, D.; Bennett,
D.C. Cellular senescence in naevi and immortalisation in melanoma: A role for p16? Br. J. Cancer 2006, 95, 496–505. [CrossRef]
69.
Tresini, M.; Lorenzini, A.; Torres, C.; Cristofalo, V.J. Modulation of Replicative Senescence of Diploid Human Cells by Nuclear
ERK Signaling. J. Biol. Chem. 2007, 282, 4136–4151. [CrossRef]
70.
Jung, S.H.; Hwang, H.J.; Kang, D.; Park, H.A.; Lee, H.C.; Jeong, D.; Lee, K.; Park, H.J.; Ko, Y.-G.; Lee, J.-S. mTOR kinase leads to
PTEN-loss-induced cellular senescence by phosphorylating p53. Oncogene 2019, 38, 1639–1650. [CrossRef]
71.
Alimonti, A.; Nardella, C.; Chen, Z.; Clohessy, J.G.; Carracedo, A.; Trotman, L.C.; Cheng, K.; Varmeh, S.; Kozma, S.C.; Thomas,
G.; et al. A novel type of cellular senescence that can be enhanced in mouse models and human tumor xenografts to suppress
prostate tumorigenesis. J. Clin. Investig. 2010, 120, 681–693. [CrossRef]
72.
Kim, Y.Y.; Jee, H.J.; Um, J.H.; Kim, Y.M.; Bae, S.S.; Yun, J. Cooperation between p21 and Akt is required for p53-dependent cellular
senescence. Aging Cell 2017, 16, 1094–1103. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
73.
Arunachalam, G.; Samuel, S.M.; Marei, I.; Ding, H.; Triggle, C.R. Metformin modulates hyperglycaemia-induced endothelial
senescence and apoptosis through SIRT1. Br. J. Pharmacol. 2014, 171, 523–535. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
74.
Kang, H.T.; Park, J.T.; Choi, K.; Kim, Y.; Choi, H.J.C.; Jung, C.W.; Lee, Y.S.; Park, S.C. Chemical screening identiﬁes ATM as a
target for alleviating senescence. Nat. Chem. Biol. 2017, 13, 616–623. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
75.
Kim, K.S.; Kang, K.W.; Seu, Y.B.; Baek, S.-H.; Kim, J.-R. Interferon-γ induces cellular senescence through p53-dependent DNA
damage signaling in human endothelial cells. Mech. Ageing Dev. 2009, 130, 179–188. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
76.
Yuan, L.; Zhai, L.; Qian, L.; Huang, D.; Ding, Y.; Xiang, H.; Liu, X.; Thompson, J.W.; Liu, J.; He, Y.-H.; et al. Switching off
IMMP2L signaling drives senescence via simultaneous metabolic alteration and blockage of cell death. Cell Res. 2018, 28, 625–643.
[CrossRef] [PubMed]
77.
Kwon, S.M.; Hong, S.M.; Lee, Y.-K.; Min, S.; Yoon, G. Metabolic features and regulation in cell senescence. BMB Rep. 2019, 52,
5–12. [CrossRef]
78.
Demaria, M.; O’Leary, M.N.; Chang, J.; Shao, L.; Liu, S.; Alimirah, F.; Koenig, K.; Le, C.; Mitin, N.; Deal, A.M.; et al. Cellular
Senescence Promotes Adverse Effects of Chemotherapy and Cancer Relapse. Cancer Discov. 2017, 7, 165–176. [CrossRef]
79.
Paez-Ribes, M.; Gonzalez-Gualda, E.; Doherty, G.J.; Munoz-Espin, D. Targeting senescent cells in translational medicine. EMBO
Mol. Med. 2019, 11, e10234. [CrossRef]
80.
Hernandez-Segura, A.; Nehme, J.; Demaria, M. Hallmarks of Cellular Senescence. Trends Cell Biol. 2018, 28, 436–453. [CrossRef]
81.
Uekawa, N.; Nishikimi, A.; Isobe, K.-i.; Iwakura, Y.; Maruyama, M. Involvement of IL-1 family proteins in p38 linked cellular
senescence of mouse embryonic ﬁbroblasts. FEBS Lett. 2004, 575, 30–34. [CrossRef]
82.
Huang, Y.H.; Chen, M.H.; Guo, Q.L.; Chen, Z.X.; Chen, Q.D.; Wang, X.Z. Interleukin-10 induces senescence of activated hepatic
stellate cells via STAT3-p53 pathway to attenuate liver ﬁbrosis. Cell Signal 2020, 66, 109445. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
83.
Kirkland, J.L.; Tchkonia, T. Clinical strategies and animal models for developing senolytic agents. Exp. Gerontol. 2015, 68, 19–25.
[CrossRef] [PubMed]
84.
Kurz, D.J.; Decary, S.; Hong, Y.; Erusalimsky, J.D. Senescence-associated (beta)-galactosidase reﬂects an increase in lysosomal
mass during replicative ageing of human endothelial cells. J. Cell Sci. 2000, 113, 3613–3622. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
85.
Wang, Y.; Liu, J.; Ma, X.; Cui, C.; Deenik, P.R.; Henderson, P.K.P.; Sigler, A.L.; Cui, L. Real-time imaging of senescence in tumors
with DNA damage. Sci. Rep. 2019, 9, 2102. [CrossRef]
86.
Liu, J.; Ma, X.; Cui, C.; Wang, Y.; Deenik, P.R.; Cui, L. A Self-Immobilizing NIR Probe for Non-invasive Imaging of Senescence.
bioRxiv 2020, 2020, 010827. [CrossRef]
87.
Basisty, N.; Kale, A.; Jeon, O.H.; Kuehnemann, C.; Payne, T.; Rao, C.; Holtz, A.; Shah, S.; Sharma, V.; Ferrucci, L.; et al. A proteomic
atlas of senescence-associated secretomes for aging biomarker development. PLoS Biol. 2020, 18, e3000599. [CrossRef]
88.
Coppe, J.P.; Desprez, P.Y.; Krtolica, A.; Campisi, J. The senescence-associated secretory phenotype: The dark side of tumor
suppression. Annu. Rev. Pathol. 2010, 5, 99–118. [CrossRef]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
35 of 42
89.
Lopes-Paciencia, S.; Saint-Germain, E.; Rowell, M.-C.; Ruiz, A.F.; Kalegari, P.; Ferbeyre, G. The senescence-associated secretory
phenotype and its regulation. Cytokine 2019, 117, 15–22. [CrossRef]
90.
Özcan, S.; Alessio, N.; Acar, M.B.; Mert, E.; Omerli, F.; Peluso, G.; Galderisi, U. Unbiased analysis of senescence associated
secretory phenotype (SASP) to identify common components following different genotoxic stresses. Aging (Albany NY) 2016, 8,
1316–1329. [CrossRef]
91.
Hoare, M.; Narita, M. Transmitting senescence to the cell neighbourhood. Nat. Cell Biol. 2013, 15, 887–889. [CrossRef]
92.
Xu, M.; Tchkonia, T.; Ding, H.; Ogrodnik, M.; Lubbers, E.R.; Pirtskhalava, T.; White, T.A.; Johnson, K.O.; Stout, M.B.; Mezera, V.;
et al. JAK inhibition alleviates the cellular senescence-associated secretory phenotype and frailty in old age. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci.
USA 2015, 112, E6301–E6310. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
93.
Malaquin, N.; Martinez, A.; Rodier, F. Keeping the senescence secretome under control: Molecular reins on the senescence-
associated secretory phenotype. Exp. Gerontol. 2016, 82, 39–49. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
94.
Huggins, C.J.; Malik, R.; Lee, S.; Salotti, J.; Thomas, S.; Martin, N.; Quiñones, O.A.; Alvord, W.G.; Olanich, M.E.; Keller, J.R.; et al.
C/EBPγ; Suppresses Senescence and Inﬂammatory Gene Expression by Heterodimerizing with C/EBPβ. Mol. Cell. Biol. 2013, 33,
3242–3258. [CrossRef]
95.
Tilstra, J.S.; Robinson, A.R.; Wang, J.; Gregg, S.Q.; Clauson, C.L.; Reay, D.P.; Nasto, L.A.; St Croix, C.M.; Usas, A.; Vo, N.; et al.
NF-κB inhibition delays DNA damage–induced senescence and aging in mice. J. Clin. Investig. 2012, 122, 2601–2612. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
96.
Wiley, C.D.; Schaum, N.; Alimirah, F.; Lopez-Dominguez, J.A.; Orjalo, A.V.; Scott, G.; Desprez, P.-Y.; Benz, C.; Davalos, A.R.;
Campisi, J. Small-molecule MDM2 antagonists attenuate the senescence-associated secretory phenotype. Sci. Rep. 2018, 8, 2410.
[CrossRef] [PubMed]
97.
Wang, W.; Qin, J.-J.; Rajaei, M.; Li, X.; Yu, X.; Hunt, C.; Zhang, R. Targeting MDM2 for novel molecular therapy: Beyond oncology.
Med. Res. Rev. 2020, 40, 856–880. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
98.
Watanabe, S.; Kawamoto, S.; Ohtani, N.; Hara, E. Impact of senescence-associated secretory phenotype and its potential as a
therapeutic target for senescence-associated diseases. Cancer Sci. 2017, 108, 563–569. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
99.
Orjalo, A.V.; Bhaumik, D.; Gengler, B.K.; Scott, G.K.; Campisi, J. Cell surface-bound IL-1alpha is an upstream regulator of the
senescence-associated IL-6/IL-8 cytokine network. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. USA 2009, 106, 17031–17036. [CrossRef]
100. Sadaie, M.; Salama, R.; Carroll, T.; Tomimatsu, K.; Chandra, T.; Young, A.R.; Narita, M.; Pérez-Mancera, P.A.; Bennett, D.C.;
Chong, H.; et al. Redistribution of the Lamin B1 genomic binding proﬁle affects rearrangement of heterochromatic domains and
SAHF formation during senescence. Genes. Dev. 2013, 27, 1800–1808. [CrossRef]
101. Rai, T.S.; Cole, J.J.; Nelson, D.M.; Dikovskaya, D.; Faller, W.J.; Vizioli, M.G.; Hewitt, R.N.; Anannya, O.; McBryan, T.; Manoharan,
I.; et al. HIRA orchestrates a dynamic chromatin landscape in senescence and is required for suppression of neoplasia. Genes. Dev.
2014, 28, 2712–2725. [CrossRef]
102. Hayakawa, T.; Iwai, M.; Aoki, S.; Takimoto, K.; Maruyama, M.; Maruyama, W.; Motoyama, N. SIRT1 Suppresses the Senescence-
Associated Secretory Phenotype through Epigenetic Gene Regulation. PLoS ONE 2015, 10, e0116480. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
103. Capell, B.C.; Drake, A.M.; Zhu, J.; Shah, P.P.; Dou, Z.; Dorsey, J.; Simola, D.F.; Donahue, G.; Sammons, M.; Rai, T.S.; et al. MLL1 is
essential for the senescence-associated secretory phenotype. Genes. Dev. 2016, 30, 321–336. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
104. Montes, M.; Lubas, M.; Arendrup, F.S.; Mentz, B.; Rohatgi, N.; Tumas, S.; Harder, L.M.; Skanderup, A.J.; Andersen, J.S.; Lund,
A.H. The long non-coding RNA MIR31HG regulates the senescence associated secretory phenotype. Nat. Commun. 2021, 12, 2459.
[CrossRef]
105. Jiang, J.; Hu, H.; Chen, Q.; Zhang, Y.; Chen, W.; Huang, Q.; Chen, X.; Li, J.; Zhong, M. Long non-coding RNA SNHG29 regulates
cell senescence via p53/p21 signaling in spontaneous preterm birth. Placenta 2021, 103, 64–71. [CrossRef]
106. De Cecco, M.; Ito, T.; Petrashen, A.P.; Elias, A.E.; Skvir, N.J.; Criscione, S.W.; Caligiana, A.; Brocculi, G.; Adney, E.M.; Boeke, J.D.;
et al. L1 drives IFN in senescent cells and promotes age-associated inﬂammation. Nature 2019, 566, 73–78. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
107. Simon, M.; Van Meter, M.; Ablaeva, J.; Ke, Z.; Gonzalez, R.S.; Taguchi, T.; De Cecco, M.; Leonova, K.I.; Kogan, V.; Helfand, S.L.;
et al. LINE1 Derepression in Aged Wild-Type and SIRT6-Deﬁcient Mice Drives Inﬂammation. Cell Metab. 2019, 29, 871–885.e5.
[CrossRef]
108. Wiggins, K.A.; Parry, A.J.; Cassidy, L.D.; Humphry, M.; Webster, S.J.; Goodall, J.C.; Narita, M.; Clarke, M.C.H. IL-1α cleavage by
inﬂammatory caspases of the noncanonical inﬂammasome controls the senescence-associated secretory phenotype. Aging Cell
2019, 18, e12946. [CrossRef]
109. Laberge, R.M.; Sun, Y.; Orjalo, A.V.; Patil, C.K.; Freund, A.; Zhou, L.; Curran, S.C.; Davalos, A.R.; Wilson-Edell, K.A.; Liu, S.; et al.
MTOR regulates the pro-tumorigenic senescence-associated secretory phenotype by promoting IL1A translation. Nat. Cell Biol.
2015, 17, 1049–1061. [CrossRef]
110. Bhaumik, D.; Scott, G.K.; Schokrpur, S.; Patil, C.K.; Orjalo, A.V.; Rodier, F.; Lithgow, G.J.; Campisi, J. MicroRNAs miR-146a/b
negatively modulate the senescence-associated inﬂammatory mediators IL-6 and IL-8. Aging (Albany NY) 2009, 1, 402–411.
[CrossRef]
111. Wissler Gerdes, E.O.; Zhu, Y.; Tchkonia, T.; Kirkland, J.L. Discovery, development, and future application of senolytics: Theories
and predictions. FEBS J. 2020, 287, 2418–2427. [CrossRef]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
36 of 42
112. Wagner, M.; Hampel, B.; Bernhard, D.; Hala, M.; Zwerschke, W.; Jansen-Dürr, P. Replicative senescence of human endothelial cells
in vitro involves G1 arrest, polyploidization and senescence-associated apoptosis. Exp. Gerontol. 2001, 36, 1327–1347. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
113. Schmitt, E.; Paquet, C.; Beauchemin, M.; Bertrand, R. DNA-damage response network at the crossroads of cell-cycle checkpoints,
cellular senescence and apoptosis. J. Zhejiang Univ. Sci. B 2007, 8, 377–397. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
114. Hubackova, S.; Davidova, E.; Rohlenova, K.; Stursa, J.; Werner, L.; Andera, L.; Dong, L.; Terp, M.G.; Hodny, Z.; Ditzel, H.J.; et al.
Selective elimination of senescent cells by mitochondrial targeting is regulated by ANT2. Cell Death Differ. 2019, 26, 276–290.
[CrossRef] [PubMed]
115. Freund, A.; Laberge, R.-M.; Demaria, M.; Campisi, J. Lamin B1 loss is a senescence-associated biomarker. Mol. Biol. Cell 2012, 23,
2066–2075. [CrossRef]
116. Sati, S.; Bonev, B.; Szabo, Q.; Jost, D.; Bensadoun, P.; Serra, F.; Loubiere, V.; Papadopoulos, G.L.; Rivera-Mulia, J.C.; Fritsch, L.; et al.
4D Genome Rewiring during Oncogene-Induced and Replicative Senescence. Mol. Cell 2020, 78, 522–538.e9. [CrossRef]
117. Boumendil, C.; Hari, P.; Olsen, K.C.F.; Acosta, J.C.; Bickmore, W.A. Nuclear pore density controls heterochromatin reorganization
during senescence. Genes. Dev. 2019, 33, 144–149. [CrossRef]
118. Rodier, F.; Muñoz, D.P.; Teachenor, R.; Chu, V.; Le, O.; Bhaumik, D.; Coppé, J.-P.; Campeau, E.; Beauséjour, C.M.; Kim, S.-H.; et al.
DNA-SCARS: Distinct nuclear structures that sustain damage-induced senescence growth arrest and inﬂammatory cytokine
secretion. J. Cell Sci. 2011, 124, 68–81. [CrossRef]
119. Georgakopoulou, E.A.; Tsimaratou, K.; Evangelou, K.; Fernandez Marcos, P.J.; Zoumpourlis, V.; Trougakos, I.P.; Kletsas, D.;
Bartek, J.; Serrano, M.; Gorgoulis, V.G. Speciﬁc lipofuscin staining as a novel biomarker to detect replicative and stress-induced
senescence. A method applicable in cryo-preserved and archival tissues. Aging (Albany NY) 2013, 5, 37–50. [CrossRef]
120. Hildebrand, D.G.; Lehle, S.; Borst, A.; Haferkamp, S.; Essmann, F.; Schulze-Osthoff, K. α-Fucosidase as a novel convenient
biomarker for cellular senescence. Cell Cycle 2013, 12, 1922–1927. [CrossRef]
121. Frescas, D.; Roux, C.M.; Aygun-Sunar, S.; Gleiberman, A.S.; Krasnov, P.; Kurnasov, O.V.; Strom, E.; Virtuoso, L.P.; Wrobel, M.;
Osterman, A.L.; et al. Senescent cells expose and secrete an oxidized form of membrane-bound vimentin as revealed by a natural
polyreactive antibody. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. USA 2017, 114, E1668–E1677. [CrossRef]
122. Kim, K.M.; Noh, J.H.; Bodogai, M.; Martindale, J.L.; Yang, X.; Indig, F.E.; Basu, S.K.; Ohnuma, K.; Morimoto, C.; Johnson, P.F.; et al.
Identiﬁcation of senescent cell surface targetable protein DPP4. Genes. Dev. 2017, 31, 1529–1534. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
123. Mills, K.F.; Yoshida, S.; Stein, L.R.; Grozio, A.; Kubota, S.; Sasaki, Y.; Redpath, P.; Migaud, M.E.; Apte, R.S.; Uchida, K.; et al.
Long-Term Administration of Nicotinamide Mononucleotide Mitigates Age-Associated Physiological Decline in Mice. Cell Metab.
2016, 24, 795–806. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
124. Zhang, H.; Ryu, D.; Wu, Y.; Gariani, K.; Wang, X.; Luan, P.; D’Amico, D.; Ropelle, E.R.; Lutolf, M.P.; Aebersold, R.; et al. NAD(+)
repletion improves mitochondrial and stem cell function and enhances life span in mice. Science 2016, 352, 1436–1443. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
125. Das, A.; Huang, G.X.; Bonkowski, M.S.; Longchamp, A.; Li, C.; Schultz, M.B.; Kim, L.J.; Osborne, B.; Joshi, S.; Lu, Y.; et al.
Impairment of an Endothelial NAD(+)-H2S Signaling Network Is a Reversible Cause of Vascular Aging. Cell 2018, 173, 74–89.e20.
[CrossRef]
126. Irie, J.; Inagaki, E.; Fujita, M.; Nakaya, H.; Mitsuishi, M.; Yamaguchi, S.; Yamashita, K.; Shigaki, S.; Ono, T.; Yukioka, H.; et al.
Effect of oral administration of nicotinamide mononucleotide on clinical parameters and nicotinamide metabolite levels in healthy
Japanese men. Endocr. J. 2020, 67, 153–160. [CrossRef]
127. Latorre, E.; Torregrossa, R.; Wood, M.E.; Whiteman, M.; Harries, L.W. Mitochondria-targeted hydrogen sulﬁde attenuates
endothelial senescence by selective induction of splicing factors HNRNPD and SRSF2. Aging (Albany NY) 2018, 10, 1666–1681.
[CrossRef]
128. Roberts, M.N.; Wallace, M.A.; Tomilov, A.A.; Zhou, Z.; Marcotte, G.R.; Tran, D.; Perez, G.; Gutierrez-Casado, E.; Koike, S.; Knotts,
T.A.; et al. A Ketogenic Diet Extends Longevity and Healthspan in Adult Mice. Cell Metab. 2017, 26, 539–546.e5. [CrossRef]
129. Newman, J.C.; Covarrubias, A.J.; Zhao, M.; Yu, X.; Gut, P.; Ng, C.P.; Huang, Y.; Haldar, S.; Verdin, E. Ketogenic Diet Reduces
Midlife Mortality and Improves Memory in Aging Mice. Cell Metab. 2017, 26, 547–557.e8. [CrossRef]
130. de Cabo, R.; Mattson, M.P. Effects of Intermittent Fasting on Health, Aging, and Disease. N. Engl. J. Med. 2019, 381, 2541–2551.
[CrossRef]
131. Sleiman, S.F.; Henry, J.; Al-Haddad, R.; El Hayek, L.; Abou Haidar, E.; Stringer, T.; Ulja, D.; Karuppagounder, S.S.; Holson, E.B.;
Ratan, R.R.; et al. Exercise promotes the expression of brain derived neurotrophic factor (BDNF) through the action of the ketone
body beta-hydroxybutyrate. Elife 2016, 5, e15092. [CrossRef]
132. Han, Y.M.; Bedarida, T.; Ding, Y.; Somba, B.K.; Lu, Q.; Wang, Q.; Song, P.; Zou, M.H. beta-Hydroxybutyrate Prevents Vascular
Senescence through hnRNP A1-Mediated Upregulation of Oct4. Mol. Cell 2018, 71, 1064–1078.e5. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
133. Youm, Y.H.; Nguyen, K.Y.; Grant, R.W.; Goldberg, E.L.; Bodogai, M.; Kim, D.; D’Agostino, D.; Planavsky, N.; Lupfer, C.;
Kanneganti, T.D.; et al. The ketone metabolite beta-hydroxybutyrate blocks NLRP3 inﬂammasome-mediated inﬂammatory
disease. Nat. Med. 2015, 21, 263–269. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
37 of 42
134. Zhang, H.; Tang, K.; Ma, J.; Zhou, L.; Liu, J.; Zeng, L.; Zhu, L.; Xu, P.; Chen, J.; Wei, K.; et al. Ketogenesis-generated beta-
hydroxybutyrate is an epigenetic regulator of CD8(+) T-cell memory development. Nat. Cell Biol. 2020, 22, 18–25. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
135. Lapasset, L.; Milhavet, O.; Prieur, A.; Besnard, E.; Babled, A.; Aït-Hamou, N.; Leschik, J.; Pellestor, F.; Ramirez, J.M.; De Vos, J.;
et al. Rejuvenating senescent and centenarian human cells by reprogramming through the pluripotent state. Genes. Dev. 2011, 25,
2248–2253. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
136. Jaskelioff, M.; Muller, F.L.; Paik, J.H.; Thomas, E.; Jiang, S.; Adams, A.C.; Sahin, E.; Kost-Alimova, M.; Protopopov, A.; Cadinanos,
J.; et al. Telomerase reactivation reverses tissue degeneration in aged telomerase-deﬁcient mice. Nature 2011, 469, 102–106.
[CrossRef]
137. Bernardes de Jesus, B.; Vera, E.; Schneeberger, K.; Tejera, A.M.; Ayuso, E.; Bosch, F.; Blasco, M.A. Telomerase gene therapy in
adult and old mice delays aging and increases longevity without increasing cancer. EMBO Mol. Med. 2012, 4, 691–704. [CrossRef]
138. Jaijyan, D.K.; Selariu, A.; Cruz-Cosme, R.; Tong, M.; Yang, S.; Stefa, A.; Kekich, D.; Sadoshima, J.; Herbig, U.; Tang, Q.; et al. New
intranasal and injectable gene therapy for healthy life extension. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. USA 2022, 119, e2121499119. [CrossRef]
139. Sarkar, T.J.; Quarta, M.; Mukherjee, S.; Colville, A.; Paine, P.; Doan, L.; Tran, C.M.; Chu, C.R.; Horvath, S.; Qi, L.S.; et al. Transient
non-integrative expression of nuclear reprogramming factors promotes multifaceted amelioration of aging in human cells. Nat.
Commun. 2020, 11, 1545. [CrossRef]
140. Ocampo, A.; Reddy, P.; Martinez-Redondo, P.; Platero-Luengo, A.; Hatanaka, F.; Hishida, T.; Li, M.; Lam, D.; Kurita, M.;
Beyret, E.; et al. In Vivo Amelioration of Age-Associated Hallmarks by Partial Reprogramming. Cell 2016, 167, 1719–1733.e12.
[CrossRef]
141. Alle, Q.; Le Borgne, E.; Bensadoun, P.; Lemey, C.; Béchir, N.; Gabanou, M.; Estermann, F.; Bertrand-Gaday, C.; Pessemesse,
L.; Toupet, K.; et al. A single short reprogramming early in life initiates and propagates an epigenetically related mechanism
improving ﬁtness and promoting an increased healthy lifespan. Aging Cell 2022, 21, e13714. [CrossRef]
142. Milhavet, O.; Lemaitre, J.M. Single short reprogramming early in life increases healthspan. Aging (Albany NY) 2022, 14, 9779–9781.
[CrossRef] [PubMed]
143. Coppe, J.P.; Rodier, F.; Patil, C.K.; Freund, A.; Desprez, P.Y.; Campisi, J. Tumor suppressor and aging biomarker p16(INK4a)
induces cellular senescence without the associated inﬂammatory secretory phenotype. J. Biol. Chem. 2011, 286, 36396–36403.
[CrossRef] [PubMed]
144. Acosta, J.C.; O’Loghlen, A.; Banito, A.; Guijarro, M.V.; Augert, A.; Raguz, S.; Fumagalli, M.; Da Costa, M.; Brown, C.;
Popov, N.; et al. Chemokine signaling via the CXCR2 receptor reinforces senescence. Cell 2008, 133, 1006–1018. [CrossRef]
145. Coppe, J.P.; Patil, C.K.; Rodier, F.; Krtolica, A.; Beausejour, C.M.; Parrinello, S.; Hodgson, J.G.; Chin, K.; Desprez, P.Y.; Campisi, J.
A human-like senescence-associated secretory phenotype is conserved in mouse cells dependent on physiological oxygen. PLoS
ONE 2010, 5, e9188. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
146. Kuilman, T.; Michaloglou, C.; Vredeveld, L.C.; Douma, S.; van Doorn, R.; Desmet, C.J.; Aarden, L.A.; Mooi, W.J.; Peeper, D.S.
Oncogene-induced senescence relayed by an interleukin-dependent inﬂammatory network. Cell 2008, 133, 1019–1031. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
147. Hong, D.S.; Angelo, L.S.; Kurzrock, R. Interleukin-6 and its receptor in cancer: Implications for translational therapeutics. Cancer
2007, 110, 1911–1928. [CrossRef]
148. Anestakis, D.; Petanidis, S.; Kalyvas, S.; Nday, C.M.; Tsave, O.; Kioseoglou, E.; Salifoglou, A. Mechanisms and applications of
interleukins in cancer immunotherapy. Int. J. Mol. Sci. 2015, 16, 1691–1710. [CrossRef]
149. Perez-Mancera, P.A.; Young, A.R.; Narita, M. Inside and out: The activities of senescence in cancer. Nat. Rev. Cancer 2014, 14,
547–558. [CrossRef]
150. Gonzalez-Meljem, J.M.; Apps, J.R.; Fraser, H.C.; Martinez-Barbera, J.P. Paracrine roles of cellular senescence in promoting
tumourigenesis. Br. J. Cancer 2018, 118, 1283–1288. [CrossRef]
151. Lee, S.; Schmitt, C.A. The dynamic nature of senescence in cancer. Nat. Cell Biol. 2019, 21, 94–101. [CrossRef]
152. Faget, D.V.; Ren, Q.; Stewart, S.A. Unmasking senescence: Context-dependent effects of SASP in cancer. Nat. Rev. Cancer 2019, 19,
439–453. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
153. Salminen, A.; Kauppinen, A.; Kaarniranta, K. Emerging role of NF-kappaB signaling in the induction of senescence-associated
secretory phenotype (SASP). Cell Signal 2012, 24, 835–845. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
154. Chien, Y.; Scuoppo, C.; Wang, X.; Fang, X.; Balgley, B.; Bolden, J.E.; Premiered, P.; Luo, W.; Chicas, A.; Lee, C.S.; et al. Control of
the senescence-associated secretory phenotype by NF-kappaB promotes senescence and enhances chemosensitivity. Genes. Dev.
2011, 25, 2125–2136. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
155. Freund, A.; Orjalo, A.V.; Desprez, P.Y.; Campisi, J. Inﬂammatory networks during cellular senescence: Causes and consequences.
Trends Mol. Med. 2010, 16, 238–246. [CrossRef]
156. Moiseeva, O.; Deschenes-Simard, X.; St-Germain, E.; Igelmann, S.; Huot, G.; Cadar, A.E.; Bourdeau, V.; Pollak, M.N.; Ferbeyre, G.
Metformin inhibits the senescence-associated secretory phenotype by interfering with IKK/NF-kappaB activation. Aging Cell
2013, 12, 489–498. [CrossRef]
157. Martin-Montalvo, A.; Mercken, E.M.; Mitchell, S.J.; Palacios, H.H.; Mote, P.L.; Scheibye-Knudsen, M.; Gomes, A.P.; Ward, T.M.;
Minor, R.K.; Blouin, M.J.; et al. Metformin improves healthspan and lifespan in mice. Nat. Commun. 2013, 4, 2192. [CrossRef]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
38 of 42
158. Campbell, J.M.; Bellman, S.M.; Stephenson, M.D.; Lisy, K. Metformin reduces all-cause mortality and diseases of ageing
independent of its effect on diabetes control: A systematic review and meta-analysis. Ageing Res. Rev. 2017, 40, 31–44. [CrossRef]
159. Barzilai, N.; Crandall, J.P.; Kritchevsky, S.B.; Espeland, M.A. Metformin as a Tool to Target Aging. Cell Metab. 2016, 23, 1060–1065.
[CrossRef]
160. Lamming, D.W.; Ye, L.; Sabatini, D.M.; Baur, J.A. Rapalogs and mTOR inhibitors as anti-aging therapeutics. J. Clin. Investig. 2013,
123, 980–989. [CrossRef]
161. Leontieva, O.V.; Demidenko, Z.N.; Blagosklonny, M.V. Dual mTORC1/C2 inhibitors suppress cellular geroconversion (a
senescence program). Oncotarget 2015, 6, 23238–23248. [CrossRef]
162. Herranz, N.; Gallage, S.; Mellone, M.; Wuestefeld, T.; Klotz, S.; Hanley, C.J.; Raguz, S.; Acosta, J.C.; Innes, A.J.; Banito, A.; et al.
mTOR regulates MAPKAPK2 translation to control the senescence-associated secretory phenotype. Nat. Cell Biol. 2015, 17,
1205–1217. [CrossRef]
163. Imrali, A.; Mao, X.; Yeste-Velasco, M.; Shamash, J.; Lu, Y. Rapamycin inhibits prostate cancer cell growth through cyclin D1 and
enhances the cytotoxic efﬁcacy of cisplatin. Am. J. Cancer Res. 2016, 6, 1772–1784.
164. Wang, R.; Yu, Z.; Sunchu, B.; Shoaf, J.; Dang, I.; Zhao, S.; Caples, K.; Bradley, L.; Beaver, L.M.; Ho, E.; et al. Rapamycin inhibits the
secretory phenotype of senescent cells by a Nrf2-independent mechanism. Aging Cell 2017, 16, 564–574. [CrossRef]
165. Freund, A.; Patil, C.K.; Campisi, J. p38MAPK is a novel DNA damage response-independent regulator of the senescence-associated
secretory phenotype. Embo J 2011, 30, 1536–1548. [CrossRef]
166. Alimbetov, D.; Davis, T.; Brook, A.J.; Cox, L.S.; Faragher, R.G.; Nurgozhin, T.; Zhumadilov, Z.; Kipling, D. Suppression of the
senescence-associated secretory phenotype (SASP) in human ﬁbroblasts using small molecule inhibitors of p38 MAP kinase and
MK2. Biogerontology 2016, 17, 305–315. [CrossRef]
167. Niehof, M.; Streetz, K.; Rakemann, T.; Bischoff, S.C.; Manns, M.P.; Horn, F.; Trautwein, C. Interleukin-6-induced tethering of
STAT3 to the LAP/C/EBPbeta promoter suggests a new mechanism of transcriptional regulation by STAT3. J. Biol. Chem. 2001,
276, 9016–9027. [CrossRef]
168. Borghesan, M.; Faﬁan-Labora, J.; Eleftheriadou, O.; Carpintero-Fernandez, P.; Paez-Ribes, M.; Vizcay-Barrena, G.; Swisa, A.;
Kolodkin-Gal, D.; Ximenez-Embun, P.; Lowe, R.; et al. Small Extracellular Vesicles Are Key Regulators of Non-cell Autonomous
Intercellular Communication in Senescence via the Interferon Protein IFITM3. Cell Rep. 2019, 27, 3956–3971.e6. [CrossRef]
169. Xu, D.; Tahara, H. The role of exosomes and microRNAs in senescence and aging. Adv. Drug Deliv. Rev. 2013, 65, 368–375.
[CrossRef]
170. Urbanelli, L.; Buratta, S.; Sagini, K.; Tancini, B.; Emiliani, C. Extracellular Vesicles as New Players in Cellular Senescence. Int. J.
Mol. Sci. 2016, 17, 1408. [CrossRef]
171. Takasugi, M.; Okada, R.; Takahashi, A.; Virya Chen, D.; Watanabe, S.; Hara, E. Small extracellular vesicles secreted from senescent
cells promote cancer cell proliferation through EphA2. Nat. Commun. 2017, 8, 15729. [CrossRef]
172. Li, T.; Chen, Z.J. The cGAS-cGAMP-STING pathway connects DNA damage to inﬂammation, senescence, and cancer. J. Exp. Med.
2018, 215, 1287–1299. [CrossRef]
173. Zhang, Q.; Lenardo, M.J.; Baltimore, D. 30 Years of NF-kappaB: A Blossoming of Relevance to Human Pathobiology. Cell 2017,
168, 37–57. [CrossRef]
174. Karkera, J.; Steiner, H.; Li, W.; Skradski, V.; Moser, P.L.; Riethdorf, S.; Reddy, M.; Puchalski, T.; Safer, K.; Prabhakar, U.; et al. The
anti-interleukin-6 antibody siltuximab down-regulates genes implicated in tumorigenesis in prostate cancer patients from a phase
I study. Prostate 2011, 71, 1455–1465. [CrossRef]
175. van Rhee, F.; Wong, R.S.; Munshi, N.; Rossi, J.F.; Ke, X.Y.; Fossa, A.; Simpson, D.; Capra, M.; Liu, T.; Hsieh, R.K.; et al. Siltuximab
for multicentric Castleman’s disease: A randomised, double-blind, placebo-controlled trial. Lancet Oncol. 2014, 15, 966–974.
[CrossRef]
176. Emery, P.; Keystone, E.; Tony, H.P.; Cantagrel, A.; van Vollenhoven, R.; Sanchez, A.; Alecock, E.; Lee, J.; Kremer, J. IL-6 receptor
inhibition with tocilizumab improves treatment outcomes in patients with rheumatoid arthritis refractory to anti-tumour necrosis
factor biologicals: Results from a 24-week multicentre randomised placebo-controlled trial. Ann. Rheum. Dis. 2008, 67, 1516–1523.
[CrossRef]
177. Khan, S.S.; Shah, S.J.; Klyachko, E.; Baldridge, A.S.; Eren, M.; Place, A.T.; Aviv, A.; Puterman, E.; Lloyd-Jones, D.M.;
Heiman, M.; et al. A null mutation in SERPINE1 protects against biological aging in humans. Sci. Adv. 2017, 3, eaao1617.
[CrossRef]
178. Eren, M.; Boe, A.E.; Murphy, S.B.; Place, A.T.; Nagpal, V.; Morales-Nebreda, L.; Urich, D.; Quaggin, S.E.; Budinger, G.R.; Mutlu,
G.M.; et al. PAI-1-regulated extracellular proteolysis governs senescence and survival in Klotho mice. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. USA
2014, 111, 7090–7095. [CrossRef]
179. Collado, M.; Serrano, M. Senescence in tumours: Evidence from mice and humans. Nat. Rev. Cancer 2010, 10, 51–57. [CrossRef]
180. Sharpless, N.E.; Sherr, C.J. Forging a signature of in vivo senescence. Nat. Rev. Cancer 2015, 15, 397–408. [CrossRef]
181. Agostini, A.; Mondragon, L.; Bernardos, A.; Martinez-Manez, R.; Marcos, M.D.; Sancenon, F.; Soto, J.; Costero, A.; Manguan-
Garcia, C.; Perona, R.; et al. Targeted cargo delivery in senescent cells using capped mesoporous silica nanoparticles. Angew.
Chem. Int. Ed. Engl. 2012, 51, 10556–10560. [CrossRef]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
39 of 42
182. Hall, B.M.; Balan, V.; Gleiberman, A.S.; Strom, E.; Krasnov, P.; Virtuoso, L.P.; Rydkina, E.; Vujcic, S.; Balan, K.; Gitlin, I.; et al.
Aging of mice is associated with p16(Ink4a)- and beta-galactosidase-positive macrophage accumulation that can be induced in
young mice by senescent cells. Aging (Albany NY) 2016, 8, 1294–1315. [CrossRef]
183. Singh, M.; Piekorz, R.P. Senescence-associated lysosomal alpha-L-fucosidase (SA-alpha-Fuc): A sensitive and more robust
biomarker for cellular senescence beyond SA-beta-Gal. Cell Cycle 2013, 12, 1996. [CrossRef]
184. Thapa, R.K.; Nguyen, H.T.; Jeong, J.H.; Kim, J.R.; Choi, H.G.; Yong, C.S.; Kim, J.O. Progressive slowdown/prevention of cellular
senescence by CD9-targeted delivery of rapamycin using lactose-wrapped calcium carbonate nanoparticles. Sci. Rep. 2017, 7,
43299. [CrossRef]
185. Han, B.; Park, D.; Li, R.; Xie, M.; Owonikoko, T.K.; Zhang, G.; Sica, G.L.; Ding, C.; Zhou, J.; Magis, A.T.; et al. Small-Molecule Bcl2
BH4 Antagonist for Lung Cancer Therapy. Cancer Cell 2015, 27, 852–863. [CrossRef]
186. Fuhrmann-Stroissnigg, H.; Ling, Y.Y.; Zhao, J.; McGowan, S.J.; Zhu, Y.; Brooks, R.W.; Grassi, D.; Gregg, S.Q.; Stripay, J.L.;
Dorronsoro, A.; et al. Identiﬁcation of HSP90 inhibitors as a novel class of senolytics. Nat. Commun. 2017, 8, 422. [CrossRef]
187. Karkoulis, P.K.; Stravopodis, D.J.; Konstantakou, E.G.; Voutsinas, G.E. Targeted inhibition of heat shock protein 90 disrupts
multiple oncogenic signaling pathways, thus inducing cell cycle arrest and programmed cell death in human urinary bladder
cancer cell lines. Cancer Cell Int. 2013, 13, 11. [CrossRef]
188. Sato, S.; Fujita, N.; Tsuruo, T. Modulation of Akt kinase activity by binding to Hsp90. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. USA 2000, 97,
10832–10837. [CrossRef]
189. Astle, M.V.; Hannan, K.M.; Ng, P.Y.; Lee, R.S.; George, A.J.; Hsu, A.K.; Haupt, Y.; Hannan, R.D.; Pearson, R.B. AKT induces
senescence in human cells via mTORC1 and p53 in the absence of DNA damage: Implications for targeting mTOR during
malignancy. Oncogene 2012, 31, 1949–1962. [CrossRef]
190. Deschenes-Simard, X.; Gaumont-Leclerc, M.F.; Bourdeau, V.; Lessard, F.; Moiseeva, O.; Forest, V.; Igelmann, S.; Mallette, F.A.;
Saba-El-Leil, M.K.; Meloche, S.; et al. Tumor suppressor activity of the ERK/MAPK pathway by promoting selective protein
degradation. Genes. Dev. 2013, 27, 900–915. [CrossRef]
191. Trepel, J.; Mollapour, M.; Giaccone, G.; Neckers, L. Targeting the dynamic HSP90 complex in cancer. Nat. Rev. Cancer 2010, 10,
537–549. [CrossRef]
192. Dorr, J.R.; Yu, Y.; Milanovic, M.; Beuster, G.; Zasada, C.; Dabritz, J.H.; Lisec, J.; Lenze, D.; Gerhardt, A.; Schleicher, K.; et al.
Synthetic lethal metabolic targeting of cellular senescence in cancer therapy. Nature 2013, 501, 421–425. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
193. Soto-Gamez, A.; Quax, W.J.; Demaria, M. Regulation of Survival Networks in Senescent Cells: From Mechanisms to Interventions.
J. Mol. Biol. 2019, 431, 2629–2643. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
194. Kastenhuber, E.R.; Lowe, S.W. Putting p53 in Context. Cell 2017, 170, 1062–1078. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
195. Shay, J.W.; Pereira-Smith, O.M.; Wright, W.E. A role for both RB and p53 in the regulation of human cellular senescence. Exp. Cell
Res. 1991, 196, 33–39. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
196. Di Micco, R.; Fumagalli, M.; Cicalese, A.; Piccinin, S.; Gasparini, P.; Luise, C.; Schurra, C.; Garre, M.; Nuciforo, P.G.;
Bensimon, A.; et al. Oncogene-induced senescence is a DNA damage response triggered by DNA hyper-replication. Nature 2006,
444, 638–642. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
197. Yosef, R.; Pilpel, N.; Papismadov, N.; Gal, H.; Ovadya, Y.; Vadai, E.; Miller, S.; Porat, Z.; Ben-Dor, S.; Krizhanovsky, V. p21
maintains senescent cell viability under persistent DNA damage response by restraining JNK and caspase signaling. EMBO J.
2017, 36, 2280–2295. [CrossRef]
198. Baar, M.P.; Brandt, R.M.C.; Putavet, D.A.; Klein, J.D.D.; Derks, K.W.J.; Bourgeois, B.R.M.; Stryeck, S.; Rijksen, Y.; van Willigenburg,
H.; Feijtel, D.A.; et al. Targeted Apoptosis of Senescent Cells Restores Tissue Homeostasis in Response to Chemotoxicity and
Aging. Cell 2017, 169, 132–147.e16. [CrossRef]
199. Wang, F.; Marshall, C.B.; Yamamoto, K.; Li, G.Y.; Plevin, M.J.; You, H.; Mak, T.W.; Ikura, M. Biochemical and structural
characterization of an intramolecular interaction in FOXO3a and its binding with p53. J. Mol. Biol. 2008, 384, 590–603. [CrossRef]
200. Singh, R.; Letai, A.; Sarosiek, K. Regulation of apoptosis in health and disease: The balancing act of BCL-2 family proteins. Nat.
Rev. Mol. Cell Biol. 2019, 20, 175–193. [CrossRef]
201. Zhu, Y.; Tchkonia, T.; Fuhrmann-Stroissnigg, H.; Dai, H.M.; Ling, Y.Y.; Stout, M.B.; Pirtskhalava, T.; Giorgadze, N.; Johnson, K.O.;
Giles, C.B.; et al. Identiﬁcation of a novel senolytic agent, navitoclax, targeting the Bcl-2 family of anti-apoptotic factors. Aging
Cell 2016, 15, 428–435. [CrossRef]
202. Kim, H.N.; Chang, J.; Shao, L.; Han, L.; Iyer, S.; Manolagas, S.C.; O’Brien, C.A.; Jilka, R.L.; Zhou, D.; Almeida, M. DNA damage
and senescence in osteoprogenitors expressing Osx1 may cause their decrease with age. Aging Cell 2017, 16, 693–703. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
203. Cang, S.; Iragavarapu, C.; Savooji, J.; Song, Y.; Liu, D. ABT-199 (venetoclax) and BCL-2 inhibitors in clinical development. J.
Hematol. Oncol. 2015, 8, 129. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
204. Zhu, Y.; Doornebal, E.J.; Pirtskhalava, T.; Giorgadze, N.; Wentworth, M.; Fuhrmann-Stroissnigg, H.; Niedernhofer, L.J.; Robbins,
P.D.; Tchkonia, T.; Kirkland, J.L. New agents that target senescent cells: The ﬂavone, ﬁsetin, and the BCL-XL inhibitors, A1331852
and A1155463. Aging (Albany NY) 2017, 9, 955–963. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
205. Liu, Z.; Wild, C.; Ding, Y.; Ye, N.; Chen, H.; Wold, E.A.; Zhou, J. BH4 domain of Bcl-2 as a novel target for cancer therapy. Drug
Discov. Today 2016, 21, 989–996. [CrossRef]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
40 of 42
206. Troiani, M.; Colucci, M.; D’Ambrosio, M.; Guccini, I.; Pasquini, E.; Varesi, A.; Valdata, A.; Mosole, S.; Revandkar, A.; Attanasio,
G.; et al. Single-cell transcriptomics identiﬁes Mcl-1 as a target for senolytic therapy in cancer. Nat. Commun. 2022, 13, 2177.
[CrossRef]
207. Karlsson, H.; Lindqvist, A.C.; Fransson, M.; Paul-Wetterberg, G.; Nilsson, B.; Essand, M.; Nilsson, K.; Frisk, P.; Jernberg-Wiklund,
H.; Loskog, A. Combining CAR T cells and the Bcl-2 family apoptosis inhibitor ABT-737 for treating B-cell malignancy. Cancer
Gene Ther. 2013, 20, 386–393. [CrossRef]
208. Amor, C.; Feucht, J.; Leibold, J.; Ho, Y.J.; Zhu, C.; Alonso-Curbelo, D.; Mansilla-Soto, J.; Boyer, J.A.; Li, X.; Giavridis, T.; et al.
Senolytic CAR T cells reverse senescence-associated pathologies. Nature 2020, 583, 127–132. [CrossRef]
209. Leverson, J.D.; Phillips, D.C.; Mitten, M.J.; Boghaert, E.R.; Diaz, D.; Tahir, S.K.; Belmont, L.D.; Nimmer, P.; Xiao, Y.; Ma, X.M.; et al.
Exploiting selective BCL-2 family inhibitors to dissect cell survival dependencies and deﬁne improved strategies for cancer
therapy. Sci. Transl. Med. 2015, 7, 279ra240. [CrossRef]
210. Wang, Y.; Chang, J.; Liu, X.; Zhang, X.; Zhang, S.; Zhang, X.; Zhou, D.; Zheng, G. Discovery of piperlongumine as a potential
novel lead for the development of senolytic agents. Aging (Albany NY) 2016, 8, 2915–2926. [CrossRef]
211. Samaraweera, L.; Adomako, A.; Rodriguez-Gabin, A.; McDaid, H.M. A Novel Indication for Panobinostat as a Senolytic Drug in
NSCLC and HNSCC. Sci. Rep. 2017, 7, 1900. [CrossRef]
212. Guerrero, A.; Herranz, N.; Sun, B.; Wagner, V.; Gallage, S.; Guiho, R.; Wolter, K.; Pombo, J.; Irvine, E.E.; Innes, A.J.; et al. Cardiac
glycosides are broad-spectrum senolytics. Nat. Metab. 2019, 1, 1074–1088. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
213. Triana-Martinez, F.; Picallos-Rabina, P.; Da Silva-Alvarez, S.; Pietrocola, F.; Llanos, S.; Rodilla, V.; Soprano, E.; Pedrosa, P.; Ferreiros,
A.; Barradas, M.; et al. Identiﬁcation and characterization of Cardiac Glycosides as senolytic compounds. Nat. Commun. 2019, 10,
4731. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
214. Zhu, Y.; Tchkonia, T.; Pirtskhalava, T.; Gower, A.C.; Ding, H.; Giorgadze, N.; Palmer, A.K.; Ikeno, Y.; Hubbard, G.B.;
Lenburg, M.; et al. The Achilles’ heel of senescent cells: From transcriptome to senolytic drugs. Aging Cell 2015, 14, 644–658.
[CrossRef] [PubMed]
215. Xu, M.; Pirtskhalava, T.; Farr, J.N.; Weigand, B.M.; Palmer, A.K.; Weivoda, M.M.; Inman, C.L.; Ogrodnik, M.B.; Hachfeld, C.M.;
Fraser, D.G.; et al. Senolytics improve physical function and increase lifespan in old age. Nat. Med. 2018, 24, 1246–1256. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
216. Naikawadi, R.P.; Disayabutr, S.; Mallavia, B.; Donne, M.L.; Green, G.; La, J.L.; Rock, J.R.; Looney, M.R.; Wolters, P.J. Telomere
dysfunction in alveolar epithelial cells causes lung remodeling and ﬁbrosis. JCI Insight 2016, 1, e86704. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
217. Lehmann, M.; Korfei, M.; Mutze, K.; Klee, S.; Skronska-Wasek, W.; Alsafadi, H.N.; Ota, C.; Costa, R.; Schiller, H.B.;
Lindner, M.; et al. Senolytic drugs target alveolar epithelial cell function and attenuate experimental lung ﬁbrosis ex vivo. Eur.
Respir. J. 2017, 50, 1602367. [CrossRef]
218. Thadathil, N.; Selvarani, R.; Mohammed, S.; Nicklas, E.H.; Tran, A.L.; Kamal, M.; Luo, W.; Brown, J.L.; Lawrence, M.M.; Borowik,
A.K.; et al. Senolytic treatment reduces cell senescence and necroptosis in Sod1 knockout mice that is associated with reduced
inﬂammation and hepatocellular carcinoma. Aging Cell 2022, 21, e13676. [CrossRef]
219. Ferreira-Gonzalez, S.; Man, T.Y.; Esser, H.; Aird, R.; Kilpatrick, A.M.; Rodrigo-Torres, D.; Younger, N.; Campana, L.; Gadd, V.L.;
Dwyer, B.; et al. Senolytic treatment preserves biliary regenerative capacity lost through cellular senescence during cold storage.
Sci. Transl. Med. 2022, 14, eabj4375. [CrossRef]
220. Yousefzadeh, M.J.; Zhu, Y.; McGowan, S.J.; Angelini, L.; Fuhrmann-Stroissnigg, H.; Xu, M.; Ling, Y.Y.; Melos, K.I.; Pirtskhalava, T.;
Inman, C.L.; et al. Fisetin is a senotherapeutic that extends health and lifespan. EbioMedicine 2018, 36, 18–28. [CrossRef]
221. Cádiz-Gurrea, M.L.; Borrás-Linares, I.; Lozano-Sánchez, J.; Joven, J.; Fernández-Arroyo, S.; Segura-Carretero, A. Cocoa and Grape
Seed Byproducts as a Source of Antioxidant and Anti-Inﬂammatory Proanthocyanidins. Int. J. Mol. Sci. 2017, 18, 376. [CrossRef]
222. Xu, Q.; Fu, Q.; Li, Z.; Liu, H.; Wang, Y.; Lin, X.; He, R.; Zhang, X.; Ju, Z.; Campisi, J.; et al. The ﬂavonoid procyanidin C1 has
senotherapeutic activity and increases lifespan in mice. Nat. Metab. 2021, 3, 1706–1726. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
223. Limbad, C.; Doi, R.; McGirr, J.; Ciotlos, S.; Perez, K.; Clayton, Z.S.; Daya, R.; Seals, D.R.; Campisi, J.; Melov, S. Senolysis induced
by 25-hydroxycholesterol targets CRYAB in multiple cell types. iScience 2022, 25, 103848. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
224. Lin, F.; Yao, X.; Kong, C.; Liu, X.; Zhao, Z.; Rao, S.; Wang, L.; Li, S.; Wang, J.; Dai, Q. 25-Hydroxycholesterol protecting from
cerebral ischemia-reperfusion injury through the inhibition of STING activity. Aging (Albany NY) 2021, 13, 20149–20163. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
225. Poli, G.; Biasi, F.; Leonarduzzi, G. Oxysterols in the pathogenesis of major chronic diseases. Redox Biol. 2013, 1, 125–130. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
226. Pungsrinont, T.; Sutter, M.F.; Ertingshausen, M.C.C.M.; Lakshmana, G.; Kokal, M.; Khan, A.S.; Baniahmad, A. Senolytic
compounds control a distinct fate of androgen receptor agonist- and antagonist-induced cellular senescent LNCaP prostate cancer
cells. Cell Biosci. 2020, 10, 59. [CrossRef]
227. Pereira, B.I.; Devine, O.P.; Vukmanovic-Stejic, M.; Chambers, E.S.; Subramanian, P.; Patel, N.; Virasami, A.; Sebire, N.J.; Kinsler, V.;
Valdovinos, A.; et al. Senescent cells evade immune clearance via HLA-E-mediated NK and CD8+ T cell inhibition. Nat. Commun.
2019, 10, 2387. [CrossRef]
228. Sagiv, A.; Burton, D.G.; Moshayev, Z.; Vadai, E.; Wensveen, F.; Ben-Dor, S.; Golani, O.; Polic, B.; Krizhanovsky, V. NKG2D ligands
mediate immunosurveillance of senescent cells. Aging (Albany NY) 2016, 8, 328–344. [CrossRef]
229. d’Alessio, P.A.; Béné, M.C. AISA can control the inﬂammatory facet of SASP. Mech. Ageing Dev. 2020, 186, 111206. [CrossRef]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
41 of 42
230. Hoenicke, L.; Zender, L. Immune surveillance of senescent cells--biological signiﬁcance in cancer- and non-cancer pathologies.
Carcinogenesis 2012, 33, 1123–1126. [CrossRef]
231. Burton, D.G.A.; Stolzing, A. Cellular senescence: Immunosurveillance and future immunotherapy. Ageing Res. Rev. 2018, 43,
17–25. [CrossRef]
232. Ahadi, S.; Zhou, W.; Schussler-Fiorenza Rose, S.M.; Sailani, M.R.; Contrepois, K.; Avina, M.; Ashland, M.; Brunet, A.; Snyder, M.
Personal aging markers and ageotypes revealed by deep longitudinal proﬁling. Nat. Med. 2020, 26, 83–90. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
233. Hashimoto, K.; Kouno, T.; Ikawa, T.; Hayatsu, N.; Miyajima, Y.; Yabukami, H.; Terooatea, T.; Sasaki, T.; Suzuki, T.;
Valentine, M.; et al. Single-cell transcriptomics reveals expansion of cytotoxic CD4 T cells in supercentenarians. Proc. Natl. Acad.
Sci. USA 2019, 116, 24242–24251. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
234. Qudrat, A.; Wong, J.; Truong, K. Engineering mammalian cells to seek senescence-associated secretory phenotypes. J. Cell Sci.
2017, 130, 3116–3123. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
235. Baruch, K.; Deczkowska, A.; Rosenzweig, N.; Tsitsou-Kampeli, A.; Sharif, A.M.; Matcovitch-Natan, O.; Kertser, A.; David,
E.; Amit, I.; Schwartz, M. PD-1 immune checkpoint blockade reduces pathology and improves memory in mouse models of
Alzheimer’s disease. Nat. Med. 2016, 22, 135–137. [CrossRef]
236. Grupp, S.A.; Kalos, M.; Barrett, D.; Aplenc, R.; Porter, D.L.; Rheingold, S.R.; Teachey, D.T.; Chew, A.; Hauck, B.; Wright, J.F.; et al.
Chimeric antigen receptor-modiﬁed T cells for acute lymphoid leukemia. N. Engl. J. Med. 2013, 368, 1509–1518. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
237. Yu, S.; Li, A.; Liu, Q.; Li, T.; Yuan, X.; Han, X.; Wu, K. Chimeric antigen receptor T cells: A novel therapy for solid tumors.
J. Hematol. Oncol. 2017, 10, 78. [CrossRef]
238. Sagiv, A.; Biran, A.; Yon, M.; Simon, J.; Lowe, S.W.; Krizhanovsky, V. Granule exocytosis mediates immune surveillance of
senescent cells. Oncogene 2013, 32, 1971–1977. [CrossRef]
239. Spear, P.; Wu, M.R.; Sentman, M.L.; Sentman, C.L. NKG2D ligands as therapeutic targets. Cancer Immun. 2013, 13, 8.
240. Wang, W.; Erbe, A.K.; Hank, J.A.; Morris, Z.S.; Sondel, P.M. NK Cell-Mediated Antibody-Dependent Cellular Cytotoxicity in
Cancer Immunotherapy. Front. Immunol. 2015, 6, 368. [CrossRef]
241. Althubiti, M.; Lezina, L.; Carrera, S.; Jukes-Jones, R.; Giblett, S.M.; Antonov, A.; Barlev, N.; Saldanha, G.S.; Pritchard, C.A.;
Cain, K.; et al. Characterization of novel markers of senescence and their prognostic potential in cancer. Cell Death Dis. 2014, 5,
e1528. [CrossRef]
242. Collado, M.; Gil, J.; Efeyan, A.; Guerra, C.; Schuhmacher, A.J.; Barradas, M.; Benguria, A.; Zaballos, A.; Flores, J.M.;
Barbacid, M.; et al. Tumour biology: Senescence in premalignant tumours. Nature 2005, 436, 642. [CrossRef]
243. Lujambio, A.; Akkari, L.; Simon, J.; Grace, D.; Tschaharganeh, D.F.; Bolden, J.E.; Zhao, Z.; Thapar, V.; Joyce, J.A.;
Krizhanovsky, V.; et al. Non-cell-autonomous tumor suppression by p53. Cell 2013, 153, 449–460. [CrossRef]
244. Mosteiro, L.; Pantoja, C.; Alcazar, N.; Marión, R.M.; Chondronasiou, D.; Rovira, M.; Fernandez-Marcos, P.J.; Muñoz-Martin, M.;
Blanco-Aparicio, C.; Pastor, J.; et al. Tissue damage and senescence provide critical signals for cellular reprogramming in vivo.
Science 2016, 354, aaf4445. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
245. Ritschka, B.; Storer, M.; Mas, A.; Heinzmann, F.; Ortells, M.C.; Morton, J.P.; Sansom, O.J.; Zender, L.; Keyes, W.M. The senescence-
associated secretory phenotype induces cellular plasticity and tissue regeneration. Genes. Dev. 2017, 31, 172–183. [CrossRef]
[PubMed]
246. Helman, A.; Klochendler, A.; Azazmeh, N.; Gabai, Y.; Horwitz, E.; Anzi, S.; Swisa, A.; Condiotti, R.; Granit, R.Z.; Nevo, Y.; et al.
p16(Ink4a)-induced senescence of pancreatic beta cells enhances insulin secretion. Nat. Med. 2016, 22, 412–420. [CrossRef]
247. Akbar, A.N.; Henson, S.M.; Lanna, A. Senescence of T Lymphocytes: Implications for Enhancing Human Immunity. Trends
Immunol. 2016, 37, 866–876. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
248. Ovadya, Y.; Krizhanovsky, V. Strategies targeting cellular senescence. J. Clin. Investig. 2018, 128, 1247–1254. [CrossRef]
249. Soto-Gamez, A.; Demaria, M. Therapeutic interventions for aging: The case of cellular senescence. Drug Discov. Today 2017, 22,
786–795. [CrossRef]
250. Lucas, C.L.; Kuehn, H.S.; Zhao, F.; Niemela, J.E.; Deenick, E.K.; Palendira, U.; Avery, D.T.; Moens, L.; Cannons, J.L.; Biancalana,
M.; et al. Dominant-activating germline mutations in the gene encoding the PI(3)K catalytic subunit p110delta result in T cell
senescence and human immunodeﬁciency. Nat. Immunol. 2014, 15, 88–97. [CrossRef]
251. Waters, D.W.; Blokland, K.E.C.; Pathinayake, P.S.; Burgess, J.K.; Mutsaers, S.E.; Prele, C.M.; Schuliga, M.; Grainge, C.L.; Knight,
D.A. Fibroblast senescence in the pathology of idiopathic pulmonary ﬁbrosis. Am. J. Physiol. Lung Cell Mol. Physiol. 2018, 315,
L162–L172. [CrossRef]
252. Justice, J.N.; Nambiar, A.M.; Tchkonia, T.; LeBrasseur, N.K.; Pascual, R.; Hashmi, S.K.; Prata, L.; Masternak, M.M.; Kritchevsky, S.B.;
Musi, N.; et al. Senolytics in idiopathic pulmonary ﬁbrosis: Results from a ﬁrst-in-human, open-label, pilot study. EbioMedicine
2019, 40, 554–563. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
253. Hickson, L.J.; Langhi Prata, L.G.P.; Bobart, S.A.; Evans, T.K.; Giorgadze, N.; Hashmi, S.K.; Herrmann, S.M.; Jensen, M.D.; Jia,
Q.; Jordan, K.L.; et al. Senolytics decrease senescent cells in humans: Preliminary report from a clinical trial of Dasatinib plus
Quercetin in individuals with diabetic kidney disease. EbioMedicine 2019, 47, 446–456. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
254. Deledda, A.; Giordano, E.; Velluzzi, F.; Flore, G.; Franceschelli, S.; Speranza, L.; Ripari, P. Mitochondrial Aging and Senolytic
Natural Products with Protective Potential. Int. J. Mol. Sci. 2022, 23, 16219. [CrossRef] [PubMed]
Cells 2023, 12, 915
42 of 42
255. Stemberkova-Hubackova, S.; Zobalova, R.; Dubisova, M.; Smigova, J.; Dvorakova, S.; Korinkova, K.; Ezrova, Z.; Endaya, B.;
Blazkova, K.; Vlcak, E.; et al. Simultaneous targeting of mitochondrial metabolism and immune checkpoints as a new strategy for
renal cancer therapy. Clin. Transl. Med. 2022, 12, e645. [CrossRef]
256. Vacurova, E.; Trnovska, J.; Svoboda, P.; Skop, V.; Novosadova, V.; Reguera, D.P.; Petrezselyová, S.; Piavaux, B.; Endaya, B.; Spoutil,
F.; et al. Mitochondrially targeted tamoxifen alleviates markers of obesity and type 2 diabetes mellitus in mice. Nat. Commun.
2022, 13, 1866. [CrossRef]
257. Salama, R.; Sadaie, M.; Hoare, M.; Narita, M. Cellular senescence and its effector programs. Genes. Dev. 2014, 28, 99–114.
[CrossRef]
258. Vergel, M.; Carnero, A. Bypassing cellular senescence by genetic screening tools. Clin. Transl. Oncol. 2010, 12, 410–417. [CrossRef]
259. Krimpenfort, P.; Quon, K.C.; Mooi, W.J.; Loonstra, A.; Berns, A. Loss of p16Ink4a confers susceptibility to metastatic melanoma in
mice. Nature 2001, 413, 83–86. [CrossRef]
260. Milanovic, M.; Fan, D.N.Y.; Belenki, D.; Dabritz, J.H.M.; Zhao, Z.; Yu, Y.; Dorr, J.R.; Dimitrova, L.; Lenze, D.; Monteiro Barbosa,
I.A.; et al. Senescence-associated reprogramming promotes cancer stemness. Nature 2018, 553, 96–100. [CrossRef]
261. Munoz-Espin, D.; Rovira, M.; Galiana, I.; Gimenez, C.; Lozano-Torres, B.; Paez-Ribes, M.; Llanos, S.; Chaib, S.; Munoz-Martin, M.;
Ucero, A.C.; et al. A versatile drug delivery system targeting senescent cells. EMBO Mol. Med. 2018, 10, e9355. [CrossRef]
Disclaimer/Publisher’s Note: The statements, opinions and data contained in all publications are solely those of the individual
author(s) and contributor(s) and not of MDPI and/or the editor(s). MDPI and/or the editor(s) disclaim responsibility for any injury to
people or property resulting from any ideas, methods, instructions or products referred to in the content.

